Only brahmins are the light caste; other castes are dark.
Only brahmins are purified, not others.
Only brahmins are Brahmā’s rightful sons, born of his mouth, born of Brahmā, created by Brahmā, heirs of Brahmā.
You’ve both abandoned the first caste to join an inferior caste, namely these shavelings, fake ascetics, riffraff, black spawn from the feet of our Kinsman.
This is not right, it’s not proper!’
That’s how the brahmins insult us.”
“Actually, Vāseṭṭha, the brahmins are forgetting their tradition when they say this to you.
For brahmin women are seen menstruating, being pregnant, giving birth, and breast-feeding.
Yet even though they’re born from a brahmin womb they say:
‘Only brahmins are the first caste; other castes are inferior.
Only brahmins are the light caste; other castes are dark.
Only brahmins are purified, not others.
Only brahmins are Brahmā’s rightful sons, born of his mouth, born of Brahmā, created by Brahmā, heirs of Brahmā.’
They misrepresent the brahmins, speak falsely, and make much bad karma.
Purification in the Four Castes
Vāseṭṭha, there are these four castes:
aristocrats, brahmins, merchants, and workers.
Some aristocrats kill living creatures, steal, and commit sexual misconduct. They use speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, and nonsensical. And they’re covetous, malicious, with wrong view.
These things are unskillful, blameworthy, not to be cultivated, unworthy of the noble ones—and are reckoned as such. They are dark deeds with dark results, criticized by sensible people. Such things are seen in some aristocrats.
And they are also seen among some brahmins,
merchants,
and workers.
But some aristocrats refrain from killing living creatures, stealing, and committing sexual misconduct. They refrain from speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, and nonsensical. And they’re content, kind-hearted, with right view.
These things are skillful, blameless, to be cultivated, worthy of the noble ones—and are reckoned as such. They are bright deeds with bright results, praised by sensible people. Such things are seen in some aristocrats.
And they are also seen among some brahmins,
merchants,
and workers.
Both these things occur like this, mixed up in these four castes—the dark and the bright, that which is praised and that which is criticized by sensible people. Yet of this the brahmins say:
‘Only brahmins are the first caste; other castes are inferior.
Only brahmins are the light caste; other castes are dark.
Only brahmins are purified, not others.
Only brahmins are Brahmā’s rightful sons, born of his mouth, born of Brahmā, created by Brahmā, heirs of Brahmā.’
Sensible people don’t acknowledge this.
Why is that?
Because any mendicant from these four castes who is perfected—with defilements ended, who has completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, achieved their own true goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and is rightly freed through enlightenment—is said to be foremost by virtue of principle, not without principle.
For principle, Vāseṭṭha, is the first thing for people in both this life and the next.
And here’s a way to understand how this is so.
King Pasenadi of Kosala knows that
the ascetic Gotama has gone forth from the neighboring clan of the Sakyans.
And the Sakyans are his vassals.
The Sakyans show deference to King Pasenadi by bowing down, rising up, greeting him with joined palms, and observing proper etiquette for him.
Now, King Pasenadi shows the same kind of deference to the Realized One. But he doesn’t think: ‘The ascetic Gotama is well-born, I am ill-born.
He is powerful, I am weak.
He is handsome, I am ugly.
He is influential, I am insignificant.’
Rather, in showing such deference to the Realized One he is only honoring, respecting, and venerating principle.
And here’s another way to understand how principle is the first thing for people in both this life and the next.
Vāseṭṭha, you have different births, names, and clans, and have gone forth from the lay life to homelessness from different families.
When they ask you what you are, you claim to be ascetics, followers of the Sakyan.
But only when someone has faith in the Realized One—settled, rooted, and planted deep, strong, not to be shifted by any ascetic or brahmin or god or Māra or Brahmā or by anyone in the world—is it appropriate for them to say:
‘I am the Buddha’s true-born child, born from his mouth, born of principle, created by principle, heir to principle.’
Why is that?
For these are terms for the Realized One: ‘the embodiment of truth’, and ‘the embodiment of holiness’, and ‘the one who has become the truth’, and ‘the one who has become holy’.
There comes a time when, Vāseṭṭha, after a very long period has passed, this cosmos contracts.
As the cosmos contracts, sentient beings are mostly headed for the realm of streaming radiance.
There they are mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the sky, steadily glorious, and they remain like that for a very long time.
There comes a time when, after a very long period has passed, this cosmos expands.
As the cosmos expands, sentient beings mostly pass away from that host of radiant deities and come back to this realm.
Here they are mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the sky, steadily glorious, and they remain like that for a very long time.
Solid Nectar Appears
But the single mass of water at that time was utterly dark.
The moon and sun were not found, nor were stars and constellations, day and night, months and fortnights, years and seasons, or male and female. Beings were simply known as ‘beings’.
After a very long period had passed, solid nectar curdled in the water.
It appeared just like the curd on top of hot milk-rice as it cools.
It was beautiful, fragrant, and delicious, like ghee or butter.
And it was as sweet as pure manuka honey.
Now, one of those beings was reckless.
Thinking, ‘Oh my, what might this be?’ they tasted the solid nectar with their finger.
They enjoyed it, and craving was born in them.
And other beings, following that being’s example, tasted solid nectar with their fingers.
They too enjoyed it, and craving was born in them.
The Moon and Sun Appear
Then those beings started to eat the solid nectar, breaking it into lumps.
But when they did this
their luminosity vanished.
And with the vanishing of their luminosity the moon and sun appeared,
stars and constellations appeared,
days and nights were distinguished,
and so were months and fortnights,
and years and seasons.
To this extent the world had evolved once more.
Then those beings eating the solid nectar, with that as their food and nourishment, remained for a very long time.
But so long as they ate that solid nectar, their bodies became more solid and they diverged in appearance;
some beautiful, some ugly.
And the beautiful beings looked down on the ugly ones:
‘We’re more beautiful, they’re the ugly ones!’
And the vanity of the beautiful ones made the solid nectar vanish.
They gathered together and bemoaned,
‘Oh, what a taste! Oh, what a taste!’
And even today when people get something tasty they say:
‘Oh, what a taste! Oh, what a taste!’
They’re just remembering an ancient primordial saying, but they don’t understand what it means.
Ground-Sprouts
When the solid nectar had vanished, ground-sprouts appeared to those beings.
They appeared just like mushrooms.
They were beautiful, fragrant, and delicious, like ghee or butter.
And they were as sweet as pure manuka honey.
Then those beings started to eat the ground-sprouts.
With that as their food and nourishment, they remained for a very long time.
But so long as they ate those ground-sprouts, their bodies became more solid and they diverged in appearance;
some beautiful, some ugly.
And the beautiful beings looked down on the ugly ones:
‘We’re more beautiful, they’re the ugly ones!’
And the vanity of the beautiful ones made the ground-sprouts vanish.
Bursting Pods
When the ground-sprouts had vanished, bursting pods appeared, like the fruit of the kadam tree.
They were beautiful, fragrant, and delicious, like ghee or butter.
And they were as sweet as pure manuka honey.
Then those beings started to eat the bursting pods.
With that as their food and nourishment, they remained for a very long time.
But so long as they ate those bursting pods, their bodies became more solid and they diverged in appearance;
some beautiful, some ugly.
And the beautiful beings looked down on the ugly ones:
‘We’re more beautiful, they’re the ugly ones!’
And the vanity of the beautiful ones made the bursting pods vanish.
They gathered together and bemoaned,
‘Oh, what we’ve lost! Oh, what we’ve lost—those bursting pods!’
And even today when people experience suffering they say:
‘Oh, what we’ve lost! Oh, what we’ve lost!’
They’re just remembering an ancient primordial saying, but they don’t understand what it means.
Ripe Untilled Rice
When the bursting pods had vanished, ripe untilled rice appeared to those beings. It had no powder or husk, pure and fragrant, with only the rice-grain.
What they took for supper in the evening, by the morning had grown back and ripened.
And what they took for breakfast in the morning had grown back and ripened by the evening,
so the cutting didn’t show.
Then those beings eating the ripe untilled rice, with that as their food and nourishment, remained for a very long time.
Gender Appears
But so long as they ate that ripe untilled rice, their bodies became more solid and they diverged in appearance. And female characteristics appeared on women, while male characteristics appeared on men.
Women spent too much time gazing at men, and men at women.
They became lustful, and their bodies burned with fever.
Due to this fever they had sex with each other.
Those who saw them having sex pelted them with dirt, ashes, or cow-dung, saying,
‘Get lost, filth! Get lost, filth!
How on earth can one being do that to another?’
And even today people in some countries, when a bride is carried off, pelt her with dirt, ashes, or cow-dung.
They’re just remembering an ancient primordial saying, but they don’t understand what it means.
Sexual Intercourse
What was reckoned as immoral at that time, these days is reckoned as moral.
The beings who had sex together weren’t allowed to enter a village or town for one or two months.
Ever since they excessively threw themselves into immorality,
they started to make buildings to hide their immoral deeds.
Then one of those beings of idle disposition thought,
‘Hey now, why should I be bothered to gather rice in the evening for supper, and in the morning for breakfast?
Why don’t I gather rice for supper and breakfast all at once?’
So that’s what he did.
Then one of the other beings approached that being and said,
‘Come, good being, we shall go to gather rice.’
‘There’s no need, good being! I gathered rice for supper and breakfast all at once.’
So that being, following their example, gathered rice for two days all at once, thinking: ‘This seems fine.’
Then one of the other beings approached that being and said,
‘Come, good being, we shall go to gather rice.’
‘There’s no need, good being! I gathered rice for two days all at once.’
So that being, following their example, gathered rice for four days all at once, thinking: ‘This seems fine.’
Then one of the other beings approached that being and said,
‘Come, good being, we shall go to gather rice.’
‘There’s no need, good being! I gathered rice for four days all at once.’
So that being, following their example, gathered rice for eight days all at once, thinking: ‘This seems fine.’
But when they started to store up rice to eat,
the rice grains became wrapped in powder and husk,
it didn’t grow back after reaping, the cutting showed, and the rice stood in clumps.
Dividing the Fields
Then those beings gathered together and bemoaned,
‘Oh, how wicked things have appeared among beings!
For we used to be mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the sky, steadily glorious, and we remained like that for a very long time.
After a very long period had passed, solid nectar curdled in the water.
But due to bad, unskillful things among us, the savory nectar vanished,
the ground-sprouts vanished,
the bursting pods vanished,
and now the rice grains have become wrapped in powder and husk, it doesn’t grow back after reaping, the cutting shows, and the rice stands in clumps.
We’d better divide up the rice and set boundaries.’
So that’s what they did.
Now, one of those beings was reckless. While guarding their own share they took another’s share without it being given, and ate it.
They grabbed the one who had done this and said,
‘You have done a bad thing, good being, in that while guarding your own share you took another’s share without it being given, and ate it.
Do not do such a thing again.’
‘Yes, sirs,’ replied that being.
But for a second time,
and a third time they did the same thing, and were told not to continue.
And then they struck that being, some with fists, others with stones, and still others with rods.
From that day on stealing was found, and blaming and lying and the taking up of rods.
The Elected King
Then those beings gathered together and bemoaned,
‘Oh, how wicked things have appeared among beings, in that stealing is found, and blaming and lying and the taking up of rods!
Why don’t we elect one being who would rightly accuse those who deserve it, blame those who deserve it, and expel those who deserve it?
We shall pay them with a share of rice.’
Then those beings approached the being among them who was most attractive, good-looking, lovely, and illustrious, and said,
‘Come, good being, rightly accuse those who deserve it, blame those who deserve it, and banish those who deserve it.
We shall pay you with a share of rice.’
‘Yes, sirs,’ replied that being. They acted accordingly,
and were paid with a share of rice.
‘Elected by the people’, Vāseṭṭha, is the meaning of ‘elected one’, the first term to be specifically invented for them.
‘Lord of the fields’ is the meaning of ‘aristocrat’, the second term to be specifically invented.
‘They please others with principle’ is the meaning of ‘king’, the third term to be specifically invented.
And that, Vāseṭṭha, is how the ancient primordial terms for the circle of aristocrats were created; for those very beings, not others; for those like them, not unlike; legitimately, not illegitimately.
For principle, Vāseṭṭha, is the first thing for people in both this life and the next.
The Circle of Brahmins
Then some of those same beings thought,
‘Oh, how wicked things have appeared among beings, in that stealing is found, and blaming and lying and the taking up of rods and banishment!
Why don’t we set aside bad, unskillful things?’
So that’s what they did.
‘They set aside bad, unskillful things’ is the meaning of ‘brahmin’, the first term to be specifically invented for them.
They built leaf huts in a wilderness region where they meditated pure and bright, without lighting cooking fires or digging the soil. They came down in the morning for breakfast and in the evening for supper to the village, town, or royal capital seeking a meal.
When they had obtained food they continued to meditate in the leaf huts.
When people noticed this they said,
‘These beings build leaf huts in a wilderness region where they meditate pure and bright, without lighting cooking fires or digging the soil. They come down in the morning for breakfast and in the evening for supper to the village, town, or royal capital seeking a meal.
When they have obtained food they continue to meditate in the leaf huts.’
‘They meditate’ is the meaning of ‘meditator’, the second term to be specifically invented for them.
But some of those beings were unable to keep up with their meditation in the leaf huts in the wilderness. They came down to the neighborhood of a village or town where they dwelt compiling texts.
When people noticed this they said,
‘These beings were unable to keep up with their meditation in the leaf huts in the wilderness. They came down to the neighborhood of a village or town where they dwelt compiling texts. Now they don’t meditate.’
‘Now they don’t meditate’ is the meaning of ‘reciter’, the third term to be specifically invented for them.
What was reckoned as lesser at that time, these days is reckoned as primary.
And that, Vāseṭṭha, is how the ancient primordial terms for the circle of brahmins were created; for those very beings, not others; for those like them, not unlike; legitimately, not illegitimately.
For principle, Vāseṭṭha, is the first thing for people in both this life and the next.
The Circle of Merchants
Some of those same beings, taking up an active sex life, applied themselves to various jobs.
‘Having taken up an active sex life, they apply themselves to various jobs’ is the meaning of ‘merchant’, the term specifically invented for them.
And that, Vāseṭṭha, is how the ancient primordial term for the circle of merchants was created; for those very beings, not others; for those like them, not unlike; legitimately, not illegitimately.
For principle, Vāseṭṭha, is the first thing for people in both this life and the next.
The Circle of Workers
The remaining beings lived by hunting and menial tasks.
‘They live by hunting and menial tasks’ is the meaning of ‘worker’, the term specifically invented for them.
And that, Vāseṭṭha, is how the ancient primordial term for the circle of workers was created; for those very beings, not others; for those like them, not unlike; legitimately, not illegitimately.
For principle, Vāseṭṭha, is the first thing for people in both this life and the next.
There came a time when an aristocrat, brahmin, merchant, or worker, deprecating their own vocation, went forth from the lay life to homelessness, thinking,
‘I will be an ascetic.’
And that, Vāseṭṭha, is how these four circles were created; for those very beings, not others; for those like them, not unlike; legitimately, not illegitimately.
For principle, Vāseṭṭha, is the first thing for people in both this life and the next.
On Bad Conduct
An aristocrat, brahmin, merchant, worker, or ascetic may do bad things by way of body, speech, and mind. They have wrong view, and they act out of that wrong view. And because of that, when their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
An aristocrat, brahmin, merchant, worker, or ascetic may do good things by way of body, speech, and mind. They have right view, and they act out of that right view. And because of that, when their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
The Qualities That Lead to Awakening
An aristocrat, brahmin, merchant, worker, or ascetic who is restrained in body, speech, and mind, and develops the seven qualities that lead to awakening, becomes extinguished in this very life.
Any mendicant from these four castes who is perfected—with defilements ended, who has completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, achieved their own true goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and is rightly freed through enlightenment—is said to be the foremost by virtue of principle, not without principle.
For principle, Vāseṭṭha, is the first thing for people in both this life and the next.
Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra also spoke this verse:
‘The aristocrat is first among people
who take clan as the standard.
But one accomplished in knowledge and conduct
is first among gods and humans.’
That verse was well sung by Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra, not poorly sung; well spoken, not poorly spoken; beneficial, not harmful, and I agree with it.
I also say:
The aristocrat is first among people
who take clan as the standard.
But one accomplished in knowledge and conduct
is first among gods and humans.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, Vāseṭṭha and Bhāradvāja were happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
The Lion’s Roar at Udumbarikā’s Monastery
On the Wanderer Nigrodha
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain.
Now at that time the wanderer Nigrodha was residing in the lady Udumbarikā’s monastery for wanderers, together with a large assembly of three thousand wanderers.
Then the householder Sandhāna left Rājagaha in the middle of the day to see the Buddha.
Then it occurred to him,
“It’s the wrong time to see the Buddha,
as he’s in retreat.
And it’s the wrong time to see the esteemed mendicants,
as they’re in retreat.
Why don’t I visit the wanderer Nigrodha at the lady Udumbarikā’s monastery for wanderers?”
So he went to the monastery of the wanderers.
Now at that time, Nigrodha was sitting together with a large assembly of wanderers making an uproar, a dreadful racket. They engaged in all kinds of unworthy talk, such as
talk about kings, bandits, and ministers; talk about armies, threats, and wars; talk about food, drink, clothes, and beds; talk about garlands and fragrances; talk about family, vehicles, villages, towns, cities, and countries; talk about women and heroes; street talk and well talk; talk about the departed; motley talk; tales of land and sea; and talk about being reborn in this or that state of existence.
Nigrodha saw Sandhāna coming off in the distance,
and hushed his own assembly:
“Be quiet, good sirs, don’t make a sound.
The householder Sandhāna, a disciple of the ascetic Gotama, is coming.
He is included among the white-clothed lay disciples of the ascetic Gotama, who is residing near Rājagaha.
Such venerables like the quiet, are educated to be quiet, and praise the quiet.
Hopefully if he sees that our assembly is quiet he’ll see fit to approach.”
Then those wanderers fell silent.
Then Sandhāna went up to the wanderer Nigrodha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to Nigrodha,
“The way the wanderers make an uproar as they sit together and talk about all kinds of unworthy topics is one thing.
It’s quite different to the way the Buddha frequents remote lodgings in the wilderness and the forest that are quiet and still, far from the madding crowd, remote from human settlements, and fit for retreat.”
When Sandhāna said this, Nigrodha said to him,
“Surely, householder, you should know better! With whom does the ascetic Gotama converse? With whom does he engage in discussion? With whom does he achieve lucidity of wisdom?
Staying in empty huts has destroyed the ascetic Gotama’s wisdom. Not frequenting assemblies, he is unable to hold a discussion.
He just lurks on the periphery.
He’s just like the nilgai antelope, circling around and lurking on the periphery.
Please, householder, let the ascetic Gotama come to this assembly. I’ll sink him with just one question! I’ll roll him over and wrap him up like a hollow pot!”
With clairaudience that is purified and superhuman, the Buddha heard this discussion between the householder Sandhāna and the wanderer Nigrodha.
Then the Buddha descended Vulture’s Peak Mountain and went to the peacocks’ feeding ground on the bank of the Sumāgadhā, where he walked mindfully in the open air.
Nigrodha saw him,
and hushed his own assembly:
“Be quiet, good sirs, don’t make a sound. The ascetic Gotama is walking mindfully on the bank of the Sumāgadhā.
The venerable likes quiet and praises quiet.
Hopefully if he sees that our assembly is quiet he’ll see fit to approach.
If he comes, I’ll ask him this question:
‘Sir, what teaching do you use to guide your disciples, through which they claim solace in the fundamental purpose of the spiritual life?’”
Then those wanderers fell silent.
Mortification in Disgust of Sin
Then the Buddha went up to the wanderer Nigrodha,
who said to him,
“Come, Blessed One! Welcome, Blessed One!
It’s been a long time since you took the opportunity to come here.
Please, sir, sit down, this seat is ready.”
The Buddha sat on the seat spread out,
while Nigrodha took a low seat and sat to one side.
The Buddha said to him,
“Nigrodha, what were you sitting talking about just now? What conversation was unfinished?”
Nigrodha said,
“Well, sir, I saw you walking mindfully and said:
‘If the ascetic Gotama comes, I’ll ask him this question:
“Sir, what teaching do you use to guide your disciples, through which they claim solace in the fundamental purpose of the spiritual life?”’
This is the conversation that was unfinished when the Buddha arrived.”
“It’s hard for you to understand this, Nigrodha, since you have a different view, creed, preference, practice, and tradition.
Please ask me a question about the higher mortification in disgust of sin in your own tradition:
‘How are the conditions for the mortification in disgust of sin completed, and how are they incomplete?’”
When he said this, those wanderers made an uproar,
“It’s incredible, it’s amazing! The ascetic Gotama has such power and might! For he sets aside his own doctrine and invites discussion on the doctrine of others!”
Then Nigrodha, having quieted those wanderers, said to the Buddha,
“Sir, we teach mortification in disgust of sin, regarding it as essential and clinging to it.
How are the conditions for the mortification in disgust of sin completed, and how are they incomplete?”
“It’s when a mortifier goes naked, ignoring conventions. They lick their hands, and don’t come or wait when asked. They don’t consent to food brought to them, or food prepared on purpose for them, or an invitation for a meal.
They don’t receive anything from a pot or bowl; or from someone who keeps sheep, or who has a weapon or a shovel in their home; or where a couple is eating; or where there is a woman who is pregnant, breast-feeding, or who has a man in her home; or where there’s a dog waiting or flies buzzing. They accept no fish or meat or liquor or wine, and drink no beer.
They go to just one house for alms, taking just one mouthful, or two houses and two mouthfuls, up to seven houses and seven mouthfuls. They feed on one saucer a day, two saucers a day, up to seven saucers a day.
They eat once a day, once every second day, up to once a week, and so on, even up to once a fortnight. They live committed to the practice of eating food at set intervals.
They eat herbs, millet, wild rice, poor rice, water lettuce, rice bran, scum from boiling rice, sesame flour, grass, or cow dung. They survive on forest roots and fruits, or eating fallen fruit.
They wear robes of sunn hemp, mixed hemp, corpse-wrapping cloth, rags, lodh tree bark, antelope hide (whole or in strips), kusa grass, bark, wood-chips, human hair, horse-tail hair, or owls’ wings.
They tear out their hair and beard, committed to this practice.
They constantly stand, refusing seats.
They squat, committed to persisting in the squatting position.
They lie on a mat of thorns, making a mat of thorns their bed.
They make their bed on a plank, or the bare ground.
They lie only on one side.
They wear dust and dirt.
They stay in the open air.
They sleep wherever they lay their mat.
They eat unnatural things, committed to the practice of eating unnatural foods.
They don’t drink, committed to the practice of not drinking liquids.
They’re committed to the practice of immersion in water three times a day, including the evening.
What do you think, Nigrodha?
If this is so, is the mortification in disgust of sin complete, or incomplete?”
“Clearly, sir, if that is so the mortification in disgust of sin is complete, not incomplete.”
“But even such a completed mortification has many defects, I say.”
Defects
“But how does the Buddha say that even such a completed mortification has many defects?”
“Firstly, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification. They’re happy with that, as they’ve got all they wished for.
This is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification. They glorify themselves and put others down on account of that.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification. They become indulgent and infatuated and fall into negligence on account of that.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification. They generate possessions, honor, and popularity through that mortification. They’re happy with that, as they’ve got all they wished for.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification. They generate possessions, honor, and popularity through that mortification. They glorify themselves and put others down on account of that.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification. They generate possessions, honor, and popularity through that mortification. They become indulgent and infatuated and fall into negligence on account of that.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier becomes fussy about food, saying,
‘This agrees with me, this doesn’t agree with me.’
What doesn’t agree with them they reluctantly give up.
But what does agree with them they eat tied, infatuated, attached, blind to the drawbacks, and not understanding the escape.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification out of longing for possessions, honor, and popularity, thinking,
‘Kings, royal ministers, aristocrats, brahmins, householders, and sectarians will honor me!’
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier rebukes a certain ascetic or brahmin,
‘But what is this one doing, living in abundance! According to this ascetic’s doctrine, everything—
plants propagated from roots, stems, cuttings, or joints; and those from regular seeds as the fifth—is crunched together like the thunder of a tooth-hammer!’
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier sees a certain ascetic or brahmin being honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated among good families.
They think,
‘This one, who lives in abundance, is honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated among good families.
But I, a self-mortifier who lives rough, am not honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated among good families.’ Thus they give rise to jealousy and stinginess regarding families.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier sits meditation only when people can see them.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier sneaks about among families, thinking,
‘This is part of my mortification; this is part of my mortification.’
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier sometimes behaves in an underhand manner.
When asked whether something agrees with them, they say it does, even though it doesn’t.
Or they say it doesn’t, even though it does.
Thus they tell a deliberate lie.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier disagrees with the way that the Realized One or their disciple teaches Dhamma, even when they make a valid point.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
Furthermore, a mortifier is irritable and hostile …
offensive and contemptuous …
jealous and stingy …
devious and deceitful …
obstinate and vain …
they have wicked desires, falling under the sway of wicked desires …
they have wrong view, being attached to an extremist view …
they’re attached to their own views, holding them tight, and refusing to let go.
This too is a defect in that mortifier.
What do you think, Nigrodha?
Are such mortifications defective or not?”
“Clearly, sir, they’re defective.
It’s possible that a mortifier might have all of these defects,
let alone one or other of them.”
On Reaching the Shoots
“Firstly, Nigrodha, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification. But they’re not happy with that, as they still haven’t got all they wished for.
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification. They don’t glorify themselves or put others down on account of that.
So they’re pure on that point.
They don’t become indulgent …
Furthermore, a mortifier undertakes a practice of mortification. They generate possessions, honor, and popularity through that mortification. They’re not happy with that, as they still haven’t got all they wished for …
They don’t glorify themselves and put others down on account of possessions, honor, and popularity …
They don’t become indulgent because of it …
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier doesn’t become fussy about food, saying,
‘This agrees with me, this doesn’t agree with me.’
What doesn’t agree with them they readily give up.
But what does agree with them they eat without being tied, infatuated, attached, seeing the drawbacks, and understanding the escape.
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier doesn’t undertake a practice of mortification out of longing for possessions, honor, and popularity …
‘Kings, royal ministers, aristocrats, brahmins, householders, and sectarians will honor me!’
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier doesn’t rebuke a certain ascetic or brahmin,
‘But what is this one doing, living in abundance! According to this ascetic’s doctrine, everything—
plants propagated from roots, stems, cuttings, or joints; and those from regular seeds as the fifth—is crunched together like the thunder of a tooth-hammer!’
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier sees a certain ascetic or brahmin being honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated among good families.
It never occurs to them,
‘This one, who lives in abundance, is honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated among good families.
But I, a self-mortifier who lives rough, am not honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated among good families.’ Thus they don’t give rise to jealousy and stinginess regarding families.
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier doesn’t sit meditation only when people can see them.
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier doesn’t sneak about among families, thinking,
‘This is part of my mortification; this is part of my mortification.’
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier never behaves in an underhand manner.
When asked whether something agrees with them, they say it doesn’t when it doesn’t.
Or they say it does when it does.
Thus they don’t tell a deliberate lie.
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier agrees with the way that the Realized One or their disciple teaches Dhamma when they make a valid point.
So they’re pure on that point.
Furthermore, a mortifier is not irritable and hostile …
offensive and contemptuous …
jealous and stingy …
devious and deceitful …
obstinate and vain …
they don’t have wicked desires …
and wrong view …
they’re not attached to their own views, holding them tight, and refusing to let go.
So they’re pure on that point.
What do you think, Nigrodha?
If this is so, is the mortification in disgust of sin purified or not?”
“Clearly, sir, it is purified. It has reached the peak and the pith.”
“No, Nigrodha, at this point the mortification in disgust of sin has not yet reached the peak and the pith.
Rather, it has only reached the shoots.”
On Reaching the Bark
“But at what point, sir, does the mortification in disgust of sin reach the peak and the pith?
Please help me reach the peak and the pith!”
“Nigrodha, take a mortifier who is restrained in the fourfold restraint.
And how is a mortifier restrained in the fourfold restraint?
It’s when a mortifier doesn’t kill living creatures, doesn’t get others to kill, and doesn’t approve of killing.
They don’t steal, get others to steal, or approve of stealing.
They don’t lie, get others to lie, or approve of lying.
They don’t expect rewards from their practice, they don’t lead others to expect rewards, and they don’t approve of expecting rewards.
That’s how a mortifier is restrained in the fourfold restraint.
When a mortifier has the fourfold restraint, that is their mortification.
They step forward, not falling back.
They frequent a secluded lodging—a wilderness, the root of a tree, a hill, a ravine, a mountain cave, a charnel ground, a forest, the open air, a heap of straw.
After the meal, they return from alms-round, sit down cross-legged with their body straight, and establish mindfulness right there.
Giving up desire for the world, they meditate with a heart rid of desire, cleansing the mind of desire.
Giving up ill will and malevolence, they meditate with a mind rid of ill will, full of compassion for all living beings, cleansing the mind of ill will.
Giving up dullness and drowsiness, they meditate with a mind rid of dullness and drowsiness, perceiving light, mindful and aware, cleansing the mind of dullness and drowsiness.
Giving up restlessness and remorse, they meditate without restlessness, their mind peaceful inside, cleansing the mind of restlessness and remorse.
Giving up doubt, they meditate having gone beyond doubt, not undecided about skillful qualities, cleansing the mind of doubt.
They give up these five hindrances, corruptions of the heart that weaken wisdom.
Then they meditate spreading a heart full of love to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of love to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
They meditate spreading a heart full of compassion …
They meditate spreading a heart full of rejoicing …
They meditate spreading a heart full of equanimity to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of equanimity to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
What do you think, Nigrodha?
If this is so, is the mortification in disgust of sin purified or not?”
“Clearly, sir, it is purified. It has reached the peak and the pith.”
“No, Nigrodha, at this point the mortification in disgust of sin has not yet reached the peak and the pith.
Rather, it has only reached the bark.”
On Reaching the Softwood
“But at what point, sir, does the mortification in disgust of sin reach the peak and the pith?
Please help me reach the peak and the pith!”
“Nigrodha, take a mortifier who is restrained in the fourfold restraint.
They give up these five hindrances, corruptions of the heart that weaken wisdom.
Then they meditate spreading a heart full of love …
compassion …
rejoicing …
equanimity.
They recollect many kinds of past lives, that is, one, two, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand rebirths; many eons of the world contracting, many eons of the world expanding, many eons of the world contracting and expanding. They remember:
‘There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food.
This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.’ And so they recollect their many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
What do you think, Nigrodha?
If this is so, is the mortification in disgust of sin purified or not?”
“Clearly, sir, it is purified. It has reached the peak and the pith.”
“No, Nigrodha, at this point the mortification in disgust of sin has not yet reached the peak and the pith.
Rather, it has only reached the softwood.”
On Reaching the Heartwood
“But at what point, sir, does the mortification in disgust of sin reach the peak and the pith?
Please help me reach the peak and the pith!”
“Nigrodha, take a mortifier who is restrained in the fourfold restraint.
They give up these five hindrances, corruptions of the heart that weaken wisdom.
Then they meditate spreading a heart full of love …
equanimity …
They recollect many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds:
‘These dear beings did bad things by way of body, speech, and mind.
They spoke ill of the noble ones; they had wrong view; and they chose to act out of that wrong view.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
These dear beings, however, did good things by way of body, speech, and mind.
They never spoke ill of the noble ones; they had right view; and they chose to act out of that right view. When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.’ And so, with clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
What do you think, Nigrodha?
If this is so, is the mortification in disgust of sin purified or not?”
“Clearly, sir, it is purified. It has reached the peak and the pith.”
“Nigrodha, at this point the mortification in disgust of sin has reached the peak and the pith.
Nigrodha, remember you said this to me:
‘Sir, what teaching do you use to guide your disciples, through which they claim solace in the fundamental purpose of the spiritual life?’
Well, there is something better and finer than this. That’s what I use to guide my disciples, through which they claim solace in the fundamental purpose of the spiritual life.”
When he said this, those wanderers made an uproar,
“In that case, we’re lost, and so is our tradition! We don’t know anything better or finer than that!”
Nigrodha Feels Depressed
Then the householder Sandhāna realized,
“Obviously, now these wanderers want to listen to what the Buddha says. They’re paying attention and applying their minds to understand!”
So he said to the wanderer Nigrodha,
“Nigrodha, remember you said this to me:
‘Surely, householder, you should know better! With whom does the ascetic Gotama converse? With whom does he engage in discussion? With whom does he achieve lucidity of wisdom?
Staying in empty huts has destroyed the ascetic Gotama’s wisdom. Not frequenting assemblies, he is unable to hold a discussion. He just lurks on the periphery.
He’s just like the nilgai antelope, circling around and lurking on the periphery.
Please, householder, let the ascetic Gotama come to this assembly. I’ll sink him with just one question! I’ll roll him over and wrap him up like a hollow pot!’
Now the Blessed One, perfected and fully awakened, has arrived here. Why don’t you send him out of the assembly to the periphery like a nilgai antelope? Why don’t you sink him with just one question? Why don’t you roll him over and wrap him up like a hollow pot?”
When he said this, Nigrodha sat silent, embarrassed, shoulders drooping, downcast, depressed, with nothing to say.
Knowing this, the Buddha said to him,
“Is it really true, Nigrodha—are those your words?”
“It’s true, sir, those are my words. It was foolish, stupid, and unskillful of me.”
“What do you think, Nigrodha?
Have you heard that wanderers of the past who were elderly and senior, the teachers of teachers, said that
when the perfected ones, the fully awakened Buddhas of the past came together, they made an uproar, a dreadful racket as they sat and talked about all kinds of unworthy topics,
like you do in your tradition these days?
Or did they say that the Buddhas frequented remote lodgings in the wilderness and the forest that are quiet and still, far from the madding crowd, remote from human settlements, and fit for retreat, like I do these days?”
“I have heard that wanderers of the past who were elderly and senior, said that
when the perfected ones, the fully awakened Buddhas of the past came together, they didn’t make an uproar,
like I do in my tradition these days.
They said that the Buddhas of the past frequented remote lodgings in the wilderness, like the Buddha does these days.”
“Nigrodha, you are a sensible and mature man. Did it not occur to you:
‘The Blessed One is awakened, tamed, serene, crossed over, and extinguished. And he teaches Dhamma for awakening, taming, serenity, crossing over, and extinguishment’?”
The Culmination of the Spiritual Path
Nigrodha said,
“I have made a mistake, sir. It was foolish, stupid, and unskillful of me to speak in that way.
Please, sir, accept my mistake for what it is, so I will restrain myself in future.”
“Indeed, Nigrodha, you made a mistake. It was foolish, stupid, and unskillful of you to speak in that way.
But since you have recognized your mistake for what it is, and have dealt with it properly, I accept it.
For it is growth in the training of the Noble One to recognize a mistake for what it is, deal with it properly, and commit to restraint in the future.
Nigrodha, this is what I say:
Let a sensible person come—neither devious nor deceitful, a person of integrity. I teach and instruct them.
By practicing as instructed they will realize the supreme end of the spiritual path in this very life, in seven years. They will live having achieved with their own insight the goal for which gentlemen rightly go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
Let alone seven years.
Let a sensible person come—neither devious nor deceitful, a person of integrity. I teach and instruct them.
By practicing as instructed they will realize the supreme end of the spiritual path in this very life, in six years …
five years …
four years …
three years …
two years …
one year …
seven months …
six months …
five months …
four months …
three months …
two months …
one month …
a fortnight.
Let alone a fortnight.
Let a sensible person come—neither devious nor deceitful, a person of integrity. I teach and instruct them.
By practicing as instructed they will realize the supreme end of the spiritual path in this very life, in seven days.
The Wanderers Feel Depressed
Nigrodha, you might think,
‘The ascetic Gotama speaks like this because he wants pupils.’
But you should not see it like this.
Let your teacher remain your teacher.
You might think,
‘The ascetic Gotama speaks like this because he wants us to give up our recitation.’
But you should not see it like this.
Let your recitation remain as it is.
You might think,
‘The ascetic Gotama speaks like this because he wants us to give up our livelihood.’
But you should not see it like this.
Let your livelihood remain as it is.
You might think,
‘The ascetic Gotama speaks like this because he wants us to start doing things that are unskillful and considered unskillful in our tradition.’
But you should not see it like this.
Let those things that are unskillful and considered unskillful in your tradition remain as they are.
You might think,
‘The ascetic Gotama speaks like this because he wants us to stop doing things that are skillful and considered skillful in our tradition.’
But you should not see it like this.
Let those things that are skillful and considered skillful in your tradition remain as they are.
I do not speak for any of these reasons.
Nigrodha, there are things that are unskillful, corrupted, leading to future lives, hurtful, resulting in suffering and future rebirth, old age, and death. I teach Dhamma so that those things may be given up.
When you practice accordingly, corrupting qualities will be given up in you and cleansing qualities will grow. You’ll enter and remain in the fullness and abundance of wisdom, having realized it with your own insight in this very life.”
When this was said, those wanderers sat silent, dismayed, shoulders drooping, downcast, depressed, with nothing to say, as if their minds were possessed by Māra.
Then the Buddha thought,
“All these foolish people have been touched by the Wicked One!
For not even a single one thinks,
‘Come, let us lead the spiritual life under the ascetic Gotama for the sake of enlightenment—for what do seven days matter?’”
Then the Buddha, having roared his lion’s roar in the lady Udumbarikā’s monastery for wanderers, rose into the air and landed on Vulture’s Peak.
Meanwhile, the householder Sandhāna just went back to Rājagaha.
Long Discourses
Sakka’s Questions
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Magadhans; east of Rājagaha there’s a brahmin village named Ambasaṇḍā, north of which, on Mount Vediyaka, is the Indasāla cave.
Now at that time Sakka, the lord of gods, became eager to see the Buddha.
He thought,
“Where is the Blessed One at present, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha?”
He saw that the Buddha was at the Indasāla cave,
and addressed the gods of the Thirty-Three,
“Good sirs, the Buddha is staying in the land of the Magadhans at the Indasāla cave.
What if we were to go and see that Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha?”
“Yes, lord,” replied the gods.
Then Sakka addressed the fairy Pañcasikha,
“Dear Pañcasikha, the Buddha is staying in the land of the Magadhans at the Indasāla cave.
What if we were to go and see that Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha?”
“Yes, lord,” replied the fairy Pañcasikha. Taking his arched harp made from the pale timber of wood-apple, he went as Sakka’s attendant.
Then Sakka went at the head of a retinue consisting of the gods of the Thirty-Three and the fairy Pañcasikha.
As easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, he vanished from the heaven of the gods of the Thirty-Three and landed on Mount Vediyaka north of Ambasaṇḍā.
Now at that time a dazzling light appeared over Mount Vediyaka and Ambasaṇḍā, as happens through the glory of the gods.
People in the villages round about, terrified, shocked, and awestruck, said,
“Mount Vediyaka must be on fire today, blazing and burning!
Oh why has such a dazzling light appeared over Mount Vediyaka and Ambasaṇḍā?”
Then Sakka addressed the fairy Pañcasikha,
“My dear Pañcasikha, it’s hard for one like me to get near the Realized Ones while they are on retreat practicing absorption, enjoying absorption.
But if you were to charm the Buddha first, then I could go to see him.”
“Yes, lord,” replied the fairy Pañcasikha. Taking his arched harp made from the pale timber of wood-apple, he went to the Indasāla cave. When he had drawn near, he stood to one side, thinking,
“This is neither too far nor too near; and he’ll hear my voice.”
Pañcasikha’s Song
Standing to one side, Pañcasikha played his arched harp, and sang these verses on the Buddha, the teaching, the Saṅgha, the perfected ones, and sensual love.
“My lady Suriyavaccasā, oh my Sunshine—
I pay homage to your father Timbaru,
through whom was born a lady so fine,
to fill me with a joy I never knew.
As sweet as a breeze to one who’s sweating,
or when thirsty, a sweet and cooling drink,
so dear is your shining beauty to me,
just like the teaching is to all the saints!
Like a cure when you’re struck by fever dire,
or food to ease the hunger pain,
come on, darling, please put out my fire,
quench me like water on a flame.
As elephants burning in the heat of summer,
sink down in a lotus pond to rest,
so cool, full of petals and of pollen—
that’s how I would plunge into your breast.
Like elephants bursting bonds in rutting season,
beating off the pricks of lance and pikes—
I just don’t understand what is the reason
I’m so crazy for your shapely thighs!
For you, my heart is full of passion,
I’m in an altered state of mind.
There is no going back, I’m just not able,
I’m like a fish that’s hooked up on the line.
Come on, my darling, hold me, fair of thighs!
Embrace me, with your so bashful eyes!
Take me in your arms, my lovely lady,
that’s all I’d ever want or could desire.
Ah, then my desire was such a small thing,
my sweet, with your curling wavy hair;
now, like to arahants an offering,
it’s grown so very much from there.
Whatever the merit I have forged
by giving to such perfected beings—
may that, my altogether gorgeous,
ripen in togetherness with you.
Whatever the merit I have forged
in this wide open land,
may that, my altogether gorgeous,
ripen in togetherness with you.
Absorbed, the Sakyan meditates,
unified, alert, and mindful,
the sage aims right at the deathless state—
like me, oh my Sunshine, aiming for you!
And just like the sage would be rejoicing,
were he to awaken to the truth,
so I’d be rejoicing, lady,
were I to end up as one with you.
If Sakka were to grant me just one wish,
as Lord of the holy Thirty-Three,
my darling, you’re the only one I’d wish for,
so strong is the love I hold for you.
Like a freshly blossoming sal tree
is your father, my lady so wise.
I pay homage to him, bowing down humbly,
to he whose daughter is of such a kind.”
When Pañcasikha had spoken, the Buddha said to him,
“Pañcasikha, the sound of the strings and the sound of your voice blend well together,
so that neither overpowers the other.
But when did you compose these verses on the Buddha, the teaching, the Saṅgha, the perfected ones, and sensual love?”
“This one time, sir, when you were first awakened, you were staying near Uruvelā at the goatherd’s banyan tree on the bank of the Nerañjarā River.
And at that time I was in love with the lady named Bhaddā Suriyavacchasā, the daughter of the fairy king Timbaru.
But the sister desired another—
it was Mātali the charioteer’s son named Sikhaḍḍī who she loved.
Since I couldn’t win that sister by any means,
I took my arched harp to Timbaru’s home, where I played those verses.
When I finished, Suriyavacchasā said to me,
‘Dear sir, I have not personally seen the Buddha. But I did hear about him when I went to dance for the gods of the Thirty-Three in the Hall of Justice.
Since you extol the Buddha, let us meet up today.’
And that’s when I met up with that sister.
But we have not met since.”
The Approach of Sakka
Then Sakka, lord of gods, thought,
“Pañcasikha is exchanging pleasantries with the Buddha.”
So he addressed Pañcasikha,
“My dear Pañcasikha, please bow to the Buddha for me, saying:
‘Sir, Sakka, lord of gods, with his ministers and retinue, bows with his head at your feet.’”
“Yes, lord,” replied Pañcasikha. He bowed to the Buddha and said,
“Sir, Sakka, lord of gods, with his ministers and retinue, bows with his head at your feet.”
“So may Sakka with his ministers and retinue be happy, Pañcasikha,” said the Buddha,
“for all want to be happy—whether gods, humans, demons, dragons, fairies, or any of the other diverse creatures there may be.”
For that is how the Realized Ones salute such illustrious spirits.
And being saluted by the Buddha, Sakka entered the Indasāla cave, bowed to the Buddha, and stood to one side.
And the gods of the Thirty-Three did likewise,
as did Pañcasikha.
And at that time the uneven places were evened out, the cramped places were opened up, the darkness vanished and light appeared, as happens through the glory of the gods.
Then the Buddha said to Sakka,
“It’s incredible and amazing that you, the venerable Kosiya, who has so many duties and so much to do, should come here.”
“For a long time I’ve wanted to come and see the Buddha, but I wasn’t able, being prevented by my many duties and responsibilities for the gods of the Thirty-Three.
This one time, sir, the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the frankincense-tree hut.
Then I went to Sāvatthī to see the Buddha.
But at that time the Buddha was sitting immersed in some kind of meditation. And a divine maiden of Great King Vessavaṇa named Bhūjati was attending on the Buddha, standing there paying homage to him with joined palms.
So I said to her,
‘Sister, please bow to the Buddha for me, saying:
“Sir, Sakka, lord of gods, with his ministers and retinue, bows with his head at your feet.”’
When I said this, she said to me,
‘It’s the wrong time to see the Buddha,
as he’s in retreat.’
‘Well then, sister, please convey my message when the Buddha emerges from that immersion.’
I hope that sister bowed to you?
Do you remember what she said?”
“She did bow, lord of gods, and I remember what she said.
I also remember that it was the sound of your chariot wheels that pulled me out of that immersion.”
“Sir, I have heard and learned this in the presence of the gods who were reborn in the host of the Thirty-Three before me:
‘When a Realized One arises in the world, perfected and fully awakened, the heavenly hosts swell, while the demon hosts dwindle.’
And I have seen this with my own eyes.
The Story of Gopikā
Right here in Kapilavatthu there was a Sakyan lady named Gopikā who had confidence in the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, and had fulfilled her ethics.
Losing her attachment to femininity, she developed masculinity. When her body broke up, after death, she was reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
In the company of the gods of the Thirty-Three she became one of my sons.
There they knew him as
the god Gopaka.
Meanwhile three others, mendicants who had led the spiritual life under the Buddha, were reborn in the inferior fairy realm.
There they amused themselves, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation, and became my servants and attendants.
At that, Gopaka scolded them,
‘Where on earth were you at, good sirs, when you heard the Buddha’s teaching!
For while I was still a woman I had confidence in the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, and had fulfilled my ethics. I lost my attachment to femininity and developed masculinity. When my body broke up, after death, I was reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm. In the company of the gods of the Thirty-Three I became one of Sakka’s sons.
Here they know me as
the god Gopaka.
But you, having led the spiritual life under the Buddha, were reborn in the inferior fairy realm.’
When scolded by Gopaka, two of those gods in that very life gained mindfulness leading to the host of Brahmā’s Ministers. But one god remained attached to sensuality.
‘I was a laywoman disciple of the seer,
and my name was Gopikā.
I was devoted to the Buddha and the teaching,
and I faithfully served the Saṅgha.
Because of the excellence of the Buddha’s teaching,
I’m now a mighty, splendid son of Sakka,
reborn among the Three and Thirty.
And here they know me as Gopaka.
Then I saw some mendicants who I’d seen before,
dwelling in the host of fairies.
When I used to be a human,
they were disciples of Gotama.
I served them with food and drink,
and clasped their feet in my own home.
Where on earth were they at
when they learned the Buddha’s teachings?
For each must know for themselves the teaching
so well-taught, realized by the seer.
I was one who followed you,
having heard the fine words of the noble ones.
I’m now a mighty, splendid son of Sakka,
reborn among the Three and Thirty.
But you followed the best of men,
and led the supreme spiritual life,
but still you’re born in this lesser realm,
a rebirth not befitting.
It’s a sorry sight I see, good sirs,
fellow Buddhists in a lesser realm.
Reborn in the host of fairies,
you only wait upon the gods.
Meanwhile, I dwelt in a house—
but see my distinction now!
Having been a woman now I’m a male god,
blessed with heavenly sensual pleasures.’
Scolded by that disciple of Gotama,
when they understood Gopaka, they were struck with urgency.
‘Let’s strive, let’s try hard—
we won’t serve others any more!’
Two of them aroused energy,
recalling the Buddha’s instructions.
Right away they became dispassionate,
seeing the drawbacks in sensual pleasures.
The fetters and bonds of sensual pleasures—
the ties of the Wicked One so hard to break—
they burst them like a bull elephant his ropes,
and passed right over the Thirty-Three.
The gods with Indra and Pajāpati
were all gathered in the Hall of Justice.
As they sat there, they passed over them,
the heroes desireless, practicing purity.
Seeing them, Vāsava was struck with a sense of urgency;
the master of gods in the midst of the group said,
‘These were born in the lesser fairy realm,
but now they pass us by!’
Heeding the speech of one so moved,
Gopaka addressed Vāsava,
‘There is a Buddha, a lord of men, in the world.
Known as the Sakyan Sage, he’s mastered the senses.
Those sons of his were bereft of mindfulness;
but when scolded by me they gained it back.
Of the three, there is one who remains
dwelling in the host of fairies.
But two, recollecting the path to awakening,
serene, spurn even the gods.’
The teaching’s explained in such a way
that not a single disciple doubts it.
We venerate the Buddha, the victor, lord of men,
who has crossed the flood and cut off doubt.
They attained to distinction fitting
the extent to which they understood the teaching here.
Two of them mastered the distinction of
the host of Brahmā’s Ministers.
We have come here, dear sir,
to realize this same teaching.
If the Buddha would give me a chance,
I would ask a question, dear sir.”
Then the Buddha thought,
“For a long time now this spirit has led a pure life. Any question he asks me will be beneficial, not useless.
And he will quickly understand any answer I give to his question.”
So the Buddha addressed Sakka in verse:
“Ask me your question, Vāsava,
whatever you want.
I’ll solve each and every
problem you have.”
The first recitation section is finished.
Having been granted an opportunity by the Buddha, Sakka asked the first question.
“Dear sir, what fetters bind the gods, humans, demons, dragons, fairies—and any of the other diverse creatures—
so that, though they wish to be free of enmity, violence, hostility, and hate, they still have enmity, violence, hostility, and hate?”
Such was Sakka’s question to the Buddha.
And the Buddha answered him:
“Lord of gods, the fetters of jealousy and stinginess bind the gods, humans, demons, dragons, fairies—and any of the other diverse creatures—
so that, though they wish to be free of enmity, violence, hostility, and hate, they still have enmity, violence, hostility, and hate.”
Such was the Buddha’s answer to Sakka.
Delighted, Sakka approved and agreed with what the Buddha said, saying,
“That’s so true, Blessed One! That’s so true, Holy One!
Hearing the Buddha’s answer, I’ve gone beyond doubt and got rid of indecision.”
And then, having approved and agreed with what the Buddha said, Sakka asked another question:
“But dear sir, what is the source, origin, birthplace, and inception of jealousy and stinginess?
When what exists is there jealousy and stinginess?
When what doesn’t exist is there no jealousy and stinginess?”
“The liked and the disliked, lord of gods, are the source of jealousy and stinginess.
When the liked and the disliked exist there is jealousy and stinginess.
When the liked and the disliked don’t exist there is no jealousy and stinginess.”
“But dear sir, what is the source of what is liked and disliked?”
“Desire is the source of what is liked and disliked.”
“But what is the source of desire?”
“Thought is the source of desire.”
“But what is the source of thought?”
“Concepts of identity that emerge from the proliferation of perceptions are the source of thoughts.”
“But how does a mendicant fittingly practice for the cessation of concepts of identity that emerge from the proliferation of perceptions?”
Meditation on Feelings
“Lord of gods, there are two kinds of happiness, I say:
that which you should cultivate, and that which you should not cultivate.
There are two kinds of sadness, I say:
that which you should cultivate, and that which you should not cultivate.
There are two kinds of equanimity, I say:
that which you should cultivate, and that which you should not cultivate.
Why did I say that there are two kinds of happiness?
Well, should you know of a happiness:
‘When I cultivate this kind of happiness, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.’ You should not cultivate that kind of happiness.
Whereas, should you know of a happiness:
‘When I cultivate this kind of happiness, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.’ You should cultivate that kind of happiness.
And that which is free of placing the mind and keeping it connected is better than that which still involves placing the mind and keeping it connected.
That’s why I said there are two kinds of happiness.
Why did I say that there are two kinds of sadness?
Well, should you know of a sadness:
‘When I cultivate this kind of sadness, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.’ You should not cultivate that kind of sadness.
Whereas, should you know of a sadness:
‘When I cultivate this kind of sadness, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.’ You should cultivate that kind of sadness.
And that which is free of placing the mind and keeping it connected is better than that which still involves placing the mind and keeping it connected.
That’s why I said there are two kinds of sadness.
Why did I say that there are two kinds of equanimity?
Well, should you know of an equanimity:
‘When I cultivate this kind of equanimity, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.’ You should not cultivate that kind of equanimity.
Whereas, should you know of an equanimity:
‘When I cultivate this kind of equanimity, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.’ You should cultivate that kind of equanimity.
And that which is free of placing the mind and keeping it connected is better than that which still involves placing the mind and keeping it connected.
That’s why I said there are two kinds of equanimity.
That’s how a mendicant fittlingly practices for the cessation of concepts of identity that emerge from the proliferation of perceptions.”
Such was the Buddha’s answer to Sakka.
Delighted, Sakka approved and agreed with what the Buddha said, saying,
“That’s so true, Blessed One! That’s so true, Holy One!
Hearing the Buddha’s answer, I’ve gone beyond doubt and got rid of indecision.”
Restraint in the Monastic Code
And then Sakka asked another question:
“But dear sir, how does a mendicant practice for restraint in the monastic code?”
“Lord of gods, I say that there are two kinds of bodily behavior:
that which you should cultivate, and that which you should not cultivate.
I say that there are two kinds of verbal behavior:
that which you should cultivate, and that which you should not cultivate.
There are two kinds of search, I say:
that which you should cultivate, and that which you should not cultivate.
Why did I say that there are two kinds of bodily behavior?
Well, should you know of a bodily conduct:
‘When I cultivate this kind of bodily conduct, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.’ You should not cultivate that kind of bodily conduct.
Whereas, should you know of a bodily conduct:
‘When I cultivate this kind of bodily conduct, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.’ You should cultivate that kind of bodily conduct.
That’s why I said there are two kinds of bodily behavior.
Why did I say that there are two kinds of verbal behavior?
Well, should you know of a kind of verbal behavior that it causes unskillful qualities to grow while skillful qualities decline, you should not cultivate it.
Whereas, should you know of a kind of verbal behavior that it causes unskillful qualities to decline while skillful qualities grow, you should cultivate it.
That’s why I said there are two kinds of verbal behavior.
Why did I say that there are two kinds of search?
Well, should you know of a kind of search that it causes unskillful qualities to grow while skillful qualities decline, you should not cultivate it.
Whereas, should you know of a kind of search that it causes unskillful qualities to decline while skillful qualities grow, you should cultivate it.
That’s why I said there are two kinds of search.
That’s how a mendicant practices for restraint in the monastic code.”
Such was the Buddha’s answer to Sakka.
Delighted, Sakka approved and agreed with what the Buddha said, saying,
“That’s so true, Blessed One! That’s so true, Holy One!
Hearing the Buddha’s answer, I’ve gone beyond doubt and got rid of indecision.”
Sense Restraint
And then Sakka asked another question:
“But dear sir, how does a mendicant practice for restraint of the sense faculties?”
“Lord of gods, I say that there are two kinds of sight known by the eye:
that which you should cultivate, and that which you should not cultivate.
There are two kinds of sound known by the ear …
smells known by the nose …
tastes known by the tongue …
touches known by the body …
thoughts known by the mind:
that which you should cultivate, and that which you should not cultivate.”
When the Buddha said this, Sakka said to him:
“Sir, this is how I understand the detailed meaning of the Buddha’s brief statement:
You should not cultivate the kind of sight known by the eye which causes unskillful qualities to grow while skillful qualities decline.
And you should cultivate the kind of sight known by the eye which causes unskillful qualities to decline while skillful qualities grow.
You should not cultivate the kind of sound,
or thought known by the mind which causes unskillful qualities to grow while skillful qualities decline.
And you should cultivate the kind of thought known by the mind which causes unskillful qualities to decline while skillful qualities grow.
Sir, that’s how I understand the detailed meaning of the Buddha’s brief statement.
Hearing the Buddha’s answer, I’ve gone beyond doubt and got rid of indecision.”
And then Sakka asked another question:
“Dear sir, do all ascetics and brahmins have the same doctrine, ethics, desires, and attachments?”
“No, lord of gods, they do not.”
“Why not?”
“The world has many and diverse elements.
Whatever element sentient beings insist on in this world of many and diverse elements, they obstinately stick to it, insisting that:
‘This is the only truth, other ideas are silly.’
That’s why not all ascetics and brahmins have the same doctrine, ethics, desires, and attachments.”
“Dear sir, have all ascetics and brahmins reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal?”
“No, lord of gods, they have not.”
“Why not?”
“Those mendicants who are freed through the ending of craving have reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal.
That’s why not all ascetics and brahmins have reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal.”
Such was the Buddha’s answer to Sakka.
Delighted, Sakka approved and agreed with what the Buddha said, saying,
“That’s so true, Blessed One! That’s so true, Holy One!
Hearing the Buddha’s answer, I’ve gone beyond doubt and got rid of indecision.”
And then Sakka asked another question:
“Passion, sir, is a disease, an abscess, a dart. Passion drags a person to be reborn in life after life.
That’s why a person finds themselves in states high and low.
Elsewhere, among other ascetics and brahmins, I wasn’t even given a chance to ask these questions that the Buddha has answered.
The dart of doubt and uncertainty has lain within me for a long time, but the Buddha has plucked it out.”
“Lord of gods, do you recall having asked this question of other ascetics and brahmins?”
“I do, sir.”
“If you wouldn’t mind, lord of gods, tell me how they answered.”
“It’s no trouble when someone such as the Blessed One is sitting here.”
“Well, speak then, lord of gods.”
“Sir, I approached those who I imagined were ascetics and brahmins living in the wilderness, in remote lodgings. But they could not answer, and they even questioned me in return:
‘What is the venerable’s name?’
So I answered them:
‘Dear sir, I am Sakka, lord of gods.’
So they asked me another question:
‘But lord of gods, what deed brought you to this position?’
So I taught them the Dhamma as I had learned and memorized it.
And they were pleased with just that much:
‘We have seen Sakka, lord of gods! And he answered our questions!’
Invariably, they become my disciples, I don’t become theirs.
But sir, I am the Buddha’s disciple, a stream-enterer, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.”
On Feeling Happy
“Lord of gods, do you recall ever feeling such joy and happiness before?”
“I do, sir.”
“But how?”
“Once upon a time, sir, a battle was fought between the gods and the demons.
In that battle the gods won and the demons lost.
It occurred to me as victor,
‘Now the gods shall enjoy both the nectar of the gods and the nectar of the demons.’
But sir, that joy and happiness is in the sphere of the rod and the sword. It doesn’t lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
But the joy and happiness I feel listening to the Buddha’s teaching is not in the sphere of the rod and the sword. It does lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.”
“But lord of gods, what reason do you see for speaking of such joy and happiness?”
“I see six reasons to speak of such joy and happiness, sir.
While staying right here,
remaining in the godly form,
I have gained an extended life:
know this, dear sir.
This is the first reason.
When I fall from the heavenly host,
leaving behind the non-human life,
I shall consciously go to a new womb,
wherever my mind delights.
This is the second reason.
Living happily under the guidance
of the one of unclouded wisdom,
I shall practice according to method,
aware and mindful.
This is the third reason.
And if awakening should arise
as I practice according to the method,
I shall live as one who understands,
and my end shall come right there.
This is the fourth reason.
When I fall from the human realm,
leaving behind the human life,
I shall become a god again,
in the supreme heaven realm.
This is the fifth reason.
They are the finest of gods,
the glorious Akaniṭṭhas.
So long as my final life goes on,
there my home will be.
This is the sixth reason.
Seeing these six reasons I speak of such joy and happiness.
My wishes unfulfilled,
doubting and undecided,
I wandered for such a long time,
in search of the Realized One.
I imagined that ascetics
living in seclusion
must surely be awakened,
so I went to sit near them.
‘How is there success?
How is there failure?’
But they couldn’t answer such questions
about the path and practice.
And when they found out that I
was Sakka, come from the gods,
they questioned me instead about
the deed that brought me to this state.
I taught them the Dhamma
as I had learned it among men.
They were delighted with that, saying:
‘We’ve seen Vāsava!’
Now since I’ve seen the Buddha,
who helps us overcome doubt,
today, free of fear,
I pay homage to the awakened one.
Destroyer of the dart of craving,
the Buddha is unrivaled.
I bow to the great hero,
the Buddha, Kinsman of the Sun.
Just as Brahmā is worshipped
by the gods, dear sir,
today we shall worship you—
come, let us bow to you!
You alone are the Awakened!
You are the Teacher supreme!
In the world with its gods,
there is no-one like you.”
Then Sakka addressed the fairy Pañcasikha,
“Dear Pañcasikha, you were very helpful to me, since you first charmed the Buddha,
after which I went to see him.
I shall appoint you to your father’s position—you shall be king of the fairies. And I give you Bhaddā Suriyavaccasā, who you love so much.”
Then Sakka, touching the ground with his hand, expressed this heartfelt sentiment three times:
“Homage to that Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha!
Homage to that Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha!
Homage to that Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha!”
And while this discourse was being spoken, the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose in Sakka, lord of gods:
“Everything that has a beginning has an end.”
And also for another 80,000 deities.
Such were the questions Sakka was invited to ask, and which were answered by the Buddha.
And that’s why the name of this discussion is “Sakka’s Questions”.
At one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Vesālī,
in the Great Wood, at the Gabled Hall.
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī approached the Fortunate One,
and after approaching and worshipping the Fortunate One, she stood on one side.
While standing on one side Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī said this to the Fortunate One:
“It is good for me, reverend Sir, let the Fortunate One teach the Dhamma in brief,
having heard that Dhamma from the Fortunate One,
I can dwell secluded, heedful, ardent, and resolute.
“Gotamī, of those things which you can know:
‘These things lead to passion, not to dispassion,
lead to being fettered, not to being unfettered,
lead to increase, not to decrease,
lead to great desire, not to little desire,
lead to discontent, not to content,
lead to association, not to solitude,
lead to indolence, not to being energetic,
lead to difficulty in support, not to ease in support,’
‘To difficulty’ means it goes towards difficulty in support.
‘Not to ease’ means it goes towards ease in support.
In this discourse the first time the round (of continuation) is spoken about,
the second time the unfolding (of continuation) is spoken about.
Gotamī, you should surely bear it in mind:
‘This is not Dhamma, this is not Vinaya, this is not the Teacher’s Dispensation.’
Gotamī, of those things which you can know:
‘These things lead to dispassion, not to passion,
lead to being unfettered, not to being fettered,
lead to decrease, not to increase,
lead to little desire, not to great desire,
lead to content, not to discontent,
lead to solitude, not to association,
lead to being energetic, not to indolence,
lead to ease in support, not to difficulty in support,’
Gotamī, you should surely bear it in mind:
‘This is Dhamma, this is Vinaya, this is the Teacher’s Dispensation.’ ”
Translation
At one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Vesālī,
in the Great Wood, at the Gabled Hall.
Then venerable Ānanda approached the Fortunate One,
and after approaching and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sitting on one side venerable Ānanda said this to the Fortunate One:
“With how many qualities, reverend Sir, should a monk
who is authorised as an advisor to nuns be endowed?”
“A monk endowed with eight qualities, Ānanda,
should be authorised as an advisor to nuns,
Which eight?
Here, Ānanda, a monk is virtuous,
he lives restrained with the Pātimokkha restraint, and is endowed with (suitable) conduct and resort,
seeing danger in the slightest faults,
he trains in the training rules he has undertaken.
He is learned, one who bears (in mind) what he has heard, one who collects what he has heard,
‘In the second (discourse), he is learned,’
here it is to be understood: he is learned regarding the whole of the Buddha’s teaching.
and those Dhamma teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, good in the end,
with their meaning, with their (proper) phrasing,
the spiritual life which is complete, fullfilled and very pure, (that) he declares,
and in things such as these he is learned, one who upholds them,
one who has collected the words, considered in his mind,  and penetrated (them) with (right) view.
Both Pātimokkhas
well-classified, well-recited, well-discerned in regard to the rule and the details.
He is a beautiful speaker, a beautiful recitor,
he is endowed with good speech, that is distinct, clear, that instructs in the meaning.
He is able to talk in conformity with Dhamma to the Community of nuns,
to instruct, rouse, enthuse, and cheer (them).
He is dear and pleasing to almost all the nuns.
° In regard to one who has gone forth under the Fortunate One, who dwells wearing the ochre robe,
he is not guilty of a serious offence.
‘Serious offence’ means bodily contact.
This is in brief.
But the decisions on the advice to nuns should be understood as it is said in (the Commentary) Pleasing on all Sides.
He has either twenty Rains Retreats or more than twenty Rains Retreats.
A monk endowed with these eight qualities, Ānanda,
should be authorised as an advisor to nuns.”
Translation
Translation
At one time the Fortunate One was dwelling amongst the Sakiyans, near to Kapilavatthu, in Nigrodha’s Monastery.
In the first (discourse) of the sixth (chapter), ‘Was dwelling amongst the Sakiyans’ means
was dwelling, after going (there) on the first journey.
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī approached the Fortunate One,
‘Mahāpajāpatī’ means (hoping she would be) having many male and female progeny, this was the name that was given.
‘Approached the Fortunate One’ means the Fortunate One, having gone to Kapila’s city,
first of all gave the going forth to Nanda,
In the dispute about the head-roll,
and the Teacher went (there), convinced those Kings, and taught the Discourse on Taking up a Stick.
The Kings were pleased and each gave two hundred and fifty princes,
and those five hundred princes went forth in the presence of the Teacher.
Then their wives sent them messages and that made discontent arise (in their husbands).
The Teacher, knowing a state of discontent had arisen,
led those five hundred young monks to the Kuṇāla Lake,
having sat on the stone slab, where formerly he himself had sat at the time of the cuckoo (story),
and having driven out their discontent with the Kuṇāla Birth Story,
he established them all in the fruit of Stream-Entry,
and after bringing them to the Great Wood, in the fruit of Liberation.
In order to know their minds their wives again sent messages,
and they sent a reply back, saying: “It is impossible for us to dwell in the home.”
(The wives) said: “Now it is not suitable (for us) to go (back) to our homes.
Having gone into the presence of Mahāpajāpatī,
and having received allowance for the going forth, we will go forth.”
The five hundred (wives) approached Mahāpajāpatī,
and said: “Noble Lady, you should get the allowance for us to go forth.”
Having taken those women, Mahāpajāpatī approached the Fortunate One.
They say: after the King (Suddhodana) had attained Complete Emancipation under the white umbrella
and after approaching and worshipping the Fortunate One, she stood on one side.
While standing on one side Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī said this to the Fortunate One:
“It is good, reverend Sir, if women could receive, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
“Enough, Gotamī!
Please do not wish for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
‘Enough, Gotamī! Please do not wish,’ is said.
Why did he refuse?
Do not all the Buddhas have four assemblies?
Certainly they do.
But he allowed the going forth (only) after making many requests,
and it was received with (much) trouble.
He thought: ‘(Later) they will guard it well,’ and have respect, and wishing to grant the allowance (later), he refused (at this time).
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
For a second time Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī said this to the Fortunate One:
“It is good, reverend Sir, if women could receive, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
“Enough, Gotamī!
Please do not wish for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
For a third time Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī said this to the Fortunate One:
“It is good, reverend Sir, if women could receive, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
“Enough, Gotamī!
Please do not wish for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī,
thinking: ‘The Fortunate One does not allow for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life,’
pained and depressed, crying, with tears on her face,
having worshipped and circumambulated the Fortunate One, went away.
‘Went away’ means she entered Kapila’s city again.
Then the Fortunate One, having dwelt in Kapilavatthu for as long as he liked,
‘Dwelt for as long as he liked’ means
looking around at those beings that have the right conditions for being led to Awakening, he dwelt for as long as he had the intention to.
went on walking tour towards Vesālī,
‘Went on walking tour’ means favouring the populace
he went on an unhurried walking tour, with his supreme Buddha glory and his matchless Buddha beauty (shining forth).
and while walking gradually on walking tour he arrived at Vesālī.
There the Fortunate One dwelt near Vesālī,
in the Great Wood, at the Gabled Hall.
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī,
after having her hair cut off, and donning ochre clothes,
together with a great many Sakiyan ladies, went towards Vesālī,
‘Together with a great many Sakiyan ladies’ means
having taken the appearance of one gone forth in the inner chambers based on that (worn by the) One of Ten Powers,
and having the five hundred Sakiyan ladies (also) take the appearance of those gone forth,
together with a great many Sakiyan ladies, (she went towards Vesālī).
‘Went on walking tour’ means she left on her journey.
But at the time of leaving on the journey
thinking: ‘Those delicate princesses will not be able to go by foot,’
the Sakiyan and Koliyan kings arranged golden palanquins,
thinking: ‘Having mounted the vehicles they will go,’
(But the women thought): ‘That is disrespectful to the Teacher,’
and they followed the path on foot for fifty-one leagues.
The Kings, after arranging protection at the front and the rear,
and filling carts with the finest rice, ghee, oil and so forth,
sent men, saying: “Whatever place they go to, prepare the food.”
and gradually approached the Great Wood, and the Gabled Hall at Vesālī.
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī, with swollen feet, and dust on her limbs,
‘With swollen feet’ means
for those with delicate feet: some had blisters arise, some had split open.
Both feet having become as though covered all round with the clearing nut seed,
Therefore it was said: ‘With swollen feet.’
pained and depressed, crying, with tears on her face, stood outside the doorway.
Venerable Ānanda saw Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī,
‘Outside the doorway’ means outside the doorway.
But why stand there?
This occurred to her:
‘Without the permission of the Realised One, I took the appearance of one gone forth,
but the fact that (the appearance) was taken by me has become famous throughout the whole of the Rose-Apple Isle.
If the Teacher allows the going forth, that is good,
but if he does not allow, there will be great reproach (for me),’
and being unable to enter the monastery she stood there crying.
And after seeing (her), he said this to Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī:
“Why are you, Gotamī, with swollen feet, and dust on your limbs,
‘Why are you, Gotamī?’ means (he was asking):
has any misfortune arisen in the families of Kings,
(or) for what reason are you, having become weakened like this,
with swollen feet, standing (there)?
pained and depressed, crying, with tears on your face, standing outside the doorway?”
“Because, venerable Ānanda, the Fortunate One does not allow
for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
Then venerable Ānanda approached the Fortunate One,
and after approaching and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sitting on one side venerable Ānanda said this to the Fortunate One:
“This Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī, reverend Sir, with swollen feet, and dust on her limbs,
pained and depressed, crying, with tears on her face, is standing outside the doorway,
thinking: ‘The Fortunate One does not allow for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
“Enough, Ānanda!
Please do not wish for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
For a second time venerable Ānanda said this to the Fortunate One:
“It is good, reverend Sir, if women could receive, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
“Enough, Ānanda!
Please do not wish for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
For a third time venerable Ānanda said this to the Fortunate One:
“It is good, reverend Sir, if women could receive, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
“Enough, Ānanda!
Please do not wish for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
Then it occurred to venerable Ānanda:
‘The Fortunate One does not allow for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
‘In a different way’ means with a different reason.
for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life?’
Then venerable Ānanda said this to the Fortunate One:
“Is it possible, reverend Sir, for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
having gone forth from the home to the homeless life,
° to directly experience the fruit of Stream Entry, or the fruit of Once-Returning,
or the fruit of Non-Returning, or the fruit of Liberation?”
“It is possible, Ānanda, that women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
having gone forth from the home to the homeless life,
° to directly experience the fruit of Stream Entry, and the fruit of Once-Returning,
and the fruit of Non-Returning, and the fruit of Liberation.”
“If it is possible, reverend Sir, for women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
having gone forth from the home to the homeless life,
° to directly experience the fruit of Stream Entry, and the fruit of Once-Returning,
and the fruit of Non-Returning, and the fruit of Liberation,
and Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī was a great help, reverend Sir,
‘A great help, reverend Sir,’ and so forth,
after speaking about her virtue, again he spoke requesting the going forth.
she is the Fortunate One’s maternal aunt, his wet-nurse, who looked after him and gave him milk,
and after the Fortunate One’s Mother had died, she gave him suck at the breast.
It would be good, reverend Sir, if women could receive, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
the going forth from the home to the homeless life.”
“If, Ānanda, Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī accepts these eight serious rules,
this will be the higher ordination for her:
The Teacher also thought: ‘Women are known to have little wisdom,
by gaining permission for the going forth through one request only,
they will not accept my Dispensation with respect,’
now, after being refused three times, they have respect, and have a (deep) desire to take (ordination, and so),
‘If, Ānanda, Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī accepts these eight serious rules,
this will be the higher ordination for her,’ and so forth was said.
Herein ‘Sā vassā’ is parsed as sā eva assā,
A nun having a hundred years (seniority), in regard to a monk ordained that day,
‘In regard to a monk ordained that day’ means to one ordained on that day.
should worship, rise from the seat, salute and pay homage.
‘Should worship, rise from the seat, salute and pay homage’ means
after putting aside conceit, worshipping with the prostration touching in five places,
rising from the sitting place, rising from the seat in order to go and greet (the monk),
having placed the ten fingernails together, saluting,
and everything agreed upon as duties that are suitable, such as preparing the seat, fan and so on,
(in this way) she should pay homage.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
A nun should not enter the Rains Retreat in a dwelling place without monks.
‘A dwelling place without monks’ means
wherever (nuns) are dwelling must be without danger,
(but if) after approaching that place in order to get advice, (it is found) there is no teacher (monk) to give the advice,
this is called a dwelling place without monks.
In such a dwelling place they should not undertake the Rains Retreat.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
Every fortnight the nuns are to expect two things from the Community of monks:
‘Every fortnight’ means every Observance day.
asking about the Observance day, and approaching (the monks) for (getting) advice.
‘Approaching (the monks) for (getting) advice’ means approaching (the monks) in order to (get) advice.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
A nun emerging from the Rains Retreat should invite both Communities in regard to three reasons:
with what was seen, or what was heard or what was suspected.
‘With what was seen’ means with what was seen by the eye.
‘What was heard’ means what was heard by the ear.
‘What was suspected’ means what was suspected on account of seeing or hearing.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
A nun who is guilty of a serious offence
‘Serious offence’ means a serious offence entailing the Community at the beginning and for the rest (of the procedure).
should observe reparation for a fortnight before both Communities.
‘Reparation for a fortnight’ means reparation for not less that fifteen days.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
(Only) a trainee who has trained in the six training rules for two years
‘In six rules‘ means in the training rules including the sixth one of the wrong time for food.
‘Trained in’ means not having broken even one training rule the training is fulfilled.
should seek for higher ordination before both Communities.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
A nun should not abuse or censure a monk by any means.
‘Should not abuse or censure’ means
should not abuse with any of the ten types of abuse
should not censure with any kind of censure which brings on fear.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
From today forward nuns are prohibited from speaking (advice) to monks,
‘Nuns are prohibited from speaking (advice) to monks’ means
(anything) reckoned as advice, instruction or talk about ethics,
the nuns are barred and prevented from speaking to monks,
or, no nun should advise or instruct any monk,
saying: “Reverend Sir, former Elders fulfilled the robe duties thus,”
even though it is suitable to speak regarding tradition.
(but) monks are not prohibited from speaking (advice) to nuns.
‘Monks are not prohibited from speaking (advice) to nuns’ means
monks are not barred from speaking to nuns
and to advise, instruct and talk on ethics (to them) as they wish.
This here is in brief, but the detailed, serious talk about ethics,
should be understood as in the method explained in the Commentary on the Discipline, Pleasing on all Sides.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
If, Ānanda, Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī accepts these eight serious rules,
that will be her higher ordination.”
Then venerable Ānanda, having learned these eight serious rules in the presence of the Fortunate One,
approached Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī,
and after approaching he said this to Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī:
“If you, Gotamī, could accept these eight serious rules,
this will be for you your higher ordination:
A nun having a hundred years (seniority), in regard to a monk ordained that day,
should worship, rise from the seat, salute and pay homage.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
A nun should not enter the Rains Retreat in a dwelling place without monks.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
Every fortnight the nuns are to expect two things from the Community of monks:
asking about the Observance day, and approaching for (giving) advice.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
A nun emerging from the Rains Retreat should invite both Communities in regard to three reasons:
with what was seen, or what was heard or what was suspected.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
A nun who is guilty of a serious offence
should observe reparation for a fortnight before both Communities.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
(Only) a trainee who has trained in the six training rules for two years
should seek for higher ordination before both Communities.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
A nun should not abuse or censure a monk by any means.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
From today forward nuns are prohibited from speaking (advice) to monks,
(but) monks are not prohibited from speaking (advice) to nuns.
This is a rule that should be respected, treated seriously, be honoured, worshipped,
and should not be transgressed for as long as her life lasts.
If you, Gotamī, could accept these eight serious rules,
that will be for you your higher ordination.”
Having learned these eight serious rules in the Teacher’s presence,
having heard for herself the Elder (Ānanda)’s announcement,
Mahāpajāpatī in a moment was eased of her great sorrow,
and it was like being sprinkled on the head with a hundred pots of cool water brought from lake Anotatta,
and being free from fever, she was delighted,
and explaining the joy and gladness that had arisen because of the acceptance of these serious rules
she uttered this exalted utterance: ‘It is as though,’ and so on.
“It is as though, venerable Ānanda,
a woman or a man, young, youthful, having ornaments, with head washed,
had been given a garland of waterlilies, or a garland of jasmine, or a garland of whirlybird flowers,
and having accepted it with both hands, were to place it on top of the most important limb, on the head,
just so, venerable Ānanda,
I accept these eight serious rules which should not be transgressed for as long as life lasts.”
Then venerable Ānanda approached the Fortunate One,
and after approaching and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sitting on one side venerable Ānanda said this to the Fortunate One:
“Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī, reverend Sir, has accepted
the eight serious rules which should not be transgressed for as long as life lasts.”
“If, Ānanda, women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One, had not obtained
the going forth from the home to the homeless life,
Ānanda, the spiritual life would have been long-lasting,
the Good Dhamma would have endured for a thousand years.
But because, Ānanda, women, in this Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
have gone forth from the home to the homeless life,
now, Ānanda, the spiritual life will not be long-lasting,
the Good Dhamma, Ānanda, will now endure for (only) five hundred years.
Just as, Ānanda, those families having lots of women and few men,
are easily plundered by thieves and night-time robbers,
‘By night-time robbers’ means having lit lights in a pot,
and discerned valuables in another’s house by their light, (they are plundered) by burglars and thieves.
just so, Ānanda, wherever in this Dhamma and Disciple women receive
the going forth from the home to the homeless life,
the spiritual life will not be long-lasting.
Just as, Ānanda, in ripe rice fields
which go down with the disease called Deadheart,
‘The disease called Deadheart’ means
some worms pierce the stem and enter the middle of the stalk.
At the place where it departs from the pierced stem
the sap is not able to get to the rice head.
that rice field is not long-lasting,
just so, Ānanda, wherever in this Dhamma and Disciple women receive
the going forth from the home to the homeless life,
the spiritual life will not be long-lasting.
Just as, Ānanda, in ripe sugar-cane fields
which go down with the disease called Red Rot,
‘The disease called Red Rot’ means being reddened on the inside of the sugar cane.
that sugar-cane field is not long-lasting,
just so, Ānanda, wherever in this Dhamma and Disciple women receive
the going forth from the home to the homeless life,
the spiritual life will not be long-lasting.
Just as, Ānanda, a man might prepare an embankment as a precaution round a large lake
so that the water does not overflow,
just so, Ānanda,
the eight serious rules were laid down by me as a precaution
which should not be transgressed for as long as life lasts.”
‘An embankment as a precaution round a large lake,’
this is the meaning that is shown in this:
just as with a large tank that has no embankment,
whatever water could have stayed there had there been a embankment at the beginning,
cannot stay there, cannot remain, because there is no embankment,
in the same way, although these grounds (for offense) have not arisen,
the precaution is (taken that) the serious rules that are not to be transgressed are laid down,
because if for women these (rules) about going forth were not laid down,
the Good Dhamma can endure (only) for five hundred years.
But with the precaution regarding the going forth being laid down they will endure for another five hundred years.
Thus at first it was said it will endure for one thousand years.
‘One thousand years,’
this was said in regard to those who have attained destruction of the pollutants together with the analytic knowledges,
but a further thousand years beyond that for those who have attained destruction of the pollutants through dry insight,
a thousand years in regard to those who are Non-Returners,
a thousand years in regard to those who are Once-Returners,
a thousand years in regard to those who are Stream Enterers,
thus the Good Dhamma of penetration (to Awakening) will endure for five thousand years (in all).
Then there will be only the Dhamma of learning.
For there being no learning, there will be no penetration,
but there being learning there will (also) be penetration.
But the signs of the disappearance of learning will last for a long time.
Translation
Translation
in the evening time, while sitting in the Dhamma Hall,
this conversion arose:
“Indeed, the Buddhas are very powerful!
Indeed gods and men have faith in the Teacher!
Both on this side and the other side of the Ganges along a pathway for eight leagues,
because of gaining faith in the Buddha,
after the ground was made smooth by the Kings,
sand was scattered, and various coloured flowers were strewn about knee-deep,
through the power of the Nāgas the waters of the Ganges were covered with lotuses of five colours,
as far as the dwelling place of the Highest of the High Divinities
the inside of the whole universe became like one great ornament and festival.”
After the Teacher came and asked: “What is the talk about, monks, amongst those who have assembled together at present?”
They said: “It is just so.”
“Monks, this worship and respect didn’t arise through the power of my being an Buddha,
nor through the powers of the Nāgas, Gods and High Divinities.
It arose through the power of trifling donations (I made) in the past.”
After hearing that, he was begged by the monks to show them the past.
In the past, in Takkasilā, there was a brāhmaṇa called Saṅkha.
His son, a sixteen year old student called Susīma,
after approaching his Father one day said:
“After going to Bārāṇasī, Dear, I wish to learn the scriptures.”
Then his Father said to him:
“Alright, Dear, a brāhmaṇa called so-and-so is my friend,
after going into his presence, you could learn (them).”
After agreeing by saying: “Good!” he gradually went to Bārāṇasī,
and after approaching the brāhmaṇa he explained he had been sent by his Father.
Then after accepting him, saying: “He is my friend’s son,”
and relieving his anxiety,
on an auspicious day, he began to recite the scriptures.
Quickly learning (it) and learning a great deal he retained it (all) himself,
just like precious oil
in no long time he learned (it) from his teacher’s lips,
and having learned all, he became skilled in making recitation of the teaching,
and he could understand the beginning and middle of (it), but not the end.
After approaching his teacher, he said:
“I see the beginning and the middle of this teaching, but not the end.”
Having heard (that), the teacher said: “I also do not see (it), Dear.”
When this was said, he said: “Then who knows the end, teacher?”
After being asked, he said: “There are seers living in Isipatana,
after approaching you could ask them.”
When this was said by the teacher, after approaching the Paccekabuddhas, he asked:
“Do you know the end (of the teaching)?”
“Yes, we know.”
“Will you teach it to me?”
“We will not teach one who has not gone-forth,
if you want (to know) the meaning of the end, you should go forth.”
After replying: “Good!” he went forth in their presence.
They said to him: “You should learn this,”
and saying: “You should dress thus, and you should cover yourself thus,” and so on,
they methodically taught him good conduct.
Training right there, and having the supporting conditions,
in no long time, after attaining the Pacceka Awakening,
throughout the whole of the city of Bārāṇasī, like a full-moon in the sky,
he attained the highest gains and the highest fame.
As the deeds he had performed (in past lives) led only to a short lifespan,
in no long time he was Finally Emancipated.
Then the Paccekabuddhas and the populace, after performing the funeral ceremonies,
and gathering the relics, had a Shrine built at the gate to the city.
The brāhmaṇa Saṅkha, thinking: ‘My son has been gone a long time, I would (like to) know what happened,’
and desiring to see him, after leaving from Takkasilā,
gradually reaching Bārāṇasī,
and seeing the populace gathered round,
thinking: ‘Surely one of these will know what happened to my son,’
after approaching, asked:
“A student called Susīma came here,
does anyone know what happened to him?”
“Yes, brāhmaṇa, we know:
after learning the Three Vedas from a certain brāhmaṇa, and going-forth
and attaining Independent Awakening, he was Finally Emancipated,
and this is the Shrine we established.”
After beating the ground with his hand, crying and weeping,
going to the courtyard of the Shrine and removing the grass,
carrying sand in his outer robe, and sprinkling it in the courtyard of the Shrine,
and sprinkling water all round from his water pitcher,
worshipping with wild flowers,
erecting his robe as a flag,
and binding his own parasol over the Shrine, he departed.
The Teacher, after showing them the past, said:
“Then, monks, I was the brāhmaṇa Saṅkha.
I removed the grass in the courtyard of the Paccekabuddha Susīma’s Shrine.
Because of that deed of mine
after clearing the road for eight leagues around of thorns and stumps,
the (Kings) made the ground clean and even.
I sprinkled sand there.
Because of that (deed) of mine
sand was sprinkled on the road for eight leagues.
I worshiped there with wild flowers.
Because of that (deed) of mine
various coloured flowers were sprinkled round the road for eight leagues,
and five-coloured lotuses covered the top of the waters of the Ganges for one league.
I sprinkled the ground all round with water from my water pitcher.
Because of that (deed) of mine
it rained flowers down on Vesālī.
There I erected my robe, and bound the parasol.
Because of that (deed) of mine
as far as the dwelling place of the Highest of the High Divinities there were flags, robes and parasols upon parasols and so on raised on high,
and the inside of the whole universe became like one great ornament and festival.
Thus, monks, this worship and honour
did not arise for me because of the power of being an Buddha,
nor through the powers of the Nāgas, Gods and High Divinities,
but because of the power of trifling donations (I made) in the past.”
After saying that, teaching the Dhamma he recited this verse:
there was a river named the Rohiṇī.
Having bound the river in with a dike
Then in the month of Jeṭṭha,
the workers from both cities assembled together.
There those who dwelt in Koliya city said:
“This water is not enough for both you and us to carry away,
(but) our crops will mature with a single watering,
(therefore) give us this water.”
Those who dwelt in Kapilavatthu city said:
“After you have filled your stores,
taken our red gold, blue jewels and black coins,
we will not be able, with hand-baskets and sacks in our hands, to wander to the doors of your houses,
(but) our crops will mature with a single watering,
(therefore) give us this water.”
“We will not give!”
“We will not give either!”
After the quarrel had grown one of them rose up and gave another a blow,
and he to another, thus after striking one another,
and offending against the birth of the Kingly families, the quarrel grew,
and the Koliyan workers said:
“Having siezed you people of Kapilavatthu, sons of the Sākiyans, you can roar away!
Like dogs and jackals and others you have cohabited with your own sisters!
What will they do to us with their elephants and horses, their shields and swords, and so on?”
The Sākiyan workers also said:
“Now having siezed you sons of lepers, you can roar away!
Like helpless and miserable animals they dwelt in Jujube trees!
What will they do to us with their elephants and horses, their shields and swords, and so on?”
Having left that place they related all that was done to the appointed councillors,
and they related it to the ministers of the Kingly clan.
Then the Sākiyans said: “We will show them the power and strength of those who cohabited with their sisters!”
and that day they went out to fight.
The Koliyans also (said): “We will show them the power and strength of those who dwell in Jujube trees!”
and that day they went out to fight.
Other teachers (say): “Slaves of the Sākiyans and Koliyans, after going to the river for water,
and placing their head-rolls
sat around having a pleasant conversation.
One of them took another’s head-roll, thinking it her own,
and because of this, saying: (This is) my head-roll, this is your head-roll,
gradually a quarrel broke out between the slave-workers who dwelt in both cities,
and also between the servants, headmen, ministers and princes,
and that day they all went out to fight.”
But the former explanation has come down in many of the ancient Commentaries,
and it is considered suitable to uphold it.
And so that day in the evening time they will go out to fight.
Then at that time the Fortunate One was living near Sāvatthī,
and towards the time of dawn he was looking around the world
and saw these (groups) going out to battle that day.
Having seen (it), considering: “With my going (there) will this quarrel be pacified or will it not?”
(he knew): “Having gone there for the purpose of pacifying the quarrel, I will relate three Stories
and the quarrel will be pacified through that.
Then, for the purpose of illustrating (the benefits) of concord, after relating two Stories I will teach the Discourse on Taking up a Stick.
(Then) having heard that teaching, those people who dwell in both cities
will give two-hundred and fifty young men each,
I will make them go forth, and there will be a Great Assembly,” at the conclusion.
Then, after taking care of his body in the morning,
and entering Sāvatthī for alms, he returned after the alms round.
In the evening time, after leaving the Perfumed Cottage without having told anyone,
taking his robe and bowl,
in the sky between the two armies, after folding his legs crosswise,
to make it dark during the day, for the purpose of giving them spiritual anxiety,
he sat there emitting rays from his (dark-coloured) hair.
Then seeing their minds were anxious
he emitted the six-coloured Buddha rays.
Having seen the Fortunate One those who resided at Kapilavatthu,
° after thinking: “The Teacher, our foremost relative has come,
has he seen the reason for our dispute?”
(understood): “It is not possible, now the Teacher has come
to attack the bodies of others with spears,
let the people dwelling in Koliya kill or capture us!” and they threw aside their weapons.
The people dwelling in Koliya also did the same.
Then the Fortunate One, having descended (from the sky) in that delightful place,
sat down on the appointed noble Buddha seat in a sandy bed,
with his unmatched Buddha-glory shining.
Those Kings, having worshipped the Fortunate One, sat down.
Then the Teacher, knowingly, asked: “Why have you come, Great Kings?”
“Not for seeing the river, venerable Sir, not for play,
but having got ready for battle in this place, we have come.”
“This dispute is on account of what, Great Kings?”
“On account of water, venerable Sir.”
“What is water worth, Great Kings?”
“(It has) little worth, venerable Sir.”
“And what is earth worth, Great Kings?”
“(It is) priceless, venerable Sir.”
“What are Nobles worth, Great Kings?”
“Nobles are (also) priceless, venerable Sir.”
“Why would you destroy Nobles, Great Kings?
There is certainly no satisfaction in this quarrel.
Because of a quarrel, Great Kings,
a certain tree god and a black lion
were bound by anger reaching through the whole aeon,”
and having said (that), he related the Phandana Tree Story.
After that (he said): “There should certainly not be, Great Kings, this relying on (the word of) another.
Having relied on another, through the tale of one hare,
a (great) crowd of four-footed (animals) stretching three thousand leagues
have jumped into the great ocean,
therefore one shouldn’t rely on (the word of) another,”
and having said (that), he related the Thud Story.
After that (he said): “Sometimes the one who is weak, Great Kings,
sees the strong one’s fault;
sometimes the strong one sees the weak one’s fault,
therefore a quail bird once slaughtered a Nāga elephant,”
and having said (that), he related the Quail Story.
Thus having related three Stories to pacify the quarrel,
to illustrate (the value of) concord he related two Stories.
“There is no one able to find fault in concord, Great Kings,”
and having said (that), he related the Righteous Tree Story.
After that (he said): “Nobody was able, Great Kings, to find an opening when there was concord.
But when a dispute had arisen amongst one another,
then one hunter’s son, having destroyed their lives, took them away.
There is certainly no satisfaction in disputes,”
and having said (that), he related the Quail Story.
Thus having related these five Stories,
at the end he related the Discourse on Taking up a Stick.
Then the Kings, being pleased, (said): “If the Teacher had not come,
having slaughtered each other, we would have set flowing a river of blood,
because of the Teacher we have received (back) our lives!
If the Teacher had lived in the house,
the four great island kingdoms, surrounded by the two-thousand islands would have gone into his hand,
and he would have had more than a thousand children,
and would have gone about with a retinue of Nobles.
But after giving up his fortune and going forth, he attained Complete Awakening.
Now he should go around with a retinue of Nobles also!”
and those who dwelt in the two cities gave two-hundred and fifty young men each,
and the Fortunate One, having given them the going-forth, returned to the Great Wood.
Now while the Teacher was living in Jeta’s Wood
he told this about the seductions of a former wife.
In relating (the story), after asking the monk what was the cause of his dissatisfaction,
he said: (It is) because of my former wife.
“Monk, this one has been unbeneficial to you in the past also,
and having lost the absorptions because (of her),
you came to a great calamity,” and after saying (this) he spoke about
In the past, when King Brahmadatta was ruling in Benares,
the Awakening One, after being born in a noble and wealthy brahmin family, came of age and learned a craft.
(Then) after going-forth in the Seer’s ordination and attaining the absorptions and deep knowledges,
he made his dwelling in the area of the Himālayas.
Then one deer, at the place where he was urinating,
having eaten grass mixed with semen, drank water.
So much was her mind bound to him that, after becoming pregnant,
from that time forth, after going somewhere and eating grass in that place,
she wandered around in the neighbourhood of his hermitage.
The Great Being after examining (the facts) understood the reason.
Afterwards she gave birth to a human boy.
The Great Being brought him up with a Father’s love,
Now when he had come of age his Father, after giving the going-forth,
taught him the preliminary meditation exercise.
In no long time, having given rise to the absorptions and the deep knowledges, he amused himself with the bliss of absorption,
and had awful power and the faculty of the greatest resolve.
Because of the power of his virtue Sakka’s dwelling place shook.
Reflecting, Sakka knew the reason for it, (and thinking):
I will break his virtue through some means (or other),
for three (long) years he prevented rain in the whole kingdom of Kāsī,
(until) the kingdom was as though burnt by fire.
With an unsuccessful harvest, the people having become oppressed by famine,
they blamed it on the impurity of the King.
Then they stood at the King’s window and asked: Why is this? (saying):
“Great King, for three years the sky-god hasn't rained, and the whole kingdom is dried up,
people are suffering, make the sky-god rain, King.”
The King, after establishing the virtuous practices and maintaining the fast-day was still unable to make the rain fall down.
At that time, in the middle of the night-time, Sakka,
after entering and illuminating the royal chamber, stood in the air.
The King, having seen him, asked: “Who are you?”
“I am Sakka,”
“What have you come for?”
“Does the sky-god rain on your kingdom, Great King?”
“He doesn't rain.”
“But do you know the reason for it not raining?”
“I do not know.”
“Great King, in the area of the Himālayas lives an ascetic named Isisiṅga
who has awful power and the faculty of the greatest resolve.
When the sky-god rains regularly, becoming angry, he glares at the sky,
therefore the sky-god does not rain.”
“But now what is to be done in this case?”
“When his power is broken, the sky-god will rain.”
“But who is able to break his power?”
“Your daughter, Great King, Naḷinikā is able.
* After summoning her, send her (saying): After going to such and such a place,
break the ascetic’s power.”
Thus, after advising the King, he returned to his own place (in Heaven).
The King on the following day, after discussion with his ministers,
and summoning his daughter, spoke the first verse:
“The country is dried up, and the Kingdom will be destroyed,
Come, Naḷinikā, do you go to bring the brahmin  for me.”
Herein, him for me, bring that unbeneficial brahmin  under your control for me,
break his virtue by the power of the defilement of love.
Having heard that, she spoke the second verse:
“I cannot bear suffering, King, I have no skill in roads,
How will I go through a wood elephants inhabit?”
Herein bear suffering, I, Great King, cannot bear suffering,
and I do not know the road, how will I go?
Then the King spoke two verses:
“Having gone through the prosperous country with an elephant and chariot,
And with a wooden raft - (you can) go like this, Naḷinikā.
Go and take (with you) elephants, horses, soldiers and nobles,
By your beauteous form you will bring him under your control.”
Herein, by a wooden raft (etc.) means good Naḷinika, not by foot will you go,
but through your own prosperous, well-fed and safe country
having gone with an elephant vehicle a with a chariot vehicle,
from there onwards with covered vehicles and so on in the open-air,
go across the waters by a naval raft, by a wooden raft.
By your beauteous form, having gone without being wearied,
by your beautiful and fortunate form you will bring that brahmin  under your control.
Thus he spoke with his daughter about what shouldn't be spoken of in order to protect his Kingdom.
She accepted (the proposition) saying: It is good.
Then having given her all she required, he sent her off with the ministers.
The ministers, after taking her, arriving at the borderlands,
setting up the camp in that place, having the King’s daughter taken up,
entering the Himālayas with a forester who knew the path,
in the morning-time arrived near to the area of his hermitage.
At that time the Buddha-to-be, after making his son stay behind in the hermitage,
had himself entered the wilds looking for various kinds of fruit.
The forester, after approaching his hermitage, and standing near that lovely place,
while pointing it out spoke two verses to Naḷinikā:
“Marked by the sign of the plantain, surrounded by the Himālayan birch,
Here is seen Isisiṅga’s delightful hermitage.
Here is seen the smoke of what is reckoned a fire,
I think (it is) emitted now from the very powerful Isisiṅga’s (sacred) fire.
Herein, what is reckoned as a plantain, the flag, the sign (of that) is marked by the sign of the plantain.
Surrounded by the Himālayan birch means encircled by a wood of willow trees.
Reckoned means the fire is his, Isisiṅga’s, reckoned by the conflagration, which burns visibily.
I think ... now ... fire means I think (it is) emitted from the fire where he worships or tends.
The ministers, at the time the Bodhisatta entered the wilds,
after surrounding the hermitage, standing guard (over it),
making the King’s daughter take the guise of a Seer,
fully clothed with a golden bark robe, decorating (her) with all decorations,
making her take a pretty yo-yo fastened with a string,
and sending her to the hermitage, stood by themselves outside keeping guard.
Amusing herself with the yo-yo she entered the end of the walking path.
At that time Isisiṅga was sitting on a stone bench at the door of the leaf-hut.
After seeing her coming,
rising in fear and trembling, and entering the leaf-hut, he stood (inside).
After going to the door of the leaf-hut she amused herself (nearby).
The Teacher explaining the meaning further than that spoke three verses:
“Having seen her coming, adorned with jewelled earrings,
Isisiṅga fearfully entered the leaf-covered hermitage.
She amused herself with her yo-yo at the door of the hermitage,
Revealing her limbs, she displayed her secret (parts).
After seeing the yogini amusing herself with (the yo-yo) at the leaf-hut,
And coming forth from the hermitage, he said these words:
Herein, with her yo-yo means she amused herself with the yo-yo at the door of Isisiṅga’s hermitage.
Revealing means showing.
Displayed her secret (parts) means she displayed her secret and hidden limbs and also
the common limbs like the mouth, hands and so on.
He said means it seems that after standing by the leaf-hut, he thought:
‘If this is a demon, after entering the leaf-hut,
and grinding up my flesh he will devour me;
(but if) this is not a demon, it must be an ascetic.’
and after coming forth from the hermitage he spoke this verse, asking:
‘Hey! What is the name of the tree such a fruit comes from?
Having thrown it afar it returns, it doesn't go away from you.’ ”
Herein, such [a fruit] comes from means
your delightful fruit, what tree does such a one come from?
What is the name of the tree means that beautiful yo-yo unseen before;
thinking: it must be the fruit of a tree, he asked thus.
Then speaking about a tree she spoke this verse:
“My hermitage, Holy Sir, is close to Gandhamādana,
There are such trees on the mountain, that such a fruit come from,
Having thrown it afar it returns, it doesn't go away from me.”
Herein, close to Gandhamādana means my hermitage is close to the Mountain Gandhamādana (in the Himālaya).
That such a fruit come from means that such come from, the ta-element is (simply) a consonant junction (having no meaning).
Thus she spoke a falsehood.
Having faith, and perceiving: This is an ascetic,
making a friendly welcome, he spoke this verse:
“Come, good Sir, eat in this hermitage,
Receive what I can give of foot-oil and food,
Please sit, good Sir, here in this hermitage,
Eat, good Sir, the roots and fruits.”
Herein, this hermitage (etc.) means enter, good Sir, this hermitage.
Eat means partake of whatever food is placed before you.
Foot-oil means oil for the feet.
Food means various kinds of sweet fruit.
Receive means accept.
In this hermitage, at the time of going in is what is said.
After entering that leaf-hut, while sitting on the reed mat,
her golden bark-robe fell in two and her body was uncovered.
The ascetic, having never before seen a woman’s body,
perceiving: This is a wound,
“What is this in between your thighs
It appears so dark and slippery,
Declare to me that which I ask about,
Why is it your genitals enter into a cavity?”
Herein, slippery means between the two thighs at the time they met
it was well-oiled, formed like the mouth of a cowrie.
Being unendowed with the sign of beautiful, that place had the nature of a pit,
(but) when held up, it had an opening formed like the mouth of an cowrie.
It appears so dark means it seemed to be black on both sides.
Why is it your genitals enter into a cavity?
your genitals do not appear to have the form of a penis,
he asks: why is it your body (part) enters into a sheath?
Then deceiving him she spoke this pair of verses:
“While I was roaming in the woods is search of roots and fruits,
I struck a bear, very fierce in appearance,
After running up he fell upon me with violence,
Having pushed me down he pulled off my penis.
Herein, struck means she knocked against, seeing (him) approaching she hit (him) with a clod of earth is the meaning.
Running up means running close to.
Fell ... with violence means with violence he fell upon or dropped on me.
Having pushed means then having fallen on me.
Pulled off means having uprooted my penis with his mouth, he departed,
and because of that a wound appeared in this place.
This wound is (therefore) itching and irritating,
I do not receive (any) comfort at any time,
(You are) able, good Sir, to remove this itch,
When asked, dear Sir, please do this good thing for a brahmin.
This means this (analysing the compound), and because of this my wound is itching and also is an irritation,
and because of that all the time I do not receive (any) bodily or mental pleasure.
Able means able (alternative form), capable.
Good thing for a brahmin means good Sir, being asked by me do this good thing for a brahmin,
carry away my suffering, this is what is said.
After placing faith in the lies about her condition,
(thinking): If I can make you happy in this way,
having looked at the area, he spoke the next verse:
“Your wound appears to be deep and red,
It is big, fresh and smells like it’s decaying,
I will make you some remedial decoction,
Like that, good Sir, you will come to be at perfect ease.”
Herein, red means shining red.
Fresh means free of rotting flesh.
Smells like it’s decaying means a little bad-smelling.
Remedial decoction means having got some tree-decoction,
I will make some remedial decoction to you.
After that Naḷinikā spoke this verse:
“Not through a charm-remedy, or a remedial decoction,
Nor through medicine, Holy One, will (the itch) go away,
Please remove the itch gently with your (penis),
Like that I will come to be at perfect ease.”
Herein, go away means, good and Holy One, this my wound
will go away neither through a charm-remedy, nor a remedial decoction, nor a flower or fruit medicine,
after doing that many times before it was still not comfortable.
But through rubbing gently with your organ it will not itch,
therefore please remove the itch with that.
After reflecting: This is the truth he speaks,
not knowing: through engaging in sexual intercourse virtue is broken, and the absorptions are lost,
having never seen a woman before,
being in ignorance of sexual intercourse,
through her speaking of medicine, he engaged in sexual intercourse with her.
Then his virtue was broken, his absorptions were lost.
After having (sexual) intercourse two or three times, becoming tired and leaving,
descending into and washing in the lake,
easing his fatigue and sitting (again) in the leaf-hut,
still thinking: This is an ascetic,
asking about her residence, he spoke this verse:
“From here, good Sir, where is your hermitage?
Do you, good Sir, take delight in the wilds?
Do you have abundant roots and fruits?
Do you, good Sir, not (risk) injury from predators?
Herein, where means from here where, in what direction is the venerable’s hermitage?
Good Sir, this is a vocative.
Then Naḷinikā spoke four verses:
“From here straight in the northerly direction.
The river Khemā moves through the Himālayas,
On the bank of that (river) is my delightful hermitage,
If you like, good Sir, you can see my hermitage.
Herein, northerly means northerly (alternative form).
Khemā, such is the name of the river.
Moves through the Himālaya means flowing down from the Himālaya.
If you like is a particle expressing desire.
Mango, sal, plum, and jambolan trees,
The Cassia, and the blossoming trumpet-flower tree,
All around the bird-men sing,
If you like, good Sir, you can see my hermitage.
The Cassia is the Golden Shower Tree.
The bird-men sing means all around, being surrounded on all sides,
with a sweet voice there is the singing of the song of the bird-men.
There are palmyra and roots and fruits for me there,
With beauty and good scent well-endowed,
That portion of the land is well-endowed,
If you like, good Sir, you can see my hermitage.
Palmyra and roots and fruits are there for me means there at my lovely hermitage
there are palmyra trees that are endowed with beauty and good scent and so on
and what are reckoned as tubers, roots and fruits.
Abundant roots and fruits are there,
With beauty, scent and taste endowed,
But if hunters come to that district (I say):
Do not take from here my roots and fruits.”
Abundant ... are there means various and abundant fruit trees and vine tree roots are there.
Do not ... from there means very many hunters come to the area of my hermitage,
and after I have collected and caused to be placed there abundant and various sweet tasting fruits and roots,
after tarrying a while they carry off my roots and various fruits.
They should not take my roots and various kinds of fruits from there
therefore if you wish to come with me come, or if not, I will go, is what is said.
Having heard that, the ascetic, wanting to wait until his Father had returned, spoke this verse:
“My Father has gone searching for roots and fruits,
He will return here at evening time,
We both can go to your hermitage then,
After Father has come back from (collecting) roots and fruits.”
Herein, both can go means after informing my Father we both will go.
Because of that she thought:
“Having grown up just in this monastery he doesn't know my femininity,
but his Father, after seeing and understanding, (saying):
What did you do here? and hitting me with the head of his carrying pole,
will break my head.
Therefore before he comes it is good for me to go,
my work in coming here is finished.”
Telling him the way to come to her, she spoke the next verse:
“There are many other well-disposed sages,
Royal sages, living along the road,
Please ask them about my hermitage,
They will guide you to my neighbourhood.”
Herein, Royal sages means, my dear, I am unable to tarry a while,
but there are other well-disposed Royal sages and brahmin sages
residing along the road who know the road to my hermitage,
after informing them I will go,
you must ask them,
and they will lead you into my vicinity.
After making a plan for her getaway,
leaving the hermitage, seeing him and saying: You wait (here),
she went back to the vicinity of the road she had arrived on with the ministers.
After taking her and going to the camp, they gradually reached Benares.
Sakka being satisfied that day make the sky-god rain down on the whole of the kingdom,
and because of that there was plenty of food in the country.
Through her leaving the ascetic Isisiṅga’s body developed a fever.
Trembling, after entering the leaf-hut, and covering himself with his bark cloth he lay down grieving.
After coming in the evening the Awakening One, not seeing his son, (said): Where has he gone?
After putting down his carrying pole and entering the leaf-hut, and seeing him lying there, (he said):
Dear, what has happened? and while rubbing his back, he spoke three verses:
“You have no broken firewood, you have not brought the water,
You have not attended to the fire, what are you thinking of, lazy one?
Broken firewood and the sacrificial fire,
You, an ascetic, peacefully living the Holy life,
(Preparing) my stool and (setting up) water -
Previously you delighted in excellence.
Herein, broken means collected from the wilderness.
Not attended means not light.
Broken... means formerly you have collected firewood during the time I was coming.
The sacrificial fire means there is the fire and the sacrifice.
Ascetic, an ascetic is one who warms himself at what is reckoned a fire,
they prepare themselves peacefully.
Stool means my sitting stool had been prepared.
And water means foot-washing water had been set out.
Excellence (etc.) means previously to this you greatly delighted in being the best in this hermitage.
(But now) you have no broken firewood, and have not brought the water,
You have neglected the fire, and the food is not ready,
And today you do not converse with me,
Why are you perishing and your mental faculties suffering?
No broken firewood means now, today, you have not collected firewood.
Food is not ready means none of our roots or leaves have been boiled.
Today ... with me... means my child, today you do not converse with me.
Why are you perishing (etc.) means why are you perishing or why are your mental faculties suffering,
tell me what is the cause of your lying there, he asks.
After hearing his Father’s words, he spoke about the reason:
“There came here a yogi, a Holy One,
Very beautiful, slender, he leads,
Neither too tall nor too short,
That venerable one had very black hair.
Herein, came here means Father, he came to this hermitage.
Very beautiful means very beautiful (parsing the compound).
Slender mean very slender, not too thin, not too thick.
He leads means like one lighting up the hermitage with his own bodily radiance, he leads, he fulfills.
That venerable one had very black hair means,
Father, that good one had very dark black hair,
and a head with very black locks and eyebrows made like polished gems, it seems.
Being beardless and youthful,
On his neck was (something) shaped (like) our support (bowl),
With two bumps on his blessed chest,
Like resplendent golden globules.
Being beardless means so far he had not grown a beard, being young.
Youthful means not long having gone forth.
On his neck was (something) shaped (like) our support (bowl) means
* on his neck was set up an ornament like the alms bowl which is used for our support,
referring to a string of pearls is said.
Bumps is said in regard to her breasts.
On his blessed chest means on his blessed chest (different form), from his (chest) is another reading.
Resplendent means endowed with splendour; splendid is another reading, radiating is the meaning.
His face was very beautiful,
Having ears hanging down with curled tips,
Which glittered when that youth walked around,
(As did) the well-fastened bun of locks (on his head).
Very beautiful means extraordinarily beautiful.
Curled tips is said in reference to her lion’s earrings.
Ball means his well-bound bun of locks, that shone, let loose a light.
Also he had four fastenings,
Blue, yellow, red and white,
Which flew about when that youth walked around,
Like a flock of parrots in the rainy season.
Four fastenings means
that he saw four ornaments made from [blue] crystal, [yellow] gold, [red] coral and [white] silver.
Which flew about means those ornaments
sounded like a flock of parrots when the gods rain down in the rainy season.
He does not wear a girdle made of grass,
It is no (normal) covering for the ascetic,
It glitters, while clinging between his buttocks,
Like flashes of lightning in the firmament.
Girdle means girdle (alternative spelling), this is indeed another reading;
this is said in reference to his gold bark dress.
No covering means no bark (garments).
This is what is said:
Father, in whatever way it is made, made from grass or made from bark, we wear a bark garment,
but not so he, he wears a golden bark garment.
Without thistles and without stalks,
Beneath the navel, around his waist,
Without striking (them) they always play,
Dear Father, the fruit of what tree are these?
Without thistles means free from grit, free from thorns.
Around his waist means bound to his waist.
They always play (etc.) means without striking (them) they are always tinkling.
Dear Father means dear Father.
The fruit of what tree are these means that youth’s string of ornaments bound to the waist,
what is the name of the fruit of that tree? It is said in reference to the jewelled robe.
His locks are very beautiful,
Having more than a hundred sweet-smelling curls on top,
The two sides of his head were divided in a lovely fashion,
Oh, that my locks might be like that!
Locks is said in reference to the rolls of bound and bejewelled hair that were in the manner of a circle of locks (on his head).
Curls on top means wavy on top.
The two sides of his head means after making the two sides on his head,
and binding his locks he divided them in a good fashion.
Like that means my locks are not bound by you in the same way as that youth’s locks,
oh, that mine would be like that, he said making a wish.
But when his locks fall down,
Endowed with a beautiful scent,
Like a blue lotus pervading the wind,
So this hermitage is perfumed (by his hair).
Endowed means endowed with that condition.
Pervading the wind means as the blue lotus pervades the wind,
so this hermitage in this jungle thicket is made fragrant.
(Even) the dust of his (body) is very beautiful,
(The dust) on my body is not of such a kind,
He emits a perfume bestirred by the wind,
Like a blossoming wood at the height of the hot season.
Such a kind (etc.) means Father, whatever dust there is on my body, it is not of such a kind as on his body,
his is beautiful and sweet-smelling.
At the height of the hot season means in the Spring time.
He throws the fruit of the tree upon the earth,
(Having) a good form, pleasant and beautiful,
Thrown it comes back to his hand,
Dear Father, what sort of fruit is that?
He throws means he strikes.
What sort of fruit is that means of which tree is that fruit?
His teeth are very beautiful,
Pure, even and like noble pearls,
They gladden the mind when uncovered,
Does he not eat vegetables with them?
Like noble pearls means like very clean pearls.
Does he not eat vegetables with them? means
does that youth not, like us, with those teeth
eat tree leaves and roots and various kinds of fruits?
Our teeth are eating variegated coloured leaves is what is meant.
Smooth, flowing, swift and soft,
Straight, not haughty or fickle was his speech,
(His) cry was pleasant like the sweet sound of the cuckoo,
Stirring the heart, it surely delights my mind.
Smooth (etc.) means Father, his speech was not rough, flowing,
again and again his words were sweet, swift and soft,
without forgetting, straight, not haughty, without perplexity, not fickle and with steadfastness.
(His) cry means what is reckoned the sound of his speech when speaking, his cry,
was like a charming cuckoo, having a sweet sound, very honeyed.
Surely delights (etc.) means it surely delights my mind.
A full sound, not speaking too much,
Surely not applied to study (of the texts),
I desire to see him again (and again),
That young man, who was formerly called my friend.
A full sound means a compact sound.
That young man ... called (etc.), that young man who was formerly called my friend (change of word order and form to explain the sentence).
He had a fissure, a wound that was very smooth of all sides,
Broad, well-made, looking like a wet leaf,
With that the youth, having covered me over,
Pressed down his open thighs with his buttocks.
He had a fissure, a wound that was smooth of all sides means
Father, in between that youth’s thighs there was a wound,
that fissure was pleasant to the touch, having an opening formed like the mouth of an cowrie,
very smooth on all sides, everywhere smooth.
Broad means great.
Well-made means well-composed.
Looking like a wet leaf means resembling the fully blossomed buds of a lotus flower.
Having covered means having covered (different form), having spread over.
Pressed down means pressed down (different form).
Shining, bedazzling and illuminating,
Like flashes of lightning in the firmament.
His soft arms had glossy down,
His beautiful round fingers were resplendent.
Shining (etc.) means from that youth’s body was emanating
rays of a golden colour, which were gleaming, glistening and illuminating.
Arms (etc.) means his arms were soft.
Had glossy down means being endowed with down that is like gloss.
His beautiful round fingers were resplendent means his hands had beautiful noble marks,
and were endowed with round fingers, like sprouting buds, that were resplendent.
Having smooth limbs, and not long bodily hair,
His long fingernails were red at the tips,
Embracing (me) with his soft arms,
Beautiful, delighting, he attended to me.
Having smooth limbs means his various limbs were void of scabs and boils.
Delighting, he attended to me means taking delight (in it) he attended to, he looked after me.
Like the cotton of trees, resplendent,
Having very golden palms, round and beautiful skin,
Having been touched by those soft hands,
(Though) he has gone from here, Father, they (still) torment me.
Like the cotton is a similie meaning soft by nature.
Having very golden palms, round and beautiful skin means having palms like a flat mirror made of gold,
round and beautiful, palms that are even all round, and beautiful skin is the meaning.
Having been touched means having been touched by the touch of her hand,
having excited my body.
(Though) he has gone from here means looking around I see he has gone from here.
They (still) torment me means the touch of his hands still torments me.
Therefore because it is time for him to go my body became feverish,
and from that I have fallen into depression.
He surely did not carry a pole and basket,
He surely did not break his firewood,
He surely did not cut down a tree with an axe,
There were no callouses on his hands.
A pole and basket (etc.) means,
Father, that youth did not, after picking up a pole carrier, wander around.
Callouses means wasted, this indeed is another reading.
A bear had caused his wound,
He said to me: please make me happy,
What I did for him was my pleasure,
And he said: I am happy, Pious One.
Pleasure means pleasure (alternative form).
This rug made with creeper leaves
Is scattered all about by me and by him.
(Then) weary, after delighting in the water,
We ran back again to the leaf-hut.
Rug made with creeper leaves ... all scattered about means
Father, this, your rug of creeper leaves,
because of the mutual caressing, embracing and twisting around by the two of us today,
is scattered like it has become entangled and confused.
We ran back again to the leaf-hut means
Father, after delighting greatly,
wearily leaving from the leaf-hut,
entering the water, and delighting (therein),
we quickly ran back again to this hut and we reentered, this is what is said.
Father, today we did not recite the mantras,
Nor offer the fire-sacrifice, nor the extended sacrifice,
Nor can I eat those roots and fruits,
Until I see that Holy One (again).
The mantras (etc.) means today, because it was time for him to go,
we did not recite the mantras, nor did we attend or take delight (in them).
Nor offer the fire-sacrifice, nor the extended sacrifice means
The invitation to be made to the Great Brahmā, making the sacrifice by waving the smoke of the oblation -
this has not been recited by me, nor did I attend or take pleasure (in them).
Nor ... those means I will eat those roots and various kinds of fruits brought back by you.
For sure you will know, Father,
In what place that Holy One lives,
Let me go quickly to that place, Father,
Do not let me die in your hermitage!
What place means in what direction.
The wood has beautiful blossoms, I have heard,
Resounding with birds, inhabited by flocks of birds,
Let me go quickly to that wood, Father,
Before I forsake my life in this hermitage.
Wood (etc.) means having surrounded that youth’s hermitage they abide in that wood.
After hearing the nonsense of that nonsensical (child),
the Great Being, knowing: His virtue will be broken by this woman,
advising him, spoke six verses:
“In this resplendent wood,
Inhabited by heavenly musicians, gods and angels,
Where the sages are always dwelling,
You must not become discontent.
Herein, in this means in this (alternative form).
Haṁ is simply a particle (without meaning).
Resplendent means illuminated with the rays of bright invocations.
Always means from ancient times.
Must not become means should not become.
This is what is said:
Dear, dwelling in such a wood you have become discontent,
(but) you, a wise one born of a good family, should not become so, it is not worthy to become (so), is the meaning.
(Some) are friends, and then (some) are not,
They have love for (your) relatives and friends,
* This one is contemptible: he who does not know,
For whom (there should be) devotion, (or) from whence he came.
There are (etc.), the Great Being also included this verse (when) he spoke.
Herein, this is the intention:
in the world of beings there are some known as friends and some who are not,
herein, there are some of those who have love for your relatives and friends.
This one is contemptible means (like) an inferior horned animal.
For whom (there should be) devotion means for what reason
(should there be) devotion for one having conscious love for this woman?
Having arisen in an animal’s womb, and being reared in the forest,
he does not know himself: from what place he came, much less (his) relatives and friends.
Through living together friends are connected again and again,
That friend who is not met with, through non-association is destroyed.
Again and again means, Dear, what are known as friends
through living together or associating again and again are connected or combined.
That friend (etc.) means that friend who is not met with, who is a person who no longer comes together (with you),
through what is reckoned to be not meeting, through not living together, is destroyed or perishes.
If you will see this Holy One (again),
If you talk with this Holy One (again),
Just as a successful harvest by the great waters,
(So) this ascetic virtue will be quickly taken away.
If (etc.) means therefore, Dear, if you will see him again, or will talk with him,
then just as a well-ripened harvest is carried off by a great flood,
so will your ascetic virtue be taken away, will be carried away, this is the meaning.
If you will see this Holy One (again),
If you talk with this Holy One (again),
Just as a successful harvest by the great waters,
(So) this power will be quickly taken away.
Heat means ascetic heat.
There are beings, Dear, living in this
World of men having different forms,
A wise man does not associate with them,
Through contact with them the Holy life is destroyed.”
Having different forms means having various forms.
This is what is said:
Dear, in this world of men there are beings reckoned as demonesses
who cover themselves with various forms, through the power of those forms they live to devour (men),
a wise man does not associate with them.
Having come into contact with such beings the Holy life is destroyed,
seeing (this) do not be devoured by those demonesses, thus he advised his child.
Having heard his Father’s speech, (thinking): It seems she is a demoness,
afraid, his mind being repulsed,
he made him forgive (him, saying): “Father, I will not go from here, forgive me.”
After comforting him (he said): Come, young man,
develop friendliness, compassion, gladness and equanimity,
and he explained the development of the (four) spiritual states.
Having practiced in that way he again attained the absorptions and the deep knowledges.
After giving this Dhamma teaching,
and showing the Truths, he made the connection to the story,
and at the conclusion of the Truths that dissatisfied monk was established in the fruition of Stream-Entry.
(The Buddha said): at that time Naḷinikā was his former wife, Isisiṅga was the dissatisfied monk,
and I the Father.
Remembering the promise he had given to the greatly famous Bimbisāra - an abode of virtue who was like a flag in the noble line of kings - and wishing to be freed from it,
he went to the garden called the Laṭṭhi Wood, which was ornamented with countless trees and groves, where groups of peacocks had begun to dance.
The Lord of Men Bimbisāra, having heard of the Great Seer’s coming, adorned with the ornament of joy and happiness,
surrounded by his great ministers, after going to that garden, beautifying the hair of his head with the lotus-like feet of the Teacher,
while sitting, (gave to) Bimbisāra the Deathless waters of the True Dhamma. (Then) resplendent with the beauty, the great beauty, sung of by (Sakka) the King of the Devas,
the Greatly Famous One, honoured by Devas, Dānavas, and Snake-Lords, after going to fair Rājagaha, which was like the Lord of the Devas' city,
and being led to the Lord of Men’s house by the Lord of Men (himself), at the end of the meal, the Best of Men, making the great Earth shake,
accepted the fair Bamboo Grove Monastery, which was resplendent with full-flowering kingly trees, that brought pleasure to the eyes.
Having made a fence out of his mass of pure and excellent moral practice, and raised the brilliant, excellent, sceptre of concentration, while whirling about the supremely sharp and auspicious arrow of his vast Buddha-knowledge, He, the Lord of Sages, respected by Suras and men, having charming lotus-like feet, pure lotus-like eyes, delightful jasmine-like teeth, who was an ocean of precious virtues, the Protector of those without protection, who was beautiful like a golden effulgence, with a gentle moon-like face, dwelt as he liked in that supreme dwelling place, (which was situated) in a large, pure, creeper-covered arbor, on a mass of white sand which decorated the earth, which had fragrant flowers, the perfume of which was spread about by a gentle breeze, and which was adorned with various lotus flowers in the (nearby) lake.
In that place the walls and gates were made of sapphire rock, and appeared like a golden mountain because of (the Bodhisatta’s) radiance.
The mass of the people having seen him, became greatly excited, (and asked): “Who is this? Is it a Sakka, a Brahmā, a Māra, (or) a Nāga?” and so forth.
Having entered (the city) and gathered just enough food for sustenance, looking just a yoke’s distance (ahead of him),  while going along the Royal Road
the people were disturbed by him, like the ocean that was churned with (Mount) Meru as a churning stick, then having gone to Mount Paṇḍava,
and sitting in its shade on a delightful piece of land, he began to eat his mixed-up food.
The Hero of Great Strength simply through reflection prevented his creeping snake-like innards from emerging from his ant-hill-like body.
Having eaten, the Best of Men having been approached and offered the kingdom countless times by the Lord of Men Bimbisāra,
refused the kingdom, then he was begged by (Bimbisāra, saying): “Having become an unsurpassed Buddha, please teach the Dhamma to me.”
Then as this great festival with the Lord of the Devas and his hosts was continuing in this way, the Wicked Māra thought thus:
“So this (successful)  prince Siddhattha wishes to escape from my sphere (of influence), straight away I will make him unsuccessful.”
After creating a thousand broad and terrible arms, and collecting various blazing weapons with them, and mounting the charming and fierce tusker called Girimekhala, who was one hundred and fity leagues in extent,
he, surrounded by his army, which had many faces, fire-coloured hair, broad red circular protruding eyes, terrible lip-biting mouths, snake-like arms, and various weapons,
after approaching that place, while roaring a most terrible roar, ordered: “Seize and bind this Siddhattha here”; with the sight (of that) the hosts of Suras were put to flight, like cotton that has arisen in a violent wind.
(Māra) the Murderer made a fierce and noisy wind like a deep roaring storm-cloud,  but was not able to move even a corner of his auspicious, delightful, and excellent robe with it, then
he made fall a terrible and awful rain, like the heavy rain at the dissolution of the world, but not even a drop of water was able to fall near the Incomparable One; then having seen that wonder, with a very sad face, he
caused to rain down, an extremely terrible fire like flaming fiery great rocks ashes and mud, a torrent of weapons like rain, a torrent of blazing charcoal and sand like rain; (but) all of these
after approaching from the sky through the strength and power of Māra, and falling in the vicinity of him who had reached the peak of merit changed into a garland of flowers and so on; then having made a supremely awful darkness, like the darkness between the worlds, the One of Wicked Character (only) beheld a mass of exceedingly beautiful and most delightful light that arose and shone from (the Bodhisatta’s) body like a hundred risen suns, which destroys the darkness of delusion,
(then) his face altogether  red with anger, with a frowning appearance,  having an extremely fearsome, deformed appearance, he let fly his most excellent free-flying  Wheel-Weapon, which had an extremely sharp edge, which could surely split into pieces  Meru the King (of mountains), as though it were the soft stem of a palm tree, but with the approach of that (weapon) he was unable to do anything to that Mine of Virtue, (but) having ascended into the sky from that place, it became a sunshade made of flowers over his head.
Also the great many blazing rocky peaks which were hurled (at him), having fallen from the sky, attained the state of garlands of flowers,
having seen that, grieving, having approached the vicinity of the Hero, (he said): “This unconquered seat has come to me,
rise from this seat!” Then the Devout One, who had done good and meritorious deeds (said): “Māra, you said you have earned this seat,
who is the witness?” Called upon (like this) the Wicked One, having stretched forth his hand towards his army (said): “All these are witnesses!”
With a terrible roar of “I am witness, I am witness”, after he had made them declare their witness, he addressed (the Bodhisatta) thus:
“Who is your witness, Siddhattha?” Then that Incomparable One (said): “Here, Māra, I have no sentient witnesses.”
(Then) after withdrawing his shining right hand from his beautiful dyed robe, like golden lightning emerging from a glittering  cloud,
and pointing towards the earth, the earth of (his) perfections, (he said): “Why are you so silent now?”, and having made the earth resound,
and having made her roar countless hundreds of times, like a roaring storm-cloud, with the elephant-like strength of a Buddha the elephant (Girimekhala) was grounded with his knees (on the earth).
Having seen (that), (Māra), after thinking: “Now, let him have (it), now let him have (it)!”  like a broken-toothed snake with its arrogance destroyed, having a very sad face,
and having abandoned his countless weapons, clothes, and ornaments, he fled with his army as far as the Cakkavāḷa mountain (on the edge of the universe).
The hosts of Devas, after seeing Māra’s army fleeing in fear, in grief, (spoke) thus: “This is the defeat of Māra, and the victory of Prince Siddhattha!”
Rejoicing in that place, worshipping the Hero with fragrant perfumes and so on, with countless shouts of righteous praise they returned (to their abodes), clad in festive clothes.
So now I will show the range of places used (for the Rains Retreat) by the One who Gives Benefit to the Three Worlds, the One of Great Pity, the Supreme One in the World, whom the Suras, Asuras, Great Snakes (Nāgas), Rakkhasas, and so forth always worshipped.
The Excellent, Victorious (Buddha) Sun, dwelt for the first Rains Retreat near the city of Banaras, in the Deer Grove, illuminating those who were responsive, who were like a lotus-wood,  with a multitude of rays of the True Dhamma.
The Protector dwelt for the second, third, and also the fourth Rains Retreat in the very agreeable Bamboo Wood, near the delightful and most excellent city Rājagaha by name, which has streets full of shops having various treasures.
The Sage-Lion of the Sakyas, in the fifth Rains Retreat, has dwelt in the Great Wood, which was near to the very delightful city known by the name of Vesālī, which was resplendent with the rays of the crown-jewels of (many) Princes.
The Buddha, the repository of endless virtues, having charming eyes like blossoming, very blue, spotless water-lilies, radiating with his radiant gold-like body, in the sixth Rains Retreat, dwelt on the great Mount Maṅkula.
Preaching  the most profound, hard-to-see, sweet Dhamma to the Maruts, in the seventh Rains Retreat, the incomparable, glorious Sage, dwelt on the cool, large, stone throne of the Lord of Gods (Sakka).
He, the Excellent Victor over Māra, the one with blossoming lotus-like feet, the abode of (good) conduct, in his eighth Rains Retreat, dwelt in the pleasing Bhesakalā Wood on the mountain named Crocodile Hill.
The Ornament of the Three Worlds, the Victorious Bird-King,  having destroyed the arrogance of a great many snake-like sectarians, who had various opinions, in the ninth Rains Retreat, dwelt in the agreeable, very fair, Silk-cotton Wood near to Kosambī.
To quieten the great dispute amongst the monks,  in the tenth Rains Retreat, the Noble Sage dwelt with the noble elephant  in the noble, extensive, spotless Pārileyya forest, which was strewn with flowers.
The Lord of Sages, who had immeasureable intelligence, mind-captivating eyes, pure teeth, who leads people to the ageless, deathless state (of Nibbāna) by means of the deathless Dhamma, in the eleventh Rains Retreat, dwelt near the noble brāhmaṇa village named Nāla.
The Omniscient Sakyan Sage, in the twelth Rains Retreat, dwelt at the foot of a Lordly Nimba tree in a monastery having delightful, fragrant, flowers and fruits, which was near the charming brāhmaṇa village of Verañjā.
The Teacher of the Three Worlds, the Champion, whose face was like a blossoming lotus flower, who shone like a beautiful sun, whose abode was pity, living for the benefit of the world, in the thirteenth Rains Retreat, dwelt on the agreeable Cāliya mountain.
The Master of the Dhamma, whose delightful hands and feet were like Bandhuka flowers, devoted to the welfare of all beings — the Hero, the Sage of Great Power — in the fourteenth Rains Retreat, dwelt in the very delightful and excellent Jeta’s Wood.
The Lion King of Sages, having slain the forest of elephant-like passion in his responsive relatives,  in the fifteenth Rains Retreat, dwelt in the delightful Jewel Cave in Nigrodha’s Monastery, on a broad mountain near Kapilavatthu.
After guiding the very harsh yakkha (Ālavaka) to a state of good discipline, while leading a great many people along the Path to Peace, in the sixteenth Rains Retreat, he dwelt near the very excellent city named Ālavaka.
The unsurpassed Great Seer, whose fame had spread throughout the three realms, in the seventeenth Rains Retreat, dwelt near the excellent Rājagaha, which delighted the eyes with its ramparts, gateways, houses, archways, and so forth.
Aṅgīrasa,  having slain the terrible stain of passion in the world with the sweet, pleasurable Dhamma-medicine, in the eighteenth Rains Retreat, dwelt on Cāliya mountain.
The sweet-voiced Protector of the World, the Noble King of Dhamma, after slaying with the sword of the Dhamma the great enemy delusion in the responsive people and kinsmen, in the nineteenth Rains Retreat, again dwelt there (on Cāliya mountain).
The Lord of Sages, who was an abode of purity, living for the welfare of the world, like the auspicious wish-fulfilling tree, the wish-fulfilling gem, or the excellent lucky pot, in the twentieth Rains Retreat, dwelt near the beautiful and excellent Rājagaha.
Thus the One Honoured by the Three Worlds dwelt nowhere continually; and during the first period after the Awakening,  the One of Extensive Wisdom, the Sole Kinsman of the World, the Fortunate One, having a beautiful body endowed with a six-coloured halo, travelled for the rest of the time.
The Sage, who delights in the progress of the world, who abides happily, for (the next) twenty-five Rains Retreats, dwelt near Sāvatthī, in the delightful and excellent Jeta’s Wood, and in the decorated Eastern Monastery, which was like an abode of the gods.
Thus he who has measureless pity, dwelt for forty-five years extinguishing the massive fires of passion that had arisen in the forest-like minds of men with the supremely sweet Dhamma-water. May He, the Raincloud-Sage, bring peace to the world!
That Hero, after entering into that (region), and seeing there the requisites for a sage inside an excellent leaf-hut that had been made by (Sakka) the Thousand-Eyed One,
and taking the sage’s dress, after making the five deep knowledges  and also the eightfold blissful attainments  arise within seven days, lived concentrated. One day when the Sage, the Great Ascetic, was flying through the air,
after seeing people clearing the road, and descending from the sky, he asked the people: “Why do you clear the road?”
“Do you not know, Sumedha? Dīpaṅkara,  the Realised One, after attaining supreme Awakening and setting rolling the unsurpassed Dhamma Wheel, while giving the Dhamma-collection to the world, after coming to our fair city of Ramma,  is residing here in the Sudassana (Monastery).
We have invited that Sole Leader of the World, with four hundred thousand pure monks, for alms.
Visionary One! We are clearing the path for his arrival”, so the people spoke, giving pleasure to his ears.
His mind upraised with joy, that Mine of Virtue, having heard the word “Buddha”, was not able to restrain his emotion.
Therefore the Hero after begging for a small section of the road, and receiving an uneven spot, began to even it out.
But before that place was prepared, the Sole Protector of the World, who is worshipped by men and gods,  the Benefitter of the World, the Great Seer, entered the path along with the restrained ones,
having seen the Realised One with his bright six coloured halo blazing forth entering that place, rejoicing he thought:
“What if I were to lie down in the mud, having made a bridge of my very self for that Hero, that Great Seer, together with his Saṅgha?”
Having realised thus: “That will be sufficient for my benefit and happiness for a long time”, the Budding Victor lay down.
When it was (time for) the King’s Great Ploughing Festival, then the city was decked out like a Deva-city, and the people, in their finery, delighted, assembled at (King Suddhodana’s) supreme residence.
With his body adorned, at the head of the people, having taken his son, who was adorned with (many) adorments, like (Sakka) the Lord of the Suras at play that Master of Men, went to that Incomparable Ploughing Festival.
Having laid him at the root of a certain Rose Apple (tree), which was surrounded with a variegated, glorious, and charming screen, the nurses went outside to watch the festival.
While sitting on that pleasant couch at the root of that light, glorious, canopied Rose Apple (tree), which was resplendent with golden stars and so on, taking the opportunity, the Hero attained absorption.
Having seen him sitting there like a golden statue, and (the Rose Apple tree’s)  shadow standing still, the nurses, having approached, said to (the King): “Such is the wonder of your son”.
After hearing this about him whose face shone like a clear moon, and whose eyes were like lotuses, and announcing: “This is the second time I pay respects to him”, with his head he paid his respects at his son’s feet.
This and countless other wonders occurred in the world, but through fear of extending the book, I have shown (only) these in brief.
Then the Buddha rose from the Goat-Herder’s (Tree), like the sun rising with great light into the sky over the mountain, like a shining and bright jewel-light, emitting the shining Buddha-rays.
Then rejoicing Upaka and so on, after gradually covering an 18-league road, which resounded with the sound of a host of bees active in the blossoming trees,
the Famous One went to the supreme Deer Park, which was continuously resounding with countless birds, and perfumed with the scent of blossoming lotuses; then, in that place, the Group of Five ascetics
having seen the Deva of Devas, the Sole Protector of the Three Realms of Existence, the One who Sees to the End of the World, the Hero with beautiful limbs, the Lion King of Sages, the Happy One, they counselled an evil counsel:
“Friends! This ascetic, having enjoyed gross food and drink, has come by a very beautiful complexion and a full body; we should not pay respects to him and so on.
However, he is born into a great lineage, is venerable, and has been a chief in the world, he is worthy of being offered a seat, therefore let us prepare a seat.”
Then the Fortunate One, with keen intelligence, having understood their thoughts, destroyed their conceitedness  with the fragrant breeze of his friendliness.
And they, being unable to maintain their agreement, paid their respects and so on to the Devout One, the Protector of the World.
The sages, not knowing that the King of Sages had become a Buddha, they all spoke to him using the term ‘Friend’.
Then, the Knower of the Worlds, the Protector of the World, addressed them (saying): “Do not speak to the Teacher using the term ‘Friend’.
“Monks! (I am) the Realised One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha, the Supreme One”, and having made known to them his Buddhahood,
he sat down on the beautiful, supreme seat they had prepared, and having addressed with his Brahmā-like voice those elders adorned with the ornament of virtue, at that time, surrounded by countless tens of millions of Brahmās, after destroying the blind mass of delusion, and showing the light of his delightful Dhamma with his lotus-like intelligence to those who were responsive, he set rolling the Dhamma-Wheel with his radiant teaching.
Thus in the battle-ground known as the Deer Grove, like a very mighty king, the learned King of the Dhamma
after taking up the delightful sword-like teaching with the hand of wisdom, and cutting down the defilements, which, like an enemy, always work for the great harm of the responsive people and kinsmen, and beating the True Dhamma’s victory drum, raising the True Dhamma’s very difficult to attain flag of victory, he established the True Dhamma’s supreme victory pillar; the Safety-Maker, after becoming the Sole King of the World,
and liberating the people from the vast bondage of Saṁsāra, delighting in the World’s welfare, and desirous of leading them to the City of Nibbāna,
was a charming sight while going along,  and after reaching the road to Uruvela, which was like a Sura-road, like the top of (Meru), the Golden Mountain,
having made as many as thirty of the august group of young princes drink the supreme  elixir, the elixir of the three deathless paths,
and giving them the supreme going-forth, the Sambuddha, after sending them off (saying): “Monks, walk on pilgrimage for the welfare of the world”;
reaching Uruvela, cutting off the inner tangle and the outer tangle of the tangled-haired ones, and making them attain the high road, the Supreme One, like the moon surrounded by the stars,
surrounded by those Free from the Pollutants, greatly beautifying the clearings in (all) directions with the supreme ornament of his six-coloured rays, satisfied even the eyes of the birds.
The Great Champion, the Master of the Earth, having lain down there, after reposing a little on the couch, and folding his legs crosswise,
while sitting, after seeing the change in the various conditions of the women who had fallen asleep, with his mind fearful of (continued) existence, thinking: “I will go now”, after approaching the delightful doorsill,
after calling Channa, his attentive,  well-controlled, faith-inspiring, highly meritorious friend and councillor, who, thinking: “I will hear the Hero’s voice”, after placing his head there on the beautiful threshold, was reposing, said this: “After preparing the horse named Kanthaka, please bring him (here)”.
Channa, after accepting the order that was given by (the Bodhisatta), going from there and preparing the horse, quickly brought (him).
Having understood it was for (the Bodhisatta’s) Great Renunciation, that noble horse, while being harnessed by (Channa), neighed excitedly.
That noise went out and spread over the whole city, but all the Hosts of Suras in the (city) allowed no one to hear it.
Then that Good Man (thought) joyously: “First, having seen my unsurpassed son, and having departed later on, I will become a Buddha.”
After thinking thus, and going to his wife’s apartments, and placing his foot on the threshold, he stretched his neck inside.
On a couch, which was bestrewn with flowers, like (Sakka) the Lord of the Devas couch, lay the Mother (Yasodharā) together with his son.
The Sole Leader of the World, having seen (that), thought thus: “If I, having removed her Majesty’s arm, would take my son, this Yasodharā,  after waking, through her great love, might put an obstacle in the way of my departure.
After becoming a Buddha, and coming again I will see my son,” then the Ruler of Men descended from that palace floor.
Yasodharā, with her well-formed face and lotus-like hands and feet, her laughing, bubbling, bright eyebrows, her eyes like blue lotuses, which were bee-like and desirable, who was like the full moon —
who would be able to abandon enjoying possession of her body, apart from the Hero, standing on perfection’s heights?
At a time of four immeasurables, and a hundred thousand aeons ago (there was a city where)  those who desired merit everyday resided,
(it was) endowed with various jewels, crowded with various people, full of beautiful shops, adorned with decorated towers,
having the ten sounds,  like unto the city of (Sakka) the Lord of the Devas - it was a brilliant, excellent city named Amara.
One of the best lineage  was born in that place, who was greatly honoured by the whole world, one of great compassion, great wisdom, handsome, delightful,
a youth called Sumedha  by name, who had crossed the ocean of the Vedas.  That Budding Victor,  after the death of his parents,
having been shown the immeasurable wealth by the councillor who managed the estate, and after surveying that mass in the countless hundreds of storerooms,
and piling up the wealth (said): “Alas! My father and the rest have gone to the gods and have not taken even one cent  with them!”
That Mine of Virtue became really anxious , and thought thus: “Although I have received this valuable wealth, I am bound to go.”
Having sat down in seclusion in his own beautiful house, while surveying the faults in the body, and advising himself (he thought thus):
“Painful is the break-up of the body, painful also is its arising again - I am subject to death, subject to old age, subject to sickness.”
Having thus seen the countless faults in the body and so on, after informing the king, and having the drums beaten in the city,
for seven days thereafter he satisfied the beggars who gathered at the sound of the drum with a flood of gifts, just as bees gather and are satisfied with the sweet scent of a multitude of blossoms.
The Excellent One, having approached the supreme garden, which was like the very joyful Lord of the Devas' Nandana Grove  (in Tāvatiṁsa), a grove shining with rows of full-blossoming Sāla trees, which like a row of bees which stole the people’s minds and eyes,
and having spent the day in that place, in the evening-time, went with the grace of a lion to the vicinity of the Bodhi Tree.
The Lord of Men set out along a wide road which had been prepared by Brahmās, Suras, Asuras, Great Snakes and Bird-Kings.  The twice-born (brāhmaṇa) Sotthiya, a grass collector, having seen him, offered him a handful of grass.
As the Supreme Man was going along blue water-lilies, lotuses, and other flowers fell like showers of rain from the sky.
As the Supreme Man was going along the sky was filled with a great deal of charming fragrant incense made of sandalwood powder and so on.
As the Supreme Man was going along the sky was filled with glorious jewelled umbrellas, and charming golden flags.
As the Supreme Man was going along the sky was filled with thousands of Maruts sporting garments that they were waving about.
As the Supreme Man was going along the sky was filled with Maruts beating the Suras' musical drums.
As the Supreme Man was going along the sky was filled with countless chants sung by Sura-maidens.
In that place delightful Kinnaras, Kinnara-maidens, Snakes, and Snake-maidens with delightful-limbs performed delightful dances and songs in countless delightful ways.
Then the Sole Leader of the Three Realms of Existence, the Famous One, as the great festival was continuing like a great torrent, having taken the grass, proceeded to the vicinity of the Lorldy Bodhi Tree.
The Supreme Man, the Hero, after circumambulating the Bodhi tree, which was like the top of a silver mountain covered in coral and sapphire, while standing on firm faultless ground on the Eastern side (of the tree), threw a fistful of grass.
At once there was a fourteen-cubit seat; then the One of Great Wisdom, having seen that wonder, thought:
“Let my flesh, blood, bones, muscles and skin dry up, (but) I will surely never give up the effort (to attain Awakening).”
The Great Champion, the Supreme Man, sat in that place in an undefeated cross-legged position facing the East.
At once (Sakka) the Lord of the Devas, having taken the Deva of Devas' conch, which was more than two thousand  (cubits) in height, stood there sounding (it).
The Great Brahmā Sahampati stood there like a second full-moon, properly holding aloft a three league (high) white umbrella.
Suyāma, the Ruler of the Suras, stood there slowly, slowly fanning a charming three league (high) chowrie.
Similarly the Sura called Pañcasikhā stood (there) playing many different melodies  on a beluva-wood  lute he had taken up.
Similarly the King of the Nāgas called Kāla, stood at the head of the dancing-girls singing songs of praise.
Also thirty-two princesses stood there worshipping with a golden casket full of divine flowers they had taken hold of.
The Firm One, while lying in that place, after raising his charming lotus-eyes, and once more contemplating (the Buddha), thought thus:
“If I so wished, today, after slaying the endless battle of existence, and becoming a novice in the Saṅgha, I could enter the excellent city (of Nibbāna).
But what is there for me in another dress, or in the destruction of the defilements?  Like this Buddha, Complete Emancipation is best for me (only) after becoming a supreme Buddha myself and carrying the people across the ocean of existence with the boat of the Dhamma, and bringing them to the City of Nibbāna.”
After reflecting thus, while lying there in the mud like a very lovely banana trunk, he radiated beautifully.
The Hero, after seeing the pleasing and Fortunate individual with his mind detached and his six coloured rays, his heart uplifted with the joy that had arisen, made his aspiration for Complete Awakening.
After approaching the place where the sage was lying in the mud, also being a bridge for the world, and seeing him making a bridge out of himself, Dīpaṅkara, the Realised One, the Hero, the World’s Sole Eye, the World’s Sole Bridge, after standing near his head,
(and announcing): “In the future he will be a Sambuddha known by the name of Gotama,” spoke about his disciples, his city, and so on.
Having said this, that (Buddha) of Lovely Virtue, together with his Saṅgha, circumbulated him, and worshipped him with eight handfuls of flowers.
Having done this, the Leader of the World, together with the Saṅgha, entered into city called Rammaka, which has fair pleasure gardens  and dwelling places.
Sumedha, the great ascetic, having great wisdom, and controlled senses, after hearing the Victorious One’s word, rejoicing, arising from the mud, and folding his legs crosswise sat down on the flower seat, and was worshipped by the assembly of Devas with flowers and so on.
The Devas from the ten thousand world-systems, rejoicing, praised the Hero who was sitting on the flowerseat.
Then, while sitting, he examined above, below, in the main and intermediate directions what things make one Awakened,
examining all the elements of the Dhamma in this way, the first thing he saw in his own stream (of consciousness)  was the perfection of giving,
understanding it thus, and seeking out the next perfection in this way, after seeing by himself with the eye of knowledge all the perfections,
and enduring a great deal of suffering in the rolling on of Saṁsāra,  seeking the peaceful, the deathless, after fulfilling the perfection of giving -
giving to (all) beings, like a wish-fulfilling tree or a wish-fulfilling jewel, granting their desires, he gave whatever they longed for, beginning with excellent food and so forth -
and doing a good many other things, (as many as) the stars in the sky, gladly the Hero, having torn out his charming eyes, gave them to beggars,
he also gave his body’s flesh, more than the dust on the earth; and his blood, more than the waters in the ocean.
After giving away his diadem-ardorned heads in excess of (Mount) Sineru,  and making the earth shake, he gave away his wife and children.
Thus after fulfilling all the perfections such as virtue, renunciation, and wisdom, and attaining his individuality as Vessantara, and from there passing away
and re-arising in the Tusita Heaven,  the beautiful abode of the Suras, for a very long time he dwelt (there) enjoying endless blessings.
Having worshipped the Great Seer’s supreme lotus feet with my head, which gives the sweetness of Emancipation to good men like honey gives sweetness to bees,
and the sun-like Dhamma, which arose from the immoveable King of Dhamma, and by the appearance of its great splendour dispels the great darkness of ignorance in the world,
and the moon-like Saṅgha, with its widespread, refulgent, and glorious virtue, which, just as a lotus (is always) born in water, always awakens faith in the minds of the people,
I will tell in short the life of the Victorious (Buddha),  which is of truly widespread benefit both near and far,  the value of which I always remember.
To those who remember it, the excellent, rare, and safe state  becomes not so rare, so why speak about the acquisition of wealth?
Therefore, those who truly have put the hollow of their hands to their ear,  who constantly wish for that which is free from old-age and death, those good people should enjoy my recital, which is made in lovely verses and orderly lines, beautiful, sweet, pure, bringing pleasure to the ears of those who listen.
In that place where there were (three) palaces decorated with variegated jewels, having manifold lodgings with decorated canopies, many-storied, adorned with rows of stairs, decked out and suitable for the three seasons;
around the turrets of which were a multitude of rays, which indeed mocked the eternal rays around the turrets of the Palaces of the Suras, (and) as the rays of the sun illumine the lotus-groves, so these (illuminated) the abundant lotus-like  faces of the people;
near the many and variously bejewelled walls, without (needing) a reflection in mirrors, the women continually ornamented their slender bodies;
where was seen a decorated, whitewashed, rampart enclosure  similar to Mount Kelāsa, which brought pleasure to the eyes;
wherein were seen moats, which always had countless lotuses, like large sapphire bracelets adorned with many treasures;
therein the Sole Seer of the Three Worlds lived and, after attaining maturity and enjoying abundantly pleasant sensual pleasures, he went along the main path to play in the garden.
The Devas, with their hands held in reverential salutation, begged the Supreme Man,  saying: “Great Champion, it’s time for your Complete Awakening”, and so forth.
After examining the time and so forth,  and understanding “This is the time for Awakening,” after giving his promise to the assembly of Devas, and going to the Nandana Grove with the Devas (he heard): “Having passed away from here, pass on to a good state of being,”  the Greatly Wise One, very satisfied, after passing away from there, in this existence
(arose) in the very beautiful city called Kapila,  (which was) crowded with great horses with decorated limbs, had various beautiful shops rich in wares, was resplendent with delightful tall lordly elephants, having towers adorned with a mass of flags, great houses decorated with watchtowers, lovely city gates, beautiful women’s houses, a city more joyful than Purindada’s city,
by way of Suddhodana, an excellent Master of Men, protector of those without protection, who was the pride of the family (descended from) King Okkāka, a pure dwelling place of countless virtues, whose lotus-like feet were served by bejewelled princes,  (as many as) a swarm of bees.
That One of Broad Wisdom, after showing himself in a dream as a beautiful, kingly, noble elephant as white as the moon, with an excellent white lotus he had picked in his lovely pure white trunk, which was like a silver chain,
descended to the womb of Queen  Māyā, who had lips as red as the Bimba fruit, eyes like a blossoming lotus, eyebrows like a delightful rainbow,  with a noble face like a pure and pleasing full moon, with breasts as charming as a pair of golden swans, whose hands and feet were as lovely as lotus shoots, with resplendently beautiful skin and body, and was adorned with the adornment of countless good qualities such as virtue and so forth.
At the moment he was conceived countless wonders arose, and after this he was taken care of by gods and men.
Like a delightful golden image sitting in a pleasing red lotus, the golden-skinned Lord of Men sat cross-legged in his mother’s womb,
like a red thread strung through a clear jewel, the Hero was to be seen enlightening his mother’s lotus-like mind.
While proceeding, after seeing the forms of an old man, a sick man, and a dead man, being detached from (attachment to) the three (realms of) existence;  on the fourth occasion (he saw) the delightful form of a renunciant, and delighting in that
the Greatly Famous One went to a beautiful and delightful garden, which, like the Nandana Wood (in Tāvatiṁsa), was adorned with many blossoming trees, and the birdsong of a multitude of peacocks and so on.
There the Lord of Men, like the Lord of the Suras (Sakka) at play, after delighting in the sensual pleasures of the delightful music, dance and song of the truly beautiful Sura-like women,
while sitting on his radiant seat, after crossing his legs, thought about how he could get his body adorned.
The Master of the Devas (Sakka), having understood his thoughts, said this to Vissakamma:  “Please (go and) adorn Siddhattha.”
At that command Vissakamma, having approached, wrapped the beautiful head of the Famous One with ten thousand cloths.
He also beautified his pleasing body, which was glorious with rare and extraordinary signs, with many and various superb ornaments, and with the sweet perfume of flowers, sandalwood, and so forth.
Adorned by (Vissakamma) whose limbs are adorned, sitting there on a spotless flat slab of stone, surrounded by beautiful Sura-like women, he shone like (Sakka) the Master of the Devas.
A supreme message was sent by Suddhodana, the Lord of Men (saying): “Son! A son has been born to you!” The Supreme Man, after hearing (this),
and exclaiming: “Today a bond  has been born to me!” at once went to the beautiful city (of Kapilavatthu), which was furnished with all sensual pleasures.
Then Kisāgotami, standing on the top floor of the palace, having seen the Prince shining like the sun,  said this:
“Those to whom this Hero is a son, she who is the wife of this one complete in virtue, all of them are truly satisfied forever.”
After hearing such a pleasant utterance spoken thus by her, full of the joy that had arisen, while he was proceeding to his house,
after removing his cool, spotless, captivating, delightful pearl necklace from his neck, sending it into her presence,
and ascending his beautiful palace, which was like (Sakka’s palace) Vejayanta, he sat down like (Sakka) the King of the Devas on his worthy couch.
Beautiful women like Sura-maidens,   after surrounding him, performed various songs and dances.
(But) the Hero, greatly delighting in (the thought) of renunciation, being unattached to the five (strands) of sense pleasure, did not delight   in any of those delightful songs and dances.
After making use of the supreme Anotatta water, the tooth-cleaner made out of betel wood, and the yellow myrobalan medicine brought by (Sakka) the Lord of the Devas,
he accepted the milk-rice and honey-balls brought by the merchants in the bowl offered by the Great Kings.
At the end of his meal, having gone to the root of the Goat-Herder’s Tree, he recalled the profundity of the Dhamma he had understood (thus):
“This Dhamma which has been understood by me is deep and peaceful like the mass of water borne by the earth,” and so on.
While the King of the Dhamma was reflecting mindfully on the deep nature of the Dhamma (thinking): “While I was practising and thinking to penetrate this Dhamma
with great effort, to those who came forward  and requested it, after cutting off my head, delightfully decorated as it was with a top-knot, and (other) decorations,
rooting out my collyrium-annointed eyes, and removing my flowing blood, through giving away my beautiful,  splendid wife, and my son, the light of his family’s lineage, there was nothing known as a gift not given, and no virtue that was not preserved.
Thus, fearing a break in my virtuous practices, in my existences as Saṅkhapāla  and so on, with the sacrifice of my life;
and in countless existences which I attained such as Khantivādī,  with the cutting off (of my limbs) and so on, there was no perfection I left unfulfilled.
When Māra’s army was destroyed by me the earth did not shake, and nor with the Rememberance of Past Lives,
in the middle watch when the Divine Eye was purified by me it did not shake, but in the last watch
with the penetration of the Mode of Conditions  by me, instantaneously, as though giving a round of applause, while releasing a great roar, (the earth) shook.
Like a gourd filled with rice-gruel, like a pot full of buttermilk, like a hand besmeared with collyrium, like a cloth soaked with grease,
this world, filled with a mass of defilements, defiled and excited by passion, corrupted by anger, confused with what is called very strong delusion, is a place for the production of a great deal of ignorance.
What is the name of the one who will penetrate this Dhamma? What is the use of preaching to him? Thus in this way the Protector became one lacking the energy to give the Ambrosial Dhamma to the people.
Then Brahmā Sahampati, after emitting the following great shout: “The world is surely perishing! The world is surely perishing!”,
immediately taking a host of Devas and Brahmas from the hundred world-elements, drew close to the Teacher.
After approaching and placing his knee on the plain of the earth and stretching forth his hands in reverential salutation (he said): “May the Fortunate One preach the Dhamma” and so forth.
Then being requested by (Brahmā Sahampati) in this way, the Victorious One, the lotus-faced Sambuddha, while looking around the hundred world-elements with his Buddha-eye,
after seeing there that many mortals had but little dust on their eyes and so forth, and classifying beings according to their being capable and incapable,
shunning those incapable, and taking those capable of understanding, he answered the hosts of Brahmās with his radiant deathless words: “Now let the people present themselves as recipients of faith and I will fill them with the gift of the deathless and True Dhamma.”
Having considered in countless ways the virtues of that seat, (thinking): “I will not rise from this seat just yet,”
[in the first week] the Teacher sat right there on that immoveable seat for seven days, and attained the countless ten hundred million attainments.
Some Devatās had doubts (thinking): “Perhaps there is something more for the Famous Hero Siddhattha to do, therefore he does not abandon his place on the seat”; having known their thought, to appease that (doubt), He of Peaceful Mind, the golden-skinned Light-Maker, the Protector, after rising like a golden-swan, and ascending into the sky, performed the (Double) Miracle.
With this (Miracle) he thus completely appeased the Maruts thought; and [in the second week] he stood for seven days worshipping the Bodhi (Tree) and the Victory Seat with his unblinking lotus-eyes.
[In the third week] he walked in that excellent walkway, which had treasures, and was resplendently beautiful;   [and in the fourth week] the Pure One thought about the Pure Dhamma  in the delightful Treasure House.
[In the fifth week] at the root of the excellent Royal Goat-Herder’s Tree he caused the spotless lotus-like faces of Māra’s women  to wither completely; then [in the sixth week] at the root of the Mucalinda (Tree) he awakened the lily-like thoughts of the Coiled Lord (of Snakes).
[in the seventh week] the Devout One, with a pleasing appearance, experienced the bliss of attainment at the root of the Kings’ Stead  (Tree) — and so he spent (the first) forty-nine days (after his Awakening).
May the noble lady Wisdom, who has arisen in the sphere of my mind, while pleasing all the people, increase everyday.
(May I), through the power of the merit that has accumulated through my writing The Life of the Victorious Buddha, after attaining the Tusita abode,
while listening to the Dhamma preaching of the Protector of the World, Metteyya, enjoy with him honour and success for a long time.
And when that (future) Buddha is (re)born in that delightful city of Ketumatī,  (may I)  a great being, having been born with three root conditions, after arising in a royal lineage,
and given robes, almsfood, a priceless extensive noble dwelling, and medicine  to that Great Seer,
and going forth in that dispensation, while illuminating that unsurpassed (dispensation), being endowed with supernatural powers and mindfulness, while bearing the three baskets (of the scriptures) well in mind,
after (hearing) his declaration: “This (man) will be a Buddha in the future”, and giving pleasureable gifts to the various Buddhas who will arise,
while travelling on in Saṁsāra, like a wish fulfilling tree, giving sweet excellent food and so on, and whatever they longed for to living beings,
and with well-composed mind, giving flesh, blood, eyes and so on, while fulfilling all the perfections beginning with virtue, renunciation, wisdom and so forth,
after attaining the height of perfection, and becoming an unsurpassed Buddha, and teaching the pleasureable sweet Dhamma to the people,
and releasing the whole world, including the Devas, from the bondage of this immense Saṁsāra, attain the noble, peaceful, safe state (of Nibbāna)!
This (Jinacarita) was written by the compassionate, devout, elder, Medhaṅkara by name, who always associates with the virtuous, while dwelling peacefully in a noble residence, resplendent with lakes, ramparts, gates, and so forth, which was made by King Vijayabāhu, a chief of princely lineage, who has become the ornament of (Śrī) Laṅkā, and which bears his own name.
Here there should be four hundred and seventy three verses, and there will be more than five hundred and fifty five sections.
At the end of ten months the Queen said this to the King: “Your Majesty! I wish to go to my relatives’ house.”
Being authorized by the King, going along a smooth road - like a heavenly road - under the protection a great retinue of her own clan,
having seen the Lumbini Grove, an extensive, delightful abode, having Sāla groves decorated with bunches  of fragrant flowers, with the prominent sound of rapt bees singing at the flowers, and being summoned, as it were, by flocks of birds who led her on,
after delighting greatly in her charming play in that place, which was like the play of a youthful immortal, and going to the root of an excellent blossoming Sāla tree, she grasped a branch of the Sāla tree, which bent itself down (for her).
At that time she was shaken by the pangs of childbirth,  then the people, after throwing a screen around the Queen, having retreated from that place stood guarding (her).
Standing there hanging on to the branch with her cotton-soft lotus-like pink hands, which were adorned with charming gold bracelets and so forth, having exceedingly resplendent fingers  with copper(-coloured) nails, she gave birth to the Hero.
He descended from the unequalled womb (of his mother), with his golden-skinned, resplendently beautiful body, delightful eyes, and his completely delightful pair of hands and feet stretched forth,  like a golden goose from a lotus,
The Brahmā (gods), after taking a priceless, delightful, golden net, approaching and catching him (as he was born), standing right there in front of her, said: “Rejoice, Your Majesty, this foremost son has been born to you.”
Other men are born with their limbs smeared with impurities, but this excellent Lord of Men was born pure, like a priceless, charming, jewel deposited on exceedingly soft, spotless Kāsi  cloth.
This being so, after two streams of water had fallen from the sky, making the Favoured One’s body and his Mother’s body cool and pleasing on this auspicious occasion,
from (the Brahmās) delightful hands the Devas, having approached, took him on an antelope skin mat, and from their hands noblemen (received) that King Lion of a Man, that Champion, with a pillow made of silk,
and from their hands, like a delightful spotless moon, having correctly placed his broad wheel-marked feet on the plains of the earth, he looked to the easterly direction with his long lotus-like eyes.
Then countless hundreds of universes became one clear open space (for him), with their men and gods worshipping him with perfumes and so on, and to the Hero they said this:
“Sage! There is not even one man here who is your equal, how to say greater?” In this way the Protector of the World, looking in all directions, and not seeing one who was his equal,
having taken seven steps in the northerly direction said this: “I am the greatest, the elder, the best...”  and so forth.
The ascetic Kāladevala, who had supernatural power and great wisdom, was the family advisor of the devout Suddhodana, the Lord of Men.
At the end of his meal, he went to the Tāvatiṁsa Abode, and after going to that dwelling place, he sat down to spend the day there.
He saw that after putting on festive clothes, the (Devas) were sporting around; he asked the reason for their great joy, and they answered him:
“In the city of Kapilavatthu there is born to this Suddhodana a son, who, having sat in the environs of the Bodhi (Tree), will become a Buddha.”
After hearing about the situation, with his mind joyful and elated, after instantly departing from there, and entering Suddhodana’s dwelling, while sitting on his well-prepared seat, the seer said: “It seems, Great King, an unsurpassed and sagacious son has been born to you,
I long to see him;” the King, after summoning the finely-dressed Prince, approached to make him pay respect (to Kāladevala).
Instantly, by the power of the Prince’s virtues, his delightful, supreme, lotus-feet turned about and were placed on the ascetic’s head.
The Supreme Man, having that individuality, there was no one in the three (realms of) existence whom he should pay respect to; if the head of the Protector of the Three Worlds had been placed at the ascetic’s feet
the ascetic’s head would surely have split; maintaining his raised hands in reverential salutation to the Hero, the Ocean of Virtues, (he thought): “It is not suitable to destroy myself.”
The Lord of Men, having seen that wonder of the Devas beyond (all) Devas, his own son, satisfied, paid great respect to his tender, beautiful, wheel-marked  lotus feet.
“Sire, I have brought the horse, know the time, O Best of Charioteers,” so said Channa to the Famous Protector of the Earth.
Then the Master of the Earth, after hearing the word spoken by Channa, descending from the palace, and going into the presence of Kanthaka,
said this word to him: “Delighting in the welfare of all beings, Kanthaka, carry me today for this one night, and having become an unsurpassed Buddha, I will carry the world, with its men and gods, across the ocean of existence, which is a great repository of terrors beginning with old-age and so forth.”
Having said (this), and mounted the white  horse, with his tail firmly taken hold of by Channa,
the One of Great Strength, having come close to the main gate, thought (thus): “If the door is not opened by anyone, then together with Channa holding on to the tail, having gripped Kanthaka with my thighs, after jumping over this tall, beautiful wall, I will depart.”
Channa, who was endowed with firm strength, and (Kanthaka) the supreme horse, each individually thought of overcoming the wall in the same way.
Then, having understood (the Bodhisatta’s) mind, the Suras who were in possession of the door, rejoicing in the auspicious departure, opened the door.
(Then Māra) the Murderer thought: “This Siddhattha (the one who has accomplished his aim), I will make one who has not accomplished his aim,”  and after going up into the firmament, while standing there, he said this to him:
“Do not renounce (the world), Great Champion, seven days from now the divine Wheel Treasure  will certainly appear to you.”
The Murderer speaking thus, the Greatly Famous One said this to him: “Who are you?” and Māra showed himself.
“Māra, I know my divine Wheel will appear! (But) you must go! Do not stand here! I have no need of Sovereignty,
but, after making the whole of the ten-thousand world system resound, I will become a Buddha, the Sole Leader of the World.”
This being said by the Great Being, (Māra), being unable to accept this supreme utterance himself, vanished right there and then.
Having said this to the Wicked One, he dwelt on having given up the glory of the Universal Monarchy, as though it were a lump of spit in the early morning.
The Maruts going to pay worship, having gathered at once in that place, bearing a thousand jewelled torches,
went before and behind him, and on both sides, the Supaṇṇas and the Great Snakes  worshipping right there,
while a truly great army of Suras, delighting in charming play, like a shower of flowers raining down from the sky, came here from the ten-thousand world-systems, having supremely subtle bodies and being greatly elated they roamed about.
Going along that charming path, wherein there were fragrant and excellent flowers and sweet incense powder, and golden flags and so on blazing forth, the speedy noble-bodied kings of horses, impeded by the flowers and so on, were not able to go quickly.
While the great festival on the delightful path was continuing in this way, going thirty leagues along the road for the rest of the night,
after reaching the bank of the river Anomā, descending from the back of the horse onto the spotless, cool, sandy ground,
and resting (he said): “Channa, take this horse and the things that were brought and go (back) to our city.” Having said this,
while standing in that place the Great Champion, with a very sharp sword having cut off his fragrantly perfumed top-knot, threw it into the sky.
(Sakka) the Thousand-Eyed One, desiring to worship it with his head, having risen into the sky, received the Hair Relic in a charming, golden casket,
and installed it in the spotless Tāvatiṁsa (Heaven), in the top of the Crest-Jewel Shrine, which was about a league in height, made of sapphire, and was such as brings joy to the eyes.
Having taken the supreme eight requisites (of a monk)  which had been brought by the Brahmas, he also threw his excellent clothes into the sky.
The Great Brahmā having caught it, made a delightful twelve league high Clothes Shrine in the Brahmā worlds.
After going to the mango grove by the name of Anupiya, and spending therein seven days in the bliss of having gone forth, from there
having gone thirty leagues along the road in just one day, and reached Rājagaha, the well-conducted Hero roamed for alms.
At this supreme, rare and extraordinary sound the Suras, Asuras,  and Brahmās worshipped the Lord of Men, and a great number of people, taking the Lord of Men, went to the well-prepared city called Kapila.
The Earth, though strong enough to bear the weight, the very great weight, of the forests of trees, Meru the King (of mountains), and also all the waters of the ocean, as though unable (to bear) the weight of the virtues of that most excellent (being), at the moment of his birth trembled.
Dogs sported with deer, crows gleefuly (sported) with owls, snakes  with Supaṇṇa Kings, and gangs of cats (sported) with rats.
Just as parents with their children, so animals associated with (lions, known as) the Lord of Animals;   and just as the teacher Sarabhaṅga’s arrow (returned to him),  so ships which had gone to foreign lands returned to their home lands.
The great ocean was decorated with variously coloured glorious lotuses; the foaming waves became peaceful, and its waters approached exceeding sweetness.
The sky became overcrowded with hanging lotuses in full bloom; the birds abandoned their flight through the air, and the rivers stood still, and did not flow.
As a bride becomes supremely beautiful through loving intercourse, so the Earth (became supremely beautiful) through a meeting with an out-of-season cloud, being adorned with the great adornment of countless flowers rained down as it were by the Maruts.
Lordly trees were surrounded by creepers and slender women bearing delightful blooming flowers; and the clearings (in all) directions were very resplendent, having the sky filled with excellent fragrant blossoms.
The whole sky, being scented with very fragrant perfumes was most delightful; and the Sura and Asura Lords clad in festive clothes went about joined together in song.
All people spoke kindly; it was clear in all directions; elephants trumpeted, lions roared, and there was the neighing of horses.
Flutes, vīṇās, and the drum of the Suras in the sky each let loose their charming sounds; and the various world-elements with their lordly mountains were pervaded by delightful and great rays of light.
A pleasing, fragrant, soft, cool breeze blew pleasantly over all the people; people oppressed in their limbs with countless diseases and so on were freed therefrom and became happy.
The worlds  were aroused and became delightful with an immeasureable covering  of light; the waters having broken free from the earth flowed along; and the limbs of cripples were straightened out.
The blind saw the lame dancing and sporting; and the deaf heard the delightful songs of the dumb.
Even as far as the fires of Avīci hell (all) became cool, therefore those born in water rejoiced, and creatures of the earth  made merry.
For Petas who were overwhelmed with hunger and thirst there was food; and in the unbroken darkness of space (there was) light.
In the sky the multitude of stars, the moon, and the sun shone surpassingly bright, as also the treasures hidden in the earth.
Large blossoming lotuses, having the five variegated colours, after breaking through the surface of the earth, sprang up one on top of the other.
Without being played upon, without being struck, kettle-drums, ornaments and so on let loose an endlessly sweet sound on earth.
Men bound with chains and so forth were loosened therefrom; the doors and windows in the (various) abodes in the world opened by themselves.
Because of that the rejoicing hosts of Devas in the Tāvatiṁsa Abode went around sporting, throwing up their clothes and so forth.
Then King Suddhodana, having heard: “My child, after attaining supreme and Complete Awakening, desiring the welfare of the world, has set the True Dhamma wheel rolling, and recently has been living in the delightful Bamboo Wood, and depending on Rājagaha for support”, desiring to see his own son, who had become a Buddha, nine times sent nine ministers accompanied by nine thousand warriors into the presence of the Great Seer.
They, after going and hearing the Dhamma-King’s incomparable preaching, and obtaining the supreme benefit,  didn't give the message.
Seeing that not even one of them (returned), having summoned his good servant and great minister Kāludāyī, who always greatly delighted in (the thought) of the going forth ordination,
said to him: “After carrying away my great treasure of a son by whatever means, delight my eyes (by bringing him into my presence).”
Then he sent him also together with a thousand warriors, and having gone with that group, he, after hearing the Teacher’s beautiful preaching,
attaining the road to Worthiness, and ordaining, having put his hands to his head in reverential salutation, while worshipping that Best of Men, the Sambuddha (said):
“The season of Spring has produced very colourful and delightful red buds and foliage, a thousand delightful branches together with glorious, and very green  coloured leaves,
trees crowded with various extraordinarily fragrant and variegated blossoms, many very beautiful animals, and flocks of birds singing in the excellent groves,
and countless delightful lakes, full of very blue and agreeable waters, having unstained and extremely white pearly sandbanks, with a multitude of sweet-sounding grey geese, decorated with very fragrant blue, white, copper-coloured, and red lotuses, with a variety of trees along the banks, resplendent with rows of flowers and blossoms,
having plains covered with very fresh and very green lawns, as though covered with pleasing lapis-lazuli, and skies full of light breezes.
Reverend Sir! It is time to go to the Royal City called after Kapila,  which is prosperous with people having endless riches”, beginning in this way he praised the beauty of the journeying road.
The Happy One, after hearing this great praise, said: “Udāyin, why did you praise the beauty of this journey?” Then Udāyī said this to that Safety-Maker:
“Reverend Sir, your father the famous and excellent King Suddhodana wishes to have sight of you; let the Sole Protector of the World’s Benefit, the Realised One, be of assistance to his relatives.”
When He who delights in the World’s Benefit had heard (Udāyin’s) sweet utterance, (He said): “It is good, Udāyin, I will (indeed) assist my relatives.”
Travelling along adorned with his red robe, like Golden (Mount) Meru, like the spotless, full moon surrounded by stars,
the glorious and Victorious Buddha, together with twenty-thousand  Such-Like (Arahats),  with their minds at peace, living day by day, going along the road league by league for sixty leagues (in all), within two months arrived at the excellent city of his birth.
The Buddha, whose face was shining like a pure lotus flower, luminous like a new sun having a hundred rays, with broad feet marked with the (auspicious) wheel, the abode of (good) conduct,  the Sole Refuge of the Three Worlds, having a peaceful and excellent body,
was greatly worshipped by the Masters of the Earth beginning with Suddhodana, with full golden water-pots, pandals, perfumed smoke, and flowers, small bamboo drums, and so on, and with variegated umbrellas, flags, and yaktail fans.
The Lord of Sages, having reached that delightful and well-prepared city, which was decorated with sweet smelling flowers and blossoms, crowded with broad terraces,
having water-born flowers strewn over the pure waters of the tanks, resplendent with a multitude  of pleasing  and colourful peacocks,
entered the delightful and supreme Banyan Monastery, which was decorated with noble  and charming walkways, mansions, and creeper-covered pavillions.
After pondering thus: “this Siddhattha is our son or our grandson” and so on, the Sākiyas with their inborn and stubborn pride,
said to their various children and Princes: “You may worship Siddhattha, but we will not worship him.”
Having said that and placed them at the front, they sat down. Then the Tamer of the untrained, the Trained One, the Sole Eye of the Three Worlds,
knowing their intention (thought): “My relatives do not worship me, but I will now make them worship”, and immediately
after entering the (fourth) absorption, which is the basis for deep powers, and rising from that absorption, like a golden swan, the golden-coloured Light-Maker,
that Noble Sage, after ascending into the sky, pleasing the eyes of all beings, being unlike others, delighting greatly in that place, performed the supreme (Double) Miracle, which was like the Miracle (performed) at the root of the Gaṇḍamba Tree.
Having seen that wonder, with the joy and delight that had arisen, the Sole Leader of the Sakya Lineage, the Best of Men, King Suddhodana
adorned his charming hair with the Teacher’s lotus feet; and all the Sākiyās did likewise.
The Hero, when the rain of flowers had finished, having made the delightful Dhamma-rain fall, raised up the minds of all beings on earth.
The Hero, after giving his promise to the Ruler of Men, approaching the place for his striving, going through extraordinary difficulties, and seeing that nothing came of it,
having consumed material food and drink and regained bodily strength, like a Sura he reached the root of the Goatherder’s Banyan (tree).
While the Brilliant One was sitting facing the East, through the (radiant) colour of his body the Banyan (tree) became golden-coloured.
A beautiful lady named Sujātā (Well-Born), wishing for success, took a golden bowl with milk-rice on her head, and bowing (thinking):
“I will straight away give an offering to the excellent Tree-Deva who has taken residence in this place”, after going and seeing the Supreme Man,
with the thought: “This is a Deva!”, with heart uplifted, after giving the bowl of rice to the Excellent One, (said): “Sire! In the same way as my hopes have been successful, may yours also succeed.”
Having spoken this word, the noble lady left that place. Then that Noble Sage, after taking the bowl of rice,
going to the bank of the (river) Nerañjarā, and eating that excellent food, cast her delightful bowl against the stream.
Having seen that just as a lotus grove does not go to destruction by the falling of snowflakes; so his treasures did not go to destruction through his supreme generosity,
like a lordly elephant from an raging forest fire, after departing from the group of his crying relatives and from his delightful house,
the Great Champion went to the Great Himālayas,  which are perfumed with yellow sandalwood, camphor, and aloe;
adorned with blossoming champaka, asoka, and trumpet-flower trees; embellished with arecanut, punnāga, and ironwood trees,  and so on;
crowded with various animals, such as lions, tigers, hyenas, elephants, leopards, monkeys and horses;
(filled) with the song of mynah, golden geese, (ordinary) geese, herons, parrots, and with doves, cuckoos, blue jays,  and so on;
which are frequented by such beings as the Yakkha, Rakkhasa, Gandhabba, Deva, and Dānavaka;  siddha, and vijjādhara;
which shine with vast, charming, realgar  and sapphire mountain ranges; and places  having uncountable silver and gold, and so forth;
which has innumerable lakes and tanks having golden and jewelled staircases  - a beautiful place, having countless Deva-maidens playing in the clearings -
with hundreds of waterfalls covered with cool mist; shimmering with delightful and colourful kinnaras  and snakes;
having peacocks dancing in the groves; arbours of vine; and adorned with enclosures covered with white sand;
having countless stores of treasures, with gold, jewels, pearls, and so on - an abode for people who are longing for merit as bees are longing for the blossoms of flowers.
The Hero of Great Strength, having defeated the strength of Māra in this way, while the sun continued (to shine), sat down on the immoveable seat.
The Supreme One, after purifying his knowledge of former existences in the first watch, and the divine-eye in the middle watch,
and having dived into that part of knowledge (which deals with) Causal Origination in the last watch, meditated on it in countless ways.
At the rise of dawn, after making it resound throughout the hundred world elements, the lotus-eyed Perfect Sambuddha, awoke completely, and after becoming a Buddha,
with great joy he uttered this matchless exalted utterance: “Through countless births in Saṁsāra I have wandered...” and so on.
Having destroyed the great delusion, on the second day, together with the Saṅgha, he entered the supreme city (and went) on systematic almsround,
and in every place he stepped upon his lotus-like feet were received by the countless lotuses that had sprung up.
Then through the rays  of light (emanating from) his body the city gates, watchtowers, mansions, ramparts and so on in that place themselves became golden.
The One who Makes Light for the World, the Champion, the Peaceful One, the Tamed One, the Light-Maker, having entered the city streets, walked for alms,
and the faithful Yasodharā, while standing in her delightful palace, having seen (him) through the latticed window,  being overcome with love, she,
after calling the noble and resplendent Rāhula, who was decorated with splendid jewels, and pointing Him out, saying: “This is your father”,
going to the residence of the famous Suddhodana, surrounded by countless women, and worshipping him,
said: “Your Majesty, formerly your son has walked through this city with the grace of the Lord of Gods, but now he walks for alms from house to house!” Having said (that), with her wide eyes full of a great many joyful tears, she returned to her palace.
Then the Lord of all other Lords of Men, decorated like the Lord (of the Gods, Sakka), trembling, having quickly gone into the vicinity of the Victor, (said):
“Noble Sakyan! This is not (the way of) your lineage! Do not roam about, do not roam about! In our lineage, Son, not even one King in former times roamed about for alms!”
The Lord of Men having spoken thus, the Lord of Sages, the Head of all Virtues, (said): Great King, that is your lineage! But my tradition
is the Lineage of the Buddhas”, and so he declared his lineage (to be that of) the Sambuddhas; then while standing in that very place he preached the Supreme Dhamma (saying):
“One should rise up, one should not be heedless, (one should live) the Dhamma...” and so on, and having spoken this supreme, delightful verse, which brought bliss to the ears,
the Supreme One, having given (the King) a taste of the foremost insight,  and satisfied him, being requested by (the King) went to his residence.
The Master of the Earth, having satisfied with sweet rice and drinks the Supreme Man, together with twenty-thousand Such-Like (Arahats),
together with the gold-like Kings, with their bright bejewelled crowns, having worshipped Him with reverential salutation, sat down in the vicinity of the Victor.
Also countless hundreds of the King’s beautiful women having gone, being permitted by the Lord of Men, sat down near Him. Then
the Ornament of the Three Worlds, the Victor, having preached the sweet Dhamma (thought): “If today I do not go to Bimbā’s palace,
her heart through pity might break.” (Therefore) the One who has Pity as his Abode took the pair of Chief Disciples (Sāriputta and Moggallāna), and went to his Father’s palace.
The Buddha, having entered (the palace), with his six coloured halo shining forth like the sun sat down in that place on the Buddha seat.
Bimbā, whose body was resplendent with rays of light like one powdered with realgar, whose lips were as red as the Bimba fruit,  trembling like a golden creeper, went near to the Teacher.
The touch of the Teacher’s feet, like supremely cool water, extinguished the great firey grief (burning) in the fuel of her heart.
The King told the Teacher of the very many virtues of Bimbā;  and the Lord of Sages related the Candakiṇṇara Jātaka.
Then these three festivals arrived for Prince Nanda: his wedding, consecration, and house-warming.
The Light-Maker, just prior to the festivals, having led (Nanda) to the delightful and supreme (Nigrodha) monastery, even without his consent gave him the going-forth (ordination).
Seeking his inheritance, his son the Prince Rāhula, wearing his glorious Prince’s ornaments, while following (Him), (said):
“To me even your shadow is pleasant”, and speaking with his lovely voice (he said): “Give me my inheritance, give me my inheritance!”
Having led him to the monastery, and given him the inheritance of the upsurpassed True Dhamma Treasure, (the Buddha) gave the going forth (ordination) to the devout (Rāhula).
Having left (Kapilavatthu), the Fortunate (Buddha) Sun, spreading the rays of the True Dhamma on the lotus-like people in this place and that place, once again entered Rājagaha.
The Fortunate (Buddha) lived in the beautiful Cool Wood, which is crowded with beautiful flowers and trees in the nearby woods, and has a multitude of lotuses and waterlilies in its shining lakes, and many covered walkways with white sand.
Then the best of merchants, Sudatta by name,  taking many of his wares, having gone from (his home at) Sāvatthī to the house of his merchant friend in the pleasant Rājagaha,
Having heard his auspicious (friend) say “A Buddha, a Lord of Men has arisen in the world”, his heart uplifted with the joy that had arisen, thinking that night had became day,
having departed from that place, the darkness along the main road being dispelled by the power of the Devas, after going to that very delightful Cool Wood, and seeing the Great Seer resplendent like the full moon, blazing forth like a lamp post, bringing joy to the eyes, and accepting on his head His supreme and colourful feet, the Devout One (Sudatta),
after listening to the profound, subtle, spotless, noble Dhamma, which is adorned with a thousand methods, and attaining the fruit of Stream-Entry,
inviting the Leader of the World, the Sambuddha, together with the Saṅgha, and giving them a pleasurable alms-meal furnished with (good) colour, smell, and taste,
and obtaining the Teacher’s promise for his coming to the noble town of Sāvatthī, he, while going along the path,
league after league having had built charming, beautifully-made, glorious, excellent monasteries, and given a great deal of wealth (to support them),
and having returned to Sāvatthī, which is adorned with a hundred palaces, (and is) resplendent with decorated towers, city gates, and so on, which in every way surely mocks the city of the Lord of the Devas, being endowed with every good fortune, and adorned with dance and song, and so on,
(thinking): “Where will He, the Leader of the World, the Fortunate One, live?” and looking on all sides for a place that was suitable for a monastery,
he saw Prince Jeta’s garden, which was like (Sakka’s garden) Nandana, being furnished with shade and water and so forth. The Greatly Famous One having bought that piece of land by covering it with ten million gold (pieces), in that noble place, which carried off the minds of men and immortals,
had built the very large Fragrant Cottage (for the Buddha), which was always agreeable with the sound of nets of jingling bells, crowded with golden turrets, delightful with countless jewels, having a sunshade cover adorned with strings of pearls, most resplendent with many-coloured canopies, decorated with flowers, and so forth — a noble, beautiful crown for the earth;
and for the Victor’s (spiritual) sons also (he built) large dwellings, well-decorated with many glorious beds, seats and canopies, pavillions, walkways and so on, which all the time were captivating the mind’s eye;
then also lakes having soft, spotless, white sand, with railings and large charming enclosures, having pleasing and very cool water, and crowded with sweet-smelling white water lilies and lotuses.
The merchant had the best of monasteries made, the delightful Jeta’s Wood by name, which was resplendent with full-blossoming Sāl, Asana, Asoka, Iron Wood, Alexandrian Laurel, Arecanut (trees) and so on;
which was guarded by a superb, delightful rampart shaped like a lordly snake’s hood, as large as Mount Kelāsa. That monastery shone like a wish-fulfilling jewel that accomplished all the people’s desires and needs.
Then the feeder of the Protector (of the World)  sent a messenger (to ask) for the Lord of Sages coming. The Teacher, having heard the messenger’s communication,
at that time surrounded by a great Saṅgha of monks, having departed from that place, in stages reached the supreme Sāvatthī.
Countless gloriously handsome princes, having taken flags, like Suras, went out (from Sāvatthī and stood) in front of the Teacher.
Then behind them young women, taking charming and full water-pots, like Deva-maidens, in the same way went out.
Likewise the merchant’s wife, having taken full bowls, with countless hundreds of women ornamented with countless hundreds of ornaments,
and the great merchant (Anāthapiṇḍika) together with hundreds of (other) great merchants came before the Leader, and the Great Champion was worshipped by them in countless ways.
Because of his delightful six-coloured halo the noble city (of Sāvatthī) took on a golden hue, (and) the Lord of Sages, the Happy One, with well-formed limbs, entered the Jeta’s Wood Monastery.
(Anāthapiṇḍika said): “I give this monastery to the Saṅgha of the four quarters with the Sambuddha at their head”, and having poured excellent perfumed water from a golden jug on the Teacher’s charming lotus-like hands, he donated the charming and beautiful monastery.
After accepting that very delightful, excellent monastery, (the Buddha) sat down on a priceless and beautiful seat; the Lord of the Lords of Men, the Sole Leader of the Three Worlds, who brings pleasing joy to the three worlds,
the Famous One, the Benefactor, the Great Seer, the Teacher preached to that lordly merchant Sudatta by name on the great advantages of giving a monastery (together) with gifts to those without protection.
Except for the One of Extensive Wisdom, the Sole Protector of the Three Worlds, what man would be able to talk about the great advantages of giving a monastery, even if he harnessed countless thousands of mouths?
Thus He of Extensive Fame, having taught the Dhamma to (Anāthapiṇḍika), and also rejoicing the minds of all the people, having gone here and there, lived beating the great Dhamma drum, which has a supremely sweet sound.
Moreover, monks, a monk, in regard to this very body,
however placed, however disposed, reflects by way of the elements:
Just as though, monks, a clever butcher, or a butcher’s apprentice,
after slaughtering a cow, were sitting down at a crossroads after dividing it into portions;
even so, monks, a monk in regard to this very body,
however placed, however disposed, reflects by way of the elements:
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, it’s as if a monk
might see a body thrown into a charnel ground,
a heap of bones more than a year old.
He then compares it with his very own body (thinking):
‘This body also has such a nature, has such a constitution, has not gone beyond this.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, a monk, having abandoned pleasure and abandoned pain,
and with the previous passing away of mental happiness and sorrow,
without pain, without pleasure, and with complete purity of mindfulness owing to equanimity,
dwells having attained the fourth absorption.
He sits suffusing his very own body with complete purity that comes from a cleansed mind,
so that there is no part of his body unpervaded by the complete purity that comes from a cleansed mind.
Just as if, monks, a man was sitting down after covering (his body) up to his head with a white cloth,
so that there is no part of his body uncovered by the white cloth.
Even so monks, a monk
sits suffusing his very own body with complete purity that comes from a cleansed mind,
so that there is no part of his body unpervaded by the complete purity that comes from a cleansed mind.
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, a monk while going knows “I am going”;
or, standing he knows “I am standing”; or, sitting he knows “I am sitting”;
or, while lying down he knows “I am lying down”;
or, in whatever way his body is disposed, he knows it is (disposed) in just that way.
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, a monk in going forwards, in going back, is one who practises with full awareness;
in looking ahead, or in looking around, he is one who practises with full awareness;
in bending or in stretching, he is one who practises with full awareness;
in bearing his double-robe, bowl, and (other) robes, he is one who practises with full awareness;
in eating, in drinking, in chewing, in tasting, he is one who practises with full awareness;
in passing stool and urine, he is one who practises with full awareness;
in going, in standing, in sitting; in sleeping, in waking; in talking, and in maintaining silence, he is one who practises with full awareness.
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Here, monks, a monk who has gone to the wilderness, or to the root of a tree,
or to an empty place, sits down.
After folding his legs crosswise, setting his body straight,
and establishing mindfulness at the front,
ever mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out.
While breathing in long, he knows “I am breathing in long”,
while breathing out long, he knows “I am breathing out long”,
while breathing in short, he knows “I am breathing in short”,
while breathing out short, he knows “I am breathing out short”,
he trains like this: experiencing the whole body I will breathe in,
he trains like this: experiencing the whole body I will breathe out,
he trains like this: making the bodily process calm I will breathe in,
he trains like this: making the bodily process calm I will breathe out.
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, it’s as if a monk
might see a body thrown into a charnel ground,
a skeleton, no longer having flesh and blood, bound together by tendons.
He then compares it with his very own body (thinking):
‘This body also has such a nature, has such a constitution, has not gone beyond this.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, it’s as if a monk
might see a body thrown into a charnel ground,
rotten bones that have become like powder.
He then compares it with his very own body (thinking):
‘This body also has such a nature, has such a constitution, has not gone beyond this.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, a monk in regard to this very body -
from the sole of the feet upwards, from the hair of the head down, bounded by the skin,
and full of manifold impurities - reflects (thus):
hairs of the head, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin,
flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys,
heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs,
intestines, mesentery, undigested food, excrement,
bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat,
tears, grease, spit, mucus, synovial fluid, urine.’
Just as though, monks, there were a bag open at both ends, full of various kinds of grain,
such as: hill rice, white rice, mung beans, kidney beans, sesame seeds, chickpeas;
and a man with good vision having opened it were to reflect (thus):
‘This is hill rice, this is white rice, these are mung beans, these are sesame seeds, these are chickpeas’;
even so, monks, a monk in regard to this very body -
from the sole of the feet upwards, from the hair of the head down, bounded by the skin,
and full of manifold impurities - reflects (thus):
hairs of the head, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin,
flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys,
heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs,
intestines, mesentery, undigested food, excrement,
bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat,
tears, grease, spit, mucus, synovial fluid, urine.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
When mindfulness related to the body, monks, is practised, developed, made much of,
carried on, established, maintained, augmented, and properly instigated,
these ten advantages are to be expected. Which ten?
He is one who has overcome liking and disliking, he is not overcome by disliking,
when disliking arises he dwells on having overcome it.
He is one who has overcome fear and fright, he is not overcome by fear and fright,
when fear and fright arise he dwells on having overcome it.
He is one who bears up with cold, heat, hunger, thirst,
gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, the heat (of the sun), and creeping things,
badly spoken, unwelcome ways of speaking;
and towards arisen bodily unpleasant feeling (that is)
sharp, harsh, bitter, disagreeable, unwanted, life-threatening,
he is one who endures it.
In regard to the four absorptions, the purest mentalities,
which are a pleasant living here and now, he is one who obtains (them) at will,
obtains (them) without difficulty, obtains (them) without trouble.
He experiences various kinds of psychic power:
having been one he becomes many;
having been many he becomes one;
he appears and disappears;
he goes unhindered through a wall, through a fence, through a mountain, as though in the sky;
he dives into and emerges from the earth, as though in water;
he crosses water without sinking, as though on earth;
he goes cross-legged though the sky, as though he were a bird with wings;
this moon and sun, which are so powerful, so majestic,
he touches, he strokes with his hand;
he exercises power as far as the Brahma worlds with his body.
With the divine ear-element which is purified and surpasses that of (normal) men he listens to both (kinds of) sounds:
of the divinities and of men, whether far or near.
He knows that with his mind he can read the minds of other beings, of other persons:
when a mind has passion he knows “the mind has passion”,
or when a mind is without passion he knows “the mind is without passion”;
or when a mind has hate he knows “the mind has hate”,
or when a mind is without hate he knows “the mind is without hate”;
or when a mind has delusion he knows “the mind has delusion”,
or when a mind is without delusion he knows “the mind is without delusion”;
or when a mind is collected he knows “the mind is collected”,
or when a mind is scattered he knows “the mind is scattered”;
or when a mind has become very great he knows “the mind has become very great”,
or when a mind has not become very great he knows “the mind has not become very great”;
or when a mind is surpassable he knows “the mind is surpassable”,
or when a mind is unsurpassable he knows “the mind is unsurpassable”;
or when a mind is concentrated he knows “the mind is concentrated”,
or when a mind is not concentrated he knows “the mind is not concentrated”;
or when a mind is liberated he knows “the mind is liberated”,
or when a mind is not liberated he knows “the mind is not liberated”.
He recollects various previous existences, such as:
one life, two lives, three lives, four lives, five lives,
ten lives, twenty lives, thirty lives, forty lives,
fifty lives, a hundred lives, a thousand lives, a hundred thousand lives,
innumerable aeons of devolution, innumerable aeons of evolution, innumerable aeons of devolution and evolution:
in such and such a place I had this name, this family, this class, this food,
this experience of pleasure and pain, this life term;
passing away from there I arose in another state of existence,
and in that place I had this name, this family, this class, this food,
this experience of pleasure and pain, this life term,
and passing away from there I arose here,
and so with their characteristics and with their details he recollects his various previous existences.
With the divine eye which is purified and surpasses that of (normal) men
he sees the passing away and arising of beings,
inferior, superior, beautiful, ugly, in a good destiny, in a bad destiny,
and he knows beings arise according to their (good and bad) actions.
Through the destruction of the pollutants, without pollutants, freed in mind, freed through wisdom,
he dwells having known, having directly experienced, and having attained (Nibbāna) himself in this very life.
When, monks, mindfulness related to the body is practised, developed, made much of,
carried on, established, maintained, augmented, and properly instigated,
these ten advantages are to be expected.”
and those monks were uplifted and greatly rejoiced in what was said by the Fortunate One.
Moreover, monks, it’s as if a monk
might see a body thrown into a charnel ground,
with bones no longer bound together, scattered in all directions,
with a hand-bone here, with a foot-bone there, with a knee-bone here,
with a thigh-bone there, with a hip-bone here, with a bone of the back there,
with the skull here.
He then compares it with his very own body (thinking):
‘This body also has such a nature, has such a constitution, has not gone beyond this.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, a monk, quite secluded from sense desires, secluded from unwholesome things,
having thinking, reflection, and the happiness and joy born of seclusion,
dwells having attained the first absorption.
He floods his very own body all through with the happiness and joy born of seclusion,
he floods it all round, completely fills it, and completely suffuses it,
so that there is no part of his body that is unpervaded by the happiness and joy born of seclusion.
Just as if, monks, a clever bath attendant or bath attendant’s apprentice,
having sprinkled bath-powder on a brass plate with water,
would knead his bathing ball until it has become completely drenched,
soapy and slippery to the touch both inside and outside, but (still) it does not overflow with soap.
Even so, monks, a monk
floods his very own body all through with the happiness and joy born of seclusion,
he floods it all round, completely fills it, and completely suffuses it,
so that there is no part of his body unpervaded by the happiness and joy born of seclusion.
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, a monk, with the fading away of joy dwells equanimous,
mindful, fully aware, experiencing happiness through the body,
about which the Noble Ones declare: ‘He dwells pleasantly, mindful, and equanimous,’
and dwells having attained the third absorption.
He floods his very own body all through with happiness but without joy,
he floods it all round, completely fills it, and completely suffuses it,
so that there is no part of his body unpervaded by happiness but without joy.
Just as if, monks, in a pond full of water-lilies or a pond full of lotuses or a pond full of white lotuses
some of those water-lilies or lotuses or white lotuses,
born in the water, flourishing in the water, not rising above water, which are nourished from inside the depths,
would from the top unto the root be flooded with cool water,
flooded all round, completely filled, and completely suffused,
so that there are no water-lilies or lotuses or white lotuses
that are unpervaded by the cool water.
Even so monks, a monk
floods his very own body all through with happiness but without joy,
he floods it all round, completely fills it, and completely suffuses it,
so that there is no part of his body unpervaded by happiness but without joy.
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, with the calming down of thinking and reflection,
with internal clarity, and one-pointedness of mind,
being without thinking, without reflection, having the happiness and joy born of concentration,
he dwells having attained the second absorption.
He floods his very own body all through with the happiness and joy born of concentration,
he floods it all round, completely fills it, and completely suffuses it,
so that there is no part of his body that is unpervaded by the happiness and joy born of concentration.
Just as if, monks, there were a lake with water rising from the depths,
and water does not flow into it from the East,
nor does water flow into it from the West,
nor does water flow into it from the North,
nor does water flow into it from the South,
and nor does the (rain) god from time to time send a good shower,
and then from those cool streams of water, after rising from that lake,
would flood the lake with cool water all through,
would flood it all round, completely fill it, and completely suffuse it,
so that there is no part of the lake that is unpervaded by the cool water.
Even so monks, a monk
floods his very own body all through with the happiness and joy born of concentration,
he floods it all round, completely fills it, and completely suffuses it,
so that there is no part of his body unpervaded by the happiness and joy born of concentration.
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then amongst many monks,
after returning from the alms-round after the meal,
assembling together, and sitting in the attendance hall,
this conversation arose:
“Wonderful, friend, marvellous, friend,
* that this was said by the Fortunate One, who knows, who sees, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha:
‘Mindfulness related to the body, when it has been developed and made much of yields great fruit and brings great advantages’ ”,
but this conversation amongst those monks was left unfinished.
Then the Fortunate One, having risen from seclusion in the evening time,
went to the assembly hall,
and after going, he sat down on the prepared seat.
Having sat down the Fortunate One addressed the monks, (saying):
“What is the talk about, monks, amongst those who are sitting here at present,
and what is the conversation that you left unfinished?”
“Here, reverend Sir, after returning from the alms-round after the meal,
assembling together, and sitting in the attendance hall,
this conversation arose:
‘Wonderful, friend, marvellous, friend,
* that this was said by the Fortunate One, who knows, who sees, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha:
“Mindfulness related to the body, when it has been developed and made much of yields great fruit and brings great advantages” ’,
this conversation amongst us was left unfinished, then the Fortunate One arrived.”
“And how, monks, does mindfulness related to the body when it has been developed and made much of
yield great fruit and bring great advantages?
Moreover, monks, it’s as if a monk
might see a body thrown into a charnel ground,
a skeleton, without flesh, smeared with blood, bound together by tendons.
He then compares it with his very own body (thinking):
‘This body also has such a nature, has such a constitution, has not gone beyond this.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, it’s as if a monk
might see a body thrown into a charnel ground,
being eaten by crows, or being eaten by hawks, or being eaten by vultures,
or being eaten by dogs, or being eaten by jackals,
or being eaten by various kinds of worms.
He then compares it with his very own body (thinking):
‘This body also has such a nature, has such a constitution, has not gone beyond this.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
For whoever, monks, mindfulness related to the body has been developed and made much of
for him are included whatever wholesome things there are partaking of understanding.
Just as, monks, for whoever has encompassed the great ocean with his mind
for him are included whatever small rivers there are that flow to the ocean,
just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body has been developed and made much of
for him are included whatever wholesome things there are partaking of understanding.
Māra finds an opening in him, Māra gets an opportunity with him.
Just as, monks, a person might throw a heavy stone ball into a mass of soft clay,
what do you think, monks, would that heavy stone ball
get an opening into that mass of soft clay?”
“Yes, reverend Sir.”
“Just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body is undeveloped and has not been made much of
Māra finds an opening in him, Māra gets an opportunity with him.
Just as if, monks, there were a dry piece of wood from a dead tree
then a person might come along and having taken an upper kindling-stick,
(thinking): ‘I will kindle a fire, I will make heat’,
what do you think, monks, that person,
after taking that upper kindling-stick to that dry piece of wood from a dead tree,
while rubbing it might he kindle a fire, might he make heat?”
“Yes, reverend Sir.”
“Just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body is undeveloped and has not been made much of
Māra finds an opening in him, Māra gets an opportunity with him.
Just as if, monks, there was an empty, hollow water jar placed on a stand,
and a person would come after taking a load of water,
what do you think, monks, would that person
be able to pour water into it?”
“Yes, reverend Sir.”
“Just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body is undeveloped and has not been made much of
Māra finds an opening in him, Māra gets an opportunity with him.
For whoever, monks, mindfulness related to the body has been developed and made much of
Māra does not find an opening in him, Māra does not get an opportunity with him.
* Just as if, monks, a person would throw a light ball of string
at a crossbar of a door made out of solid heartwood,
what do you think, monks, would that person
be able to pierce the crossbar of a door made out of solid heartwood with that light ball of string?”
“Certainly not, reverend Sir.”
“Just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body is developed and has been made much of
Māra does not find an opening in him, Māra does not get an opportunity with him.
Just as if, monks, there were a moist piece of wood still having sap,
then a person might come along and having taken an upper kindling-stick,
(thinking): ‘I will kindle a fire, I will make heat’,
what do you think, monks, that person,
after taking that upper kindling-stick to that moist piece of wood still having sap,
while rubbing it might he kindle a fire, might he make heat?”
“Certainly not, reverend Sir.”
“Just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body is developed and has been made much of
Māra does not find an opening in him, Māra does not get an opportunity with him.
Just as if, monks, there was a water jar full of water,
so brimful that a crow could drink from it, placed on a stand,
and a person would come after taking a load of water,
what do you think, monks, would that person
be able to pour water into it?”
“Certainly not, reverend Sir.”
“Just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body is developed and has been made much of
Māra does not find an opening in him, Māra does not get an opportunity with him.
whatever deep knowledge pertaining to things that can be realised
he turns his mind to for realisation of deep knowledge,
right there he attains a realisation of it, while there is a basis for mindfulness.
Just as if, monks, there was a full water jar, so brimful with water
that a crow could drink from it placed on a stand,
and a strong man were to disturb it from whatever place, would water flow out?”
“Yes, reverend Sir.”
“Just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body is developed and has been made much of
whatever deep knowledge pertaining to things that can be realised
he turns his mind to for realisation of deep knowledge,
right there he attains a realisation of it, while there is a basis for mindfulness.
Just as if, monks, there were a square pond on an even piece of ground,
bound with an embankment, full of water, so brimful that a crow could drink from it,
and a strong man were to loosen that embankment from whatever place, would water flow out?”
“Yes, reverend Sir.”
“Just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body is developed and has been made much of
whatever deep knowledge pertaining to things that can be realised
he turns his mind to for realisation of deep knowledge,
right there he attains a realisation of it, while there is a basis for mindfulness.
Just as if, monks, there were at the cross roads on good ground
a chariot yoked with well-bred horses standing and a goad made ready,
a clever driver, a trainer for those horses who need taming, after ascending,
grasping the reigns with his left hand,
grasping the goad with his right hand,
could lead them out and could lead them back whichever way he liked just as he liked.
Just so, monks, for whoever mindfulness related to the body is developed and has been made much of
whatever deep knowledge pertaining to things that can be realised
he turns his mind to for realisation of deep knowledge,
right there he attains a realisation of it, while there is a basis for mindfulness.
Moreover, monks, it’s as if a monk
might see a body thrown into a charnel ground,
dead for one day, or dead for two days, or dead for three days,
bloated, discoloured, having become quite rotten.
He then compares it with his very own body (thinking):
‘This body also has such a nature, has such a constitution, has not gone beyond this.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, it’s as if a monk
might see a body thrown into a charnel ground,
having white bones, like the colour of a conch.
He then compares it with his very own body (thinking):
‘This body also has such a nature, has such a constitution, has not gone beyond this.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
Moreover, monks, it’s as if a monk
might see a body thrown into a charnel ground,
a skeleton, with flesh and blood, bound together by tendons.
He then compares it with his very own body (thinking):
‘This body also has such a nature, has such a constitution, has not gone beyond this.’
For the one who is living heedful, ardent, and resolute in this way
whatever rushing thoughts there are dependent on the household life are given up,
and with the giving up of these the mind becomes internally stable,
settles down, becomes one-pointed, and concentrated.
Like this, monks, does a monk develop mindfulness related to the body.
I go to the Buddha for refuge,
I go to the Dhamma for refuge,
I go to the Sangha for refuge.
For a second time I go to the Buddha for refuge,
For a second time I go to the Dhamma for refuge,
For a second time I go to the Sangha for refuge.
For a third time I go to the Buddha for refuge,
For a third time I go to the Dhamma for refuge,
For a third time I go to the Sangha for refuge.
I undertake the training rule of refraining from killing living creatures,
I undertake the training rule of refraining from taking what has not been given,
I undertake the training rule of refraining from unchastity,
I undertake the training rule of refraining from false speech,
I undertake the training rule of refraining from liquor, wines, or intoxicants which cause heedlessness,
I undertake the training rule of refraining from eating at the wrong time,
I undertake the training rule of refraining from dances, songs, music, and watching shows,
I undertake the training rule of refraining from adorning or
I undertake the training rule of refraining from lofty or grand beds,
I undertake the training rule of refraining from accepting gold or money.
There are in this body:
hairs of the head, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin,
flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys,
heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs,
intestines, mesentery, undigested food, excrement,
bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat,
tears, grease, spit, mucus, synovial fluid, urine,
and the brain in the head.
All beings subsist on food.
Mind and body.
The three feelings.
The four noble truths.
The five constituent groups (of mind and body) that provide fuel for attachment.
The six internal sense spheres.
The seven factors of Awakening.
The noble path with eight factors.
The nine abodes of beings.
When endowed with ten factors he is said to be Worthy.
This is what I heard:
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthi
at Anāthapiṇḍika’s grounds in Jeta’s Wood.
Then a certain god, at the end of the night,
having lit up the whole of Jeta’s Wood with his surpassing beauty,
approached the Fortunate One,
and after approaching and worshipping the Fortunate One, he stood on one side.
While standing on one side that god recited this verse to the Fortunate One:
“Many are the gods and the men who have thought about the blessings
hoping for safety: now please say what is a supreme blessing.”
“Not associating with fools, with the wise associating,
honouring those worthy of honour: this is a supreme blessing.
Living in a suitable place, formerly having done good deeds,
having the right aspiration for oneself: this is a supreme blessing.
Having great learning and craft, being disciplined and well trained,
and whatever words are well spoken: this is a supreme blessing.
Attending on one’s mother and father, looking after one’s wife and sons,
having work that is not confusing: this is a supreme blessing.
Giving, and living by the Dhamma, and looking after one’s relatives,
(performing) actions that are blameless: this is a supreme blessing.
Abstaining, refraining from bad deeds, restraint from intoxicating drink,
being heedful regarding (all) things: this is a supreme blessing.
Having respect and being humble, being satisfied and grateful,
listening to the Dhamma at the right time: this is a supreme blessing.
Being patient and easily spoken to, having sight of ascetics,
discussing the Dhamma at the right time: this is a supreme blessing.
Austerity, living spiritually, insight into the noble truths,
and experiencing Emancipation: this is a supreme blessing.
He whose mind does not waver, when it is touched by things of this world,
being griefless, dustless, and secure: this is a supreme blessing.
Having done as here directed, being undefeated everywhere,
they go everywhere in safety: for them this is a supreme blessing.”
Whatever beings have come together here,
whether of the earth or in the firmament,
may the minds of all those beings be happy,
and may they listen carefully to what is said.
Therefore, all of you beings, be attentive,
be friendly towards this generation of men,
they who bring offerings by day and by night,
as they are heedful please protect them.
Whatever riches there are - here or hereafter
or in the heavens - that excellent treasure
is not equal unto the Realised One -
this excellent treasure is in the Buddha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
(Craving’s) end, dispassion, deathlessness, excellence -
that which the concentrated Sakyan sage attained -
there is nothing that is equal to the Dhamma -
this excellent treasure is in the Dhamma:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
That which the great Buddha praised as being pure -
the concentration said to have immediate (result) -
no equal to that concentration is found -
this excellent treasure is in the Dhamma:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Those eight individuals praised by the good -
there are these four pairs (of persons) -
those disciples of the Happy One are worthy of gifts,
those things that have been given to them have great fruit -
this excellent treasure is in the Sangha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Those who have firm minds that are devoted to
Gotama’s teaching, being free from sense desire -
having attained and entered the deathless -
are enjoying the stillness, obtained for free -
this excellent treasure is in the Sangha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Just as a locking post stuck fast in the earth
does not waver on account of the four winds,
just like this, I say, is the person who is true,
the one who sees the noble truths completely -
this excellent treasure is in the Sangha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Those who clearly distinguish the noble truths,
which have been well preached by the one with great wisdom,
no matter how great they become in heedlessness
still they do not take up an eighth existence -
this excellent treasure is in the Sangha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Together with his attainment of seeing (Emancipation)
there are three things that are given up:
embodiment view, uncertainty, and
whatever (grasping at) virtue and practices there is.
He is free from (rebirth in) the four lower worlds,
and he is incapable of the six great crimes -
this excellent treasure is in the Sangha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Whatever bad actions he performs
by way of body, speech, or mind,
he is incapable of covering it up:
this incapacity is said of one who has seen the state (of peace) -
this excellent treasure is in the Sangha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Just like a tall woodland tree crowned with flowers
in the summer months, in the early summer,
just like this he preached the Dhamma which is best,
which goes to Emancipation, the highest benefit -
this excellent treasure is in the Buddha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
The best one, knowing the best, gave the best, brought the best,
he preached the best Dhamma, which is unsurpassed -
this excellent treasure is in the Buddha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
The old is destroyed, and nothing new is produced,
their minds are unexcited by future rebirth,
they have destroyed the seeds, and have no desire for growth,
the wise are still, just as this lamp (is still) -
this excellent treasure is in the Sangha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Whatever beings have come together here,
whether of the earth or in the firmament,
we (all) revere the realised Buddha who is
honoured by gods and men - may there be safety!
Whatever beings have come together here,
whether of the earth or in the firmament,
we (all) revere the realised Dhamma which is
honoured by gods and men - may there be safety!
Whatever beings have come together here,
whether of the earth or in the firmament,
we (all) revere the realised Sangha which is
honoured by gods and men - may there be safety!
They stand beyond the walls, and at the junctions and crossroads,
they stand at the door-posts, having come to their (former) homes.
But when abundant food and drink, both staple and non-staple, is prepared,
no one remembers these beings, because of their (past unwholesome) deeds,
Thus those who are compassionate give to their (departed) relatives,
at the right time, pure, excellent, suitable drink and food.
(thinking): “May this go to our relatives, may our relatives be happy!”
Those who have gathered, the departed relatives who have assembled
around the food and drink, respectfully offer their thanks:
(saying): “ May our relatives live long! Those to whom we owe this gain,
for we have been honoured, those who give are not without reward!”
For in that place there is no ploughing, and cattle-rearing is not found there,
similarly there is no trading, or buying and selling of gold.
The departed in that place who have died, (have to) subsist on gifts.
Just as water that rains on the highlands, flows down to the lowlands,
so too what has been given here is of benefit to the departed.
Just as rivers that are full (flow and) fill up the ocean,
so too what has been given here is of benefit to the departed.
(Thinking): “He gave to me, he worked for me, he was my relative, my friend, my companion,”
he should give gifts for the departed, remembering what they have done before.
For no tears, or grief, or any other lamentations,
are of any use to the departed, as long as their relatives continue (grieving) in this way.
But that gift that has been given, and well placed in the Sangha,
is of benefit to them for a long time, immediately it is of benefit.
This then is the definition of a relative’s duties -
(and by this) great honour has been done to the departed,
strength has also been given to the monks,
and no little merit has been produced by you!
A man stores his savings in a deep pit close to water (thinking):
“When a duty or need has arisen it will be there to help me,
to free me from a king if slandered, or from molestation
from a thief, or from a debt, or famine, or accident.”
For this kind of help, savings are stored up in the world.
Although it is well stored in a deep pit, close to water,
still, it cannot help him in all things on every occasion,
for perhaps those savings are removed from that place, or he forgets the signs (telling where they lie),
or nāgas take them away, or yakkhas carry them off,
or the heirs he dislikes extract them unseen,
and when his merit comes to an end all of it will be destroyed.
But that woman or man who through giving, virtue,
restraint, and self-control has well stored up his savings,
(placing them) in a shrine, or in the Sangha, or in an individual, or a guest,
or in his mother or father, also in an elder brother,
those savings are well stored up, they follow one, they do not decay.
(Riches) he gives up when he has to leave (this life) but this goes along (with him).
It is not shared with others, no thief carries those savings away,
the wise man should make merit, (for) those savings follow one along.
These savings satisfy every desire of gods and men,
whatever they wish for, through this (merit) they receive all.
A good appearance, a good voice, a good shape, a good form,
sovereignty, and a retinue, through this (merit) they receive all.
A local kingship, an empire, and whatever happiness a Wheel-Rolling (King) has,
also godly kingship in the heavens, through this (merit) they receive all.
Human good fortune, delight in the world of the gods,
even the attainment of Emancipation, through this (merit) they receive all.
With the attainment of (good) friends, devotion to systematic (thought),
there is the power of understanding and freedom, through this (merit) they receive all.
The discriminations, and the liberations, and whatever perfections the disciples have,
Independent Awakening, the Buddhas’ ground, through this (merit) they receive all.
So this is of great benefit, that is to say, the attainment of merit,
therefore the wise and intelligent (always) praise the making of merit.
What should be done by one skilful in good, who has comprehended the state of peace:
he ought to be able, straight, and upright, easy to speak to, meek, without conceit,
satisfied (with little), easy to support, free from duties, and light in living,
with faculties at peace, prudent, not forward, and greedless among the families,
he should not do the slightest thing whereby others who are wise might find fault (with him).
“(May all beings) be happy and secure, may all beings in their hearts be happy!
Whatsoever breathing beings there are - trembling, firm, or any other (beings),
whether they be long or great, of middle size, short, tiny, or of compact (body),
those who are seen, and those who are unseen, those who live far away, those who are near,
those who are born, and those who still seek birth - may all beings in their hearts be happy!”
No one should cheat another, nor should he despise anyone wherever they be,
he should not long for suffering for another because of anger or resentment.
In the same way as a mother would protect her son, her only son, with her life,
so toward all beings he should develop the measureless thought (of friendliness).
Towards the whole wide world he should develop the measureless thought of friendliness,
above, below, and across (the middle), without barriers, hate, or enemy.
Standing, walking, sitting, lying, for as long as he is without torpor,
he should be resolved on this mindfulness, for this, they say here, is the (true) spiritual life.
Without going back to (wrong) views, virtuous, and endowed with (true) insight,
having removed (all) greed for sense pleasures, he will never come to lie in a womb again.
The Ending of Proliferation
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the Buddha was sitting reviewing his own giving up of the concepts of identity that emerge from the proliferation of perceptions.
Then, understanding his own giving up of the concepts of identity that emerge from the proliferation of perceptions, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“There is no proliferation remaining in them,
the reins and bar are escaped;
the sage who lives without craving
is never scorned by the world with its gods.”
First: Clinging
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time most of the people in Sāvatthī overly clung to sensual pleasures. Lustful, greedy, tied, infatuated, they lived completely addicted to sensual pleasures.
Then several mendicants robed up in the morning and, taking their bowls and robes, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then, after the meal, when they returned from alms-round, they went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what was happening.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Clinging to sensual pleasures, to the chains of the senses,
blind to the faults of the fetters;
for sure, clinging to the fetters’ chains
they cannot cross the flood so vast.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Mahākaccāna was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight and mindfulness of the body well-established in himself.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Their mindfulness would always
be established in the body, constant:
‘It might not be, and it might not be mine,
It will not be, and it will not be mine.’
Meditating stage by stage on that,
in time they’d cross over clinging.”
First: Bhaddiya the Dwarf
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Sāriputta was educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring Venerable Bhaddiya the Dwarf with a Dhamma talk.
Then after being taught like this Bhaddiya’s mind was freed from defilements by not grasping.
The Buddha saw what had happened.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Above, below, everywhere free,
not contemplating ‘I am this’.
Freed like this, he has crossed the flood
not crossed before, so as to not be reborn.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Kosambi, in Ghosita’s Monastery.
Now at that time, while King Udena was visiting a park, his royal compound burned down. Five hundred women died, with Queen Sāmāvatī at their head.
Then several mendicants robed up in the morning and, taking their bowls and robes, entered Kosambi for alms.
Then, after the meal, when they returned from alms-round, they went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him had happened. They asked the Buddha,
“Sir, where have those laywomen been reborn in the next life?”
“Among those laywomen there were stream-enterers, once-returners, and non-returners.
None of those laywomen died without some fruit of the practice.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“The world is caught up in delusion,
but is looked on as making sense.
The fool caught up in attachment
is surrounded by darkness.
It seems as if eternal,
but for one who sees, there is nothing.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Mallas together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants when he arrived at a brahmin town of the Mallas named Thūṇa.
The brahmins and householders of Thūṇa heard:
“It seems the ascetic Gotama—a Sakyan, gone forth from a Sakyan family—while wandering in the land of the Mallas has arrived at Thūṇa, together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants.”
They filled the well with grass and chaff right to the top, thinking,
“Don’t let these shavelings, these fake ascetics drink the water.”
And then the Buddha left the road, went to the root of a tree, and sat down on the seat spread out.
When he was seated he said to Venerable Ānanda:
“Please, Ānanda, fetch me some water from that well.”
When he said this, Venerable Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“Just now, sir, the brahimns and householders of Thūṇa filled the well with grass and chaff right to the top, thinking,
‘Don’t let these shavelings, these fake ascetics drink the water.’
For a second time,
and for a third time, the Buddha said to Ānanda:
“Please, Ānanda, fetch me some water from that well.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. Taking his bowl he went to the well.
As he approached the well, all the grass and chaff erupted out of the well-mouth. The water stood transparent, unclouded, and clear right up to the top, seeming to overflow.
Then Venerable Ānanda thought,
“It’s incredible, it’s amazing! The Realized One has such psychic power and might!
For when I approached this well, all the grass and chaff erupted out of the well-mouth. The water stood transparent, unclouded, and clear right up to the top, seeming to overflow.”
Gathering a bowl of drinking water he went back to the Buddha, and said to him,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing! The Realized One has such psychic power and might!
For when I approached that well, all the grass and chaff erupted out of the well-mouth. The water stood transparent, unclouded, and clear right up to the top, seeming to overflow.
Drink the water, Blessed One! Drink the water, Holy One!”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“What difference would a well make
if water is there all the time?
Having cut off craving at the root,
who would go out on a quest?”
Another Discourse with Bhaddiya the Dwarf
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then Venerable Bhaddiya the Dwarf, closely following several mendicants, approached the Buddha.
The Buddha saw Venerable Bhaddiya coming off in the distance—ugly, unsightly, deformed, and despised by most of the mendicants.
The Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, do you you see this monk coming—ugly, unsightly, deformed, and despised by most of the mendicants?”
“Yes, sir.”
“That mendicant is very mighty and powerful. It’s not easy to find an attainment that he has not already attained.
And he has realized the supreme end of the spiritual path in this very life. He lives having achieved with his own insight the goal for which gentlemen rightly go forth from the lay life to homelessness.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
‘With flawless wheel and white canopy,
the one-spoke chariot rolls on.
See it come, untroubled,
Second: Bhaddiya the Dwarf
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Sāriputta was educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring Venerable Bhaddiya the Dwarf with even more Dhamma talk, thinking that he was still a trainee.
The Buddha saw what was happening.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“They’ve cut the cycle, gone to the wishless;
the streams are dried, they flow no more.
Cut, the cycle no longer turns.
Just this is the end of suffering.”
The Ending of Craving
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Koṇḍañña Who Understood was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight, reviewing the freedom through the ending of craving.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“There is no root or ground or leaves for them,
so where would creepers sprout from?
That wise one is released from bonds:
who is worthy to criticize them?
Even the gods praise them,
and by Brahmā, too, they’re praised.”
Second: Clinging
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time most of the people in Sāvatthī clung to sensual pleasures. Lustful, greedy, tied, infatuated, attached, and blinded, they lived completely addicted to sensual pleasures.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
He saw how attached the people were.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Blinded by sensual pleasures, wrapped in a net,
they are smothered over by craving;
bound by the Kinsman of the Negligent,
like a fish caught in a funnel-net trap.
They proceed to old age and death,
like a calf suckling its mother.”
With Upasena
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
Then as Venerable Upasena Vaṅgantaputta was in private retreat this thought came to his mind:
“I’m so fortunate, so very fortunate! My Teacher is the Blessed One, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha.
Well explained is the teaching and training in which I have gone forth from the lay life to homelessness.
My spiritual companions are ethical and of good character.
I have fulfilled the precepts.
My mind is unified and serene.
I am perfected, my defilements ended.
I am of great might and power.
My life has been good, and my death will be good.”
Then, knowing what that Venerable Upasena was thinking, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“One who has no guilt in life,
nor grief at facing death:
that wise one who has seen the truth,
grieves not among the grieving.
For the mendicant with peaceful mind,
who has cut off craving for continued existence,
Transmigration through births is finished,
there are no future lives for them.”
The Spirit’s Blow
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
At that time Venerables Sāriputta and Moggallāna were staying near the pigeons’ alcove.
Now at that time Venerable Sāriputta was sitting outdoors in the moonlight, his head freshly shaven, having entered a certain state of immersion.
Now at that time two native spirits who were friends were on their way from the north to the south on some business.
They saw Sāriputta meditating there.
One of the spirits said to the other,
“I feel inspired, friend, to give this ascetic a blow on the head!”
The other spirit replied,
“Enough, friend, don’t hit the ascetic!
That is an eminent ascetic, powerful and mighty!”
For a second time the first spirit said to the other,
“I feel inspired, friend, to give this ascetic a blow on the head!”
For a second time, the other spirit replied,
“Enough, friend, don’t hit the ascetic!
That is an eminent ascetic, powerful and mighty!”
For a third time the first spirit said to the other,
“I feel inspired, friend, to give this ascetic a blow on the head!”
For a third time, the other spirit replied,
“Enough, friend, don’t hit the ascetic!
That is an eminent ascetic, powerful and mighty!”
Ignoring his friend, the first spirit struck Sāriputta.
The blow was so strong it would have felled a bull elephant seven or seven and a half cubits tall, or split apart a great mountain peak.
But then the spirit, crying out, “I burn, I burn!” fell into the Great Hell right there.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, Venerable Moggallāna saw that spirit striking Venerable Sāriputta.
He approached him and said,
“I hope you’re keeping well, reverend; I hope you’re alright. I hope that you are not in pain.”
“I am alright, Reverend Moggallāna;
but my head does hurt a little.”
“It’s incredible, Reverend Sāriputta, it’s amazing!
How mighty and powerful is Venerable Sāriputta!
Just now, a native spirit struck you on the head.
The blow was so strong it would have felled a bull elephant seven or seven and a half cubits tall, or split apart a great mountain peak.
Yet you say, ‘I am alright, Reverend Moggallāna;
but my head does hurt a little.’”
“It’s incredible, Reverend Moggallāna, it’s amazing!
How mighty and powerful is Venerable Moggallāna, in that he can even see a native spirit!
Whereas I can’t even see a mud-goblin right now.”
With clairaudience that is purified and superhuman, the Buddha heard that discussion between those two spiritual giants.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“One whose mind is like a rock,
steady, never trembling,
free of desire for desirable things,
not getting annoyed when things are annoying:
from where will suffering strike one
whose mind is developed like this?”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Kosambi, in Ghosita’s Monastery.
Now at that time Buddha lived crowded by monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen; by rulers and their ministers, and teachers of other paths and their disciples.
Crowded, he lived in suffering and discomfort.
Then he thought,
“These days I live crowded by monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen; by rulers and their ministers, and teachers of other paths and their disciples.
Crowded, I live in suffering and discomfort.
Why don’t I live alone, withdrawn from the group?”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Kosambi for alms.
After the meal, on his return from alms-round, he set his lodgings in order himself. Taking his bowl and robe, without informing his attendants or taking leave of the mendicant Saṅgha, he set out to go wandering alone towards Pārileyya, with no companion.
When he eventually arrived,
he stayed in a protected forest grove, at the foot of an auspicious sal tree.
A certain bull elephant was also living crowded by live crowded by other males, females, younglings, and cubs.
He ate the grass they’d trampled, and they ate the broken branches he dragged down. He drank muddy water, and after his bath the female elephants bumped into him.
Crowded, he lived in suffering and discomfort.
Then he thought,
“These days I live crowded by other males, females, younglings, and cubs. I eat the grass they’ve trampled, and they eat the broken branches I’ve dragged down. I drink muddy water, and after my bath the female elephants bump into me. Crowded, I live in suffering and discomfort.
Why don’t I live alone, withdrawn from the herd?”
So he left the herd and went to Pārileyya, where he approached the Buddha in the protected forest grove at the foot of an auspicious sal tree.
There he attended on the Buddha, clearing the vegetation from the place where the Buddha stayed, and using his trunk to set out water for drinking and washing.
Then as the Buddha was in private retreat this thought came to his mind,
“Formerly I lived crowded by monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen; by rulers and their ministers, and teachers of other paths and their disciples. Crowded, I live in suffering and discomfort.
But now I live uncrowded by monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen; by rulers and their ministers, and teachers of other paths and their disciples. Being uncrowded, I live in happiness and comfort.”
And to the bull elephant also this thought came to mind,
“Formerly I lived crowded by other males, females, younglings, and cubs. I ate the grass they’d trampled, and they ate the broken branches I’d dragged down. I drank muddy water, and after my bath the female elephants bumped into me. Crowded, I lived in suffering and discomfort.
But now I live uncrowded by other males, females, younglings, and cubs. I eat untrampled grass, and other elephants don’t eat the broken branches I have dragged down. I don’t drink muddy water, and the female elephants don’t bump into me after my bath. Being uncrowded, I live in happiness and comfort.”
Then, understanding his own seclusion and knowing what that elephant was thinking, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“The giant elephant,
with tusks like chariot-poles,
agrees heart to heart with the spiritual giant,
since each finds joy in the woods alone.”
With Meghiya
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Cālikā, on the Cālikā mountain.
Now, at that time Venerable Meghiya was the Buddha’s attendant.
Then Venerable Meghiya went up to the Buddha, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, I’d like to enter Jantu village for alms.”
“Please, Meghiya, go at your convenience.”
Then Meghiya robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Jantu village for alms.
After the meal, on his return from alms-round in Jantu village, he went to the shore of Kimikālā river.
As he was going for a walk along the shore of the river he saw a lovely and delightful mango grove.
When he saw this he thought,
“Oh, this mango grove is lovely and delightful! It’s truly good enough for meditation for a kinsman who wants to meditate.
If the Buddha allows me, I’ll come back to this mango grove to meditate.”
Then Venerable Meghiya went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened, adding,
“If the Buddha allows me, I’ll go back to that mango grove to meditate.”
When he had spoken, the Buddha said to him,
“We’re alone, Meghiya. Wait until another mendicant comes.”
For a second time Meghiya said to the Buddha,
“Sir, the Buddha has nothing more to do, and nothing that needs improvement.
But I have.
If you allow me, I’ll go back to that mango grove to meditate.”
For a second time the Buddha said,
“We’re alone, Meghiya. Wait until another mendicant comes.”
For a third time Meghiya said to the Buddha,
“Sir, the Buddha has nothing more to do, and nothing that needs improvement.
But I have.
If you allow me, I’ll go back to that mango grove to meditate.”
“Meghiya, since you speak of meditation, what can I say?
Please, Meghiya, go at your convenience.”
Then Meghiya got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right. Then he went to that mango grove, and, having plunged deep into it, sat at the root of a certain tree for the day’s meditation.
But while Meghiya was meditating in that mango grove he was beset mostly by three kinds of bad, unskillful thoughts, namely,
sensual, malicious, and cruel thoughts.
Then he thought,
“It’s incredible, it’s amazing!
I’ve gone forth from the lay life to homelessness out of faith,
but I’m still harassed by these three kinds of bad, unskillful thoughts:
sensual, malicious, and cruel thoughts.”
Then in the late afternoon, Venerable Meghiya came out of retreat and went to the Buddha. He bowed, sat down to one side, and told the Buddha what had happened.
“Meghiya, when the heart’s release is not ripe, five things help it ripen.
What five?
Firstly, a mendicant has good friends, companions, and associates.
This is the first thing …
Furthermore, a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
This is the second thing …
Furthermore, a mendicant gets to take part in talk about self-effacement that helps open the heart and leads solely to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment when they want, without trouble or difficulty. That is, talk about fewness of wishes, contentment, seclusion, aloofness, arousing energy, ethics, immersion, wisdom, freedom, and the knowledge and vision of freedom.’
This is the third thing …
Furthermore, a mendicant lives with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They are strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
This is the fourth thing …
Furthermore, a mendicant is wise. They have the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
This is the fifth thing that, when the heart’s release is not ripe, helps it ripen.
These are the five things that, when the heart’s release is not ripe, help it ripen.
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to be ethical …
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to take part in talk about self-effacement that helps open the heart …
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to be energetic …
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to be wise …
But then, a mendicant grounded on these five things should develop four further things.
They should develop the perception of ugliness to give up greed, love to give up hate, mindfulness of breathing to cut off thinking, and perception of impermanence to uproot the conceit ‘I am’.
When you perceive impermanence, the perception of not-self becomes stabilized. Perceiving not-self, you uproot the conceit ‘I am’ and attain extinguishment in this very life.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“With thoughts whether low or fine,
excitement in the mind arises.
Not understanding these thoughts in the mind,
one with mind astray runs all over the place.
Having understood these thoughts in the mind,
an awakened one—keen, restrained, and mindful—
has given up them all;
excitement in the mind no longer arises.”
With Sāriputta
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Sāriputta was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight. He was of few wishes, content, secluded, aloof, energetic, dedicated to the higher mind.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“A sage of higher consciousness, diligent,
training in the ways to sagacity:
there are no sorrows for one thus poised,
calm and ever mindful.”
With Piṇḍola
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Piṇḍola Bhāradvāja was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight. He was one who lived in the wilderness, ate only alms-food, wore rag robes, and owned just three robes. He was of few wishes, content, secluded, aloof, and energetic, an advocate of austerities, dedicated to the higher mind.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Not speaking ill nor doing harm;
restraint in the monastic code;
moderation in eating;
staying in remote lodgings;
commitment to the higher mind—
this is the instruction of the Buddhas.”
The Peacefulness of Sāriputta
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Sāriputta was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight, reviewing his own peacefulness.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“With mind at peace, so full of peace,
for a mendicant who has cut the cord,
transmigration through births is finished:
they’re freed from Māra’s bonds.”
With Sundarī
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the Buddha was honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed. And he received robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
And the mendicant Saṅgha was also honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed. And they received robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
But the wanderers who followed other paths were not honored, respected, esteemed, revered, and venerated. And they didn’t receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
Then those wanderers who followed other paths, unable to bear the esteem of the mendicant Sangha, approached the female wanderer Sundarī and said,
“Sister, are you able to do something for the welfare of your kin?”
“What can I do, venerables?
How can I help?
I’d even give my life for the welfare of my kin.”
“Well then, sister, frequently visit Jeta’s Grove.”
“Yes, venerables,” she replied, and did as they asked.
When those wanderers knew
that Sundarī had been clearly seen by many people frequently visiting Jeta’s Grove,
they killed her and dumped her in the ditch around Jeta’s Grove. Then they went to see King Pasenadi of Kosala and said to him,
“Great king, we cannot find the female wanderer Sundarī.”
“But where do you suspect she is?”
“At Jeta’s Grove, great king.”
“Well then, search Jeta’s Grove.”
So the wanderers searched Jeta’s Grove. They pulled her body up from the ditch where they had dumped it, and lifted it on a bier. Having entered Sāvatthī, they went from street to street, from square to square, complaining to people:
“See the deed of the Sakyan ascetics!
Shameless are these Sakyan ascetics, immoral and wicked. They are liars and fake celibates.
Sure, they claim to be of principled and moral conduct, to be celibate, truthful, ethical, and of good character.
But they have no asceticism, no spirituality.
Asceticism and spirituality are lost to them!
Where is their asceticism, where their spirituality?
They have abandoned asceticism and spirituality!
How on earth can a man, having done a man’s business, kill a woman!”
Then at that time when the people of Sāvatthī saw the mendicants they abused and insulted them with rude, harsh words:
“Shameless are these Sakyan ascetics, immoral, wicked, liars, and fake celibates.
Sure, they claim to be of principled and moral conduct, to be celibate, truthful, ethical, and of good character.
But they have no asceticism, no spirituality.
Asceticism and spirituality are lost to them!
Where is their asceticism, where their spirituality?
They have abandoned asceticism and spirituality!
How on earth can a man, having done a man’s business, kill a woman!”
Then several mendicants robed up in the morning and, taking their bowls and robes, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then, after the meal, when they returned from alms-round, they went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what was happening.
“That rumor, mendicants, won’t last long. It will only be seven days, then it will vanish.
So you may respond to those critics with this verse.”
“A liar goes to hell,
as does one who denies what they did.
Both are equal in the hereafter,
those men of base deeds.”
The mendicants memorized that verse in the Buddha’s presence, then used it to respond to those critics.
People thought,
“These Sakyan ascetics didn’t do it, it was not done by them, they swear it.”
That rumor didn’t last long. It was seven days, then it vanished.
Then several mendicants went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing!
How well said this was by the Buddha:
‘That rumor, mendicants, won’t last long. It will only be seven days, then it will vanish.’
That rumor has vanished, sir.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“People out of control stab with words,
like they stab a tusker in battle with darts.
When they hear a harsh word spoken,
a mendicant should endure with no anger in heart.”
The Cowherd
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Kosalans together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants.
And then the Buddha left the road, went to the root of a certain tree, and sat down on the seat spread out.
Then a certain cowherd went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired him with a Dhamma talk.
Then the cowherd said to the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Buddha together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept tomorrow’s meal from me.”
The Buddha consented in silence.
The cowherd got up from his seat, circumambulated the Buddha with his right side toward him, and left.
And when the night had passed the cowherd had plenty of thick milk-rice prepared in his own home, with fresh ghee. Then he had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Sir, it’s time. The meal is ready.”
The Buddha robed up, took his bowl and robe and, together with the Sangha of monks, went to the house of that cowherd, where he sat down on the prepared seat in the dining hall.
Then the cowherd served and satisfied the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha with his own hands with a thick milk-rice and fresh ghee.
When the Buddha had eaten and washed his hand and bowl, the cowherd took a low seat and sat to one side.
The Buddha then instructed, inspired, and gladdened him with a teaching, after which he got up and left.
But soon after the Buddha had left, the cowherd was killed by a certain man in the gap between village borders.
Then several mendicants went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“A wrongly directed mind
would do you more harm
than a hater to the hated,
or an enemy to their foe.”
Restless
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in the sal forest of the Mallas at Upavattana near Kusinārā.
Now at that time several mendicants were staying not far from the Buddha in a wilderness hut. They were restless, insolent, fickle, scurrilous, loose-tongued, unmindful, lacking situational awareness and immersion, with straying minds and undisciplined faculties.
The Buddha saw those mendicants staying nearby.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Unguarded in body,
ruined by wrong view,
overcome with dullness and drowsiness,
you fall under Māra’s sway.
That’s why you should guard the mind,
with right thoughts your pasture,
and right view at the fore.
Having understood rise and fall,
a mendicant who has overcome dullness and drowsiness
would cast off all bad destinies.”
One Who Eats Only Alms-food
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time, after the meal, on return from alms-round, several mendicants sat together in the in the pavilion by the kari tree and this discussion came up among them:
“Reverends, when a mendicant who eats only alms-food is wandering for alms, from time to time they get to see pleasing sights, hear pleasing sounds, smell pleasing smells, taste pleasing tastes, and encounter pleasing touches.
They wander for alms being honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed.
Come, we too should eat only alms-food.
From time to time we too will get to see pleasing sights, hear pleasing sounds, smell pleasing smells, taste pleasing tastes, and encounter pleasing touches.
We too shall wander for alms being honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed.”
At that point the conversation among those mendicants was left unfinished.
Then in the late afternoon, the Buddha came out of retreat and went to the pavilion by the kari tree, where he sat on the seat spread out
and addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, what were you sitting talking about just now? What conversation was unfinished?”
So the mendicants told him what they had been talking about. The Buddha said,
“Mendicants, it is not appropriate for you gentlemen who have gone forth in faith from the lay life to homelessness to talk about such things.
When you’re sitting together you should do one of two things:
discuss the teachings or keep noble silence.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“A mendicant who relies on alms,
self-supported, providing for no other;
the poised one is envied by even the gods,
but not if they’re after popularity and reputation.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time, after the meal, on return from alms-round, several mendicants sat together in the pavilion and this discussion came up among them:
“Who knows a craft?
Who is studying which craft?
Which is the best craft?”
In answer, some said that
elephant-craft is the best of crafts.
Others said that the best craft is
horse-craft,
or chariot-craft,
or archery,
or swordsmanship,
or computing,
or accounting,
or calculating,
or writing,
or cosmology,
or geomancy.
At that point the conversation among those mendicants was left unfinished.
Then in the late afternoon, the Buddha came out of retreat and went to the assembly hall. He sat down on the seat spread out,
and addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, what were you sitting talking about just now? What conversation was unfinished?”
So the mendicants told him what they had been talking about when the Buddha arrived. The Buddha said,
“Mendicants, it is not appropriate for you gentlemen who have gone forth in faith from the lay life to homelessness to talk about such things.
When you’re sitting together you should do one of two things:
discuss the teachings or keep noble silence.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Living without a craft, light, desiring the good,
with senses controlled, everywhere free;
a migrant with no shelter, unselfish, with no need for hope,
having given up conceit, wandering alone: that is a mendicant.”
With Sāriputta
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Sāriputta was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight, and mindfulness established right there.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“As a rocky mountain
is unwavering and well grounded,
so when delusion ends,
a monk, like a mountain, doesn’t tremble.”
With Yasoja
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time around five hundred mendicants headed by Yasoja arrived at Sāvatthī to see the Buddha.
At that, those visiting mendicants, while exchanging pleasantries with the resident mendicants, preparing their lodgings, and putting away their bowls and robes, made a dreadful racket.
Then the Buddha said to Venerable Ānanda,
“Ānanda, who’s making that dreadful racket? You’d think it was fishermen hauling in a catch!”
“Sir, those five hundred mendicants headed by Yasoja have arrived at Sāvatthī to see the Buddha.
It’s those visiting mendicants who, while exchanging pleasantries with the resident mendicants, preparing their lodgings, and putting away their bowls and robes, made a dreadful racket.”
“Well then, Ānanda, in my name tell those mendicants that
the teacher summons them.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied. He went to those mendicants and said,
“Venerables, the teacher summons you.”
“Yes, reverend,” replied those mendicants. Then they rose from their seats and went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side. The Buddha said to them,
“Mendicants, what’s with that dreadful racket? You’d think it was fishermen hauling in a catch!”
When he said this, Venerable Yasoja said to the Buddha,
“Sir, these five hundred mendicants headed by Yasoja have arrived at Sāvatthī to see the Buddha.
It’s these visiting mendicants who, while exchanging pleasantries with the resident mendicants, preparing their lodgings, and putting away their bowls and robes, made a dreadful racket.”
“Go away, mendicants, I dismiss you. You are not to stay in my presence.”
“Yes, sir,” replied those mendicants. They got up from their seats, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right. They set their lodgings in order and left, taking their bowls and robes.
Traveling stage by stage in the land of the Vajjīs, they arrived at the Vaggumudā River. They built leaf huts near the riverbank and there they entered the rainy season.
Then Venerable Yasoja, having entered the rainy season, addressed the mendicants:
“Out of compassion, reverends, the Buddha dismissed us, wanting what’s best for us.
Come, let us live in such a way that the Buddha would be pleased with us.”
“Yes, reverend,” they replied.
Then those mendicants, living alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute, all realized the three knowledges in that same rainy season.
When the Buddha had stayed in Sāvatthī as long as he wished, he set out for Vesālī.
Traveling stage by stage, he arrived at Vesālī,
where he stayed in the hall with the peaked roof.
Then, having applied his mind to comprehending the minds of the mendicants staying on the bank of the river Vaggumudā, the Buddha said to Venerable Ānanda,
“A light, it appears to me, has arisen in this quarter, Ānanda; a brightness has arisen.
I’m not put off at the thought of going to where the mendicants are staying on the bank of the river Vaggumudā.
Send a message to those mendicants:
“Venerables, the teacher summons you.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied. He went to one of mendicants and said,
“Please, Reverend, go to the staying on the bank of the river Vaggumudā and say to them,
“Venerables, the teacher summons you. He wants to see you.”
“Yes, reverend,” replied those mendicants.
Then, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, he vanished from the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof, and reappeared in front of those mendicants on the bank of the river Vaggumudā.
Then he said to those mendicants,
“Venerables, the teacher summons you. He wants to see you.”
“Yes, reverend,” replied those mendicants. They set their lodgings in order and took their bowls and robes.
Then, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, they vanished from the bank of the river Vaggumudā, and reappeared in the presence of the Buddha in the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
But at that time the Buddha was sitting immersed in imperturbable meditation.
Then those mendicants thought,
“What kind of meditation is the Buddha practicing right now?”
They thought,
“He is practicing the imperturbable meditation.”
They all sat in imperturbable meditation.
And then, as the night was getting late, in the first watch of the night, Venerable Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha and said,
“Sir, the night is getting late. It is the first watch of the night, and the visiting mendicants have been sitting long.
Sir, please greet the visiting mendicants.”
But the Buddha kept silent.
For a second time, as the night was getting late, in the middle watch of the night, Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha and said,
“Sir, the night is getting late. It is the second watch of the night, and the visiting mendicants have been sitting long.
Sir, please greet the visiting mendicants.”
But for a second time the Buddha kept silent.
For a third time, as the night was getting late, in the last watch of the night, Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha and said,
“Sir, the night is getting late. It is the last watch of the night; dawn stirs, bringing joy to the night, and the visiting mendicants have been sitting long.
Sir, please greet the visiting mendicants.”
Then the Buddha emerged from that immersion and addressed Ānanda,
“If you’d known, Ānanda, you wouldn’t have said so much.
Both I and these five hundred mendicants have been sitting in imperturbable meditation.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“A mendicant who has beaten the thorns of sensuality—
and abuse, killing, and caging—
steady as a mountain, imperturbable,
trembles not at pleasure and pain.”
With Mahāmoggallāna
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Mahākappina was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight and mindfulness of the body well-established in himself.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“With mindfulness of the body established,
restrained in the six fields of contact,
a mendicant always immersed in samādhi
would know quenching in themselves.”
Born of the Fruits of deeds
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now, at that time a certain mendicant was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight. As a result of past deeds, he suffered painful, sharp, severe, and acute feelings, which he endured unperturbed, with mindfulness and awareness.
The Buddha saw him meditating and enduring that pain.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“A mendicant who has left all deeds behind,
shaking off the dust of past deeds,
unselfish, steady, poised,
has no need to complain.”
So I have heard.
At one time, when he was first awakened, the Buddha was staying near Uruvelā at the root of the tree of awakening on the bank of the Nerañjarā River.
There the Buddha sat cross-legged for seven days without moving, experiencing the bliss of freedom.
When seven days had passed, the Buddha emerged from that state of immersion and surveyed the world with the eye of a Buddha.
He saw sentient beings tormented with many torments, and burning with many fevers
born of greed, hate, and delusion.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“This world, born in torment,
overcome by contact, speaks of disease as the self.
For whatever it thinks it is, it turns out to be something else.
The world is attached to continued existence, overcome by continued existence,
taking pleasure only in continued existence, yet it becomes something else.
What it enjoys, that is the fear;
what it fears, that is the suffering.
But this spiritual life is led
in order to give up continued existence.
Of the ascetics and brahmins who say that through continued existence one is freed from continued existence, none are themselves freed from continued existence, I say.
Of the ascetics and brahmins who say that through annihilation of existence one escapes from continued existence, none have themselves escaped from continued existence, I say.
For this suffering originates dependent on all attachment. With the ending of all grasping there is no origination of suffering.
Just look at this world!
Mired in all sorts of ignorance, beings in love with being are not released from continued existence.
Whatever states of continued existence there are—everywhere, all over—all are impermanent, suffering, and perishable.
In this way one seeing with right wisdom
in accord with truth,
gives up craving for continued existence,
while not look forward to ending existence.
Extinguishment comes from the ending of all cravings;
fading away and cessation with nothing left over.
There is no further existence
for that mendicant extinguished without grasping.
Victorious in battle, such a one has defeated Māra;
they’ve gone beyond all states of existence.”
Sakka’s Heartfelt Saying
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
Now at that time Venerable Mahākassapa was staying in the Pipphali cave. Having entered a certain state of immersion, he sat cross-legged for seven days without moving.
When seven days had passed, Mahākassapa emerged from that state of immersion.
It occurred to him,
“Why not enter Rājagaha for almsfood?”
Now at that time five hundred deities were ready and eager for the chance to offer alms to Mahākassapa.
But Mahākasspa refused those deities. In the morning, he robed up, took his bowl and robe, and entered Rājagaha for alms.
Now at that time Sakka, lord of Gods, wished to give alms to Mahākassapa.
Having manifested in the appearance of a weaver, he worked the loom while the demon maiden Sujā fed the shuttle.
Then, as Mahākassapa wandered indiscriminately for alms-food in Rājagaha, he approached Sakka’s house.
Seeing Mahākassapa coming off in the distance,
Sakka came out of his house, greeted him, and took the bowl from his hand. He re-entered the house and filled the bowl with rice from the pot.
That alms-food had many tasty soups and sauces.
Then it occurred to Mahākassapa,
“Now, what being is this who has such psychic power?”
It occurred to him,
“This is Sakka, lord of Gods.”
Knowing this, he said to Sakka,
“This is your doing, Kosiya;
don’t do such a thing again.”
“But sir, Kassapa, we too need merit!
We too ought make merit.”
Then Sakka bowed and respectfully circled Mahākassapa, keeping him on his right. Then he rose into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, expressed this heartfelt sentiment three times:
“Oh the gift, the best gift is well established in Kassapa!
Oh the gift, the best gift is well established in Kassapa!
Oh the gift, the best gift is well established in Kassapa!”
With clairaudience that is purified and superhuman, the Buddha heard Sakka express this heartfelt sentiment while sitting in the sky.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“A mendicant who relies on alms,
self-supported, providing for no other;
the poised one is envied by even the gods,
calm and ever mindful.”
With Pilindavaccha
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
Now at that time Venerable Pilindavaccha addressed the mendicants as “lowlifes”.
Then several mendicants went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, Venerable Pilindavaccha addresses the mendicants as ‘lowlifes’.”
So the Buddha addressed a certain monk,
“Please, monk, in my name tell the mendicant Pilindavaccha that the Teacher summons him.”
“Yes, sir,” that monk replied. He went to Pilindavaccha and said to him,
“Reverend Pilindavaccha, the teacher summons you.”
“Yes, reverend,” Pilindavaccha replied. He went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side. The Buddha said to him:
“Is it really true, Vaccha, that you addressed the mendicants as ‘lowlifes’?”
“Yes, sir,” he replied.
Then, having applied his mind to Pilindavaccha’s past lives, the Buddha said to the mendicants,
“Mendicants, don’t complain about the mendicant Vaccha.
He doesn’t addresses the mendicants as ‘lowlifes’ out of hate.
For five hundred lives without interruption he was reborn in a brahmin family.
For a long time, he has addressed people as ‘lowlife’.
That’s why he addresses the mendicants as ‘lowlifes’.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“In whom dwells no deceit or conceit,
rid of greed, unselfish, with no need for hope,
with anger eliminated, quenched:
they are a brahmin, an ascetic, a mendicant.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Nanda, the Buddha’s paternal cousin, informed several mendicants:
“I lead the spiritual life dissatisfied.
I am unable to keep up the spiritual life. I shall resign the training and return to a lesser life.”
Then a mendicant went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what was happening.
So the Buddha addressed a certain monk,
“Please, monk, in my name tell the mendicant Nanda that
the teacher summons him.”
“Yes, sir,” that monk replied. He went to Nanda and said to him,
“Reverend Nanda, the teacher summons you.”
“Yes, reverend,” Nanda replied. He went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side. The Buddha said to him:
The Buddha said to him:
“Is it really true, Nanda, that you informed several mendicants that
you are unable to keep up the spiritual life; that you shall resign the training and return to a lesser life?”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
“But why are you so dissatisfied with the spiritual life?”
“As I left my house, sir, the finest lady of the Sakyan land, her hair half-combed, glanced at me and said,
‘Hurry back, master.’
Recalling that, I am dissatisfied and shall resign the training.”
Then the Buddha took Nanda by the arm and, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, vanished from Jeta’s Grove and reappeared among the gods of the Thirty-Three.
Now at that time five hundred dove-footed nymphs had come to attend to Sakka, the lord of gods.
Then the Buddha said to Nanda,
“Nanda, do you see these five hundred dove-footed nymphs?”
“Yes, sir,” he replied.
“What do you think, Nanda? Who is more attractive, good-looking, and lovely—the finest lady of the Sakyan land, or these five hundred dove-footed nymphs?”
“Compared to these five hundred dove-footed nymphs, the finest lady of the Sakyan land is like a deformed monkey with its ears and nose cut off.
Compared to these five hundred dove-footed nymphs, she doesn’t count, there’s no comparison, she’s not worth a fraction.
These five hundred dove-footed nymphs are far more attractive, good-looking, and lovely.”
“Rejoice, Nanda, rejoice!
I guarantee you five hundred dove-footed nymphs.”
“If, sir, you guarantee me five hundred dove-footed nymphs, I shall happily lead the spiritual life under the Buddha.”
Then the Buddha took Nanda by the arm and, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, vanished from the gods of the Thirty-Three and reappeared at Jeta’s Grove.
The mendicants heard,
“It seems Venerable Nanda—who is both the Buddha’s half-brother and maternal cousin—leads the spiritual life for the sake of nymphs.
And it seems that the Buddha guaranteed him five hundred dove-footed nymphs.”
Monks who were his friends accused him of being a hireling and a lackey,
“It seems Nanda is a hireling, it seems he is a lackey: he leads the spiritual life for the sake of nymphs.
And it seems that the Buddha guaranteed him five hundred dove-footed nymphs.”
Then Nanda—horrified, repelled, and disgusted at being called a hireling and a lackey—living alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute, soon realized the supreme end of the spiritual path in this very life. He lived having achieved with his own insight the goal for which gentlemen rightly go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
He understood: “Rebirth is ended; the spiritual journey has been completed; what had to be done has been done; there is no return to any state of existence.”
Venerable Nanda became one of the perfected.
Then, late at night, a glorious deity, lighting up the entire Jeta’s Grove, went up to the Buddha, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, Venerable Nanda—who is both the Buddha’s half-brother and maternal cousin—has realized the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life. He lives having realized it with his own insight due to the ending of defilements.”
And the knowledge also came to the Buddha:
“Nanda has realized the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life. He lives having realized it with his own insight due to the ending of defilements.”
Then, when the night had passed, Nanda went to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, you guaranteed me five hundred dove-footed nymphs. I release you from that promise.”
“Nanda, I comprehended your mind and knew that
you had realized the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom.
And deities also told me about this.
As soon as your mind was freed from defilements by not grasping, I was released from that promise.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“The mendicant who has crossed over the bog,
who has crushed the thorns of sensuality,
who has reached the end of delusion,
trembles not at pleasure and pain.”
Seven Matted-Hair Ascetics
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the Eastern Monastery, the stilt longhouse of Migāra’s mother.
Then in the late afternoon, the Buddha came out of retreat and sat outside the gate.
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
Now at that time seven matted-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven naked ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, and seven wanderers passed by not far from the Buddha. Their armpits and bodies were hairy, and their nails were long; and they carried their stuff with shoulder-poles.
King Pasenadi saw them passing by.
He got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, knelt with his right knee on the ground, raised his joined palms toward those various ascetics, and pronounced his name three times:
“Sirs, I am Pasenadi, king of Kosala!
I am Pasenadi, king of Kosala!
I am Pasenadi, king of Kosala!”
Then, soon after those ascetics had left, King Pasenadi went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
Seated to one side, King Pasenadi said to the Buddha,
“Sir, are they among those in the world who are perfected ones or who are on the path to perfection?”
“Great king, as a layman enjoying sensual pleasures, living at home with your children, using sandalwood imported from Kāsi, wearing garlands, perfumes, and makeup, and accepting gold and money, it’s hard for you to know who is perfected or on the path to perfection.
You can get to know a person’s ethics by living with them.
But only after a long time, not casually; only when paying attention, not when inattentive; and only by the wise, not the witless.
You can get to know a person’s purity by dealing with them.
…
You can get to know a person’s resilience in times of trouble.
…
You can get to know a person’s wisdom by discussion.
But only after a long time, not casually; only when paying attention, not when inattentive; and only by the wise, not the witless.”
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing,
how well said this was by the Buddha. …
Sir, these are my spies, my undercover agents returning after spying on the country.
First they go undercover, then I have them report to me.
And now—when they have washed off the dust and dirt, and are nicely bathed and anointed, with hair and beard dressed, and dressed in white—they will amuse themselves, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Don’t strive in every situation,
don’t become another’s man.
Don’t live depending on another,
and don’t trade in the teaching.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, so long as the Realized Ones, the perfected ones, the fully awakened Buddhas do not arise in the world, the wanderers who follow other paths are honored, respected, esteemed, revered, and venerated. And they receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
But when the Realized Ones do arise in the world, the wanderers who follow other paths are no longer honored, respected, esteemed, revered, and venerated. And they do not receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
Now only the Buddha is honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed. And he receives robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.”
“That’s so true, Ānanda. So long as the Realized Ones do not arise in the world, the wanderers who follow other paths are honored, respected, esteemed, revered, and venerated. And they receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
But when the Realized Ones do arise in the world, the wanderers who follow other paths are no longer honored in this way.
Now only the Realized One is honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed. And he receives robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick. And so does the mendicant Saṅgha.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“The glow-worm shines so long
as the sun does not rise.
But when the sun has come up,
that light is erased and shines no more.
So too the reasoners shine bright
so long as the Buddhas don’t arise in the world.
The reasoners are not purified, nor are their disciples.
Having bad views, they are not freed from suffering.”
Second: Followers of Other Paths
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time several ascetics, brahmins, and wanderers who followed various other paths were residing in Sāvatthī, holding different views and opinions, relying on different views.
There were some ascetics and brahmins who had this doctrine and view:
“The self and the cosmos are eternal. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly.”
Others held views such as the following, each regarding their own view as true and others as silly.
“The self and the cosmos are not eternal.”
“The self and the cosmos are both eternal and not eternal.”
“The self and the cosmos are neither eternal nor not eternal.”
“The self and the cosmos are made by oneself.”
“The self and the cosmos are made by another.”
“The self and the cosmos are made by both oneself and another.”
“The self and the cosmos have arisen by chance, not made by oneself or another.”
“Pleasure and pain are eternal, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are not eternal, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are both eternal and not eternal, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are neither eternal nor not eternal, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are made by oneself, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are made by another, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are made by both oneself and another, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain have arisen by chance, not made by oneself or another, and the self and the cosmos.”
They were arguing, quarreling, and fighting, continually wounding each other with barbed words:
‘Such is Truth, such is not Truth!
Such is not Truth, such is Truth!”
Then several mendicants robed up in the morning and, taking their bowls and robes, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then, after the meal, when they returned from alms-round, they went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what was happening.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Some ascetics and brahmins, it seems,
cling to these things.
They flounder in mid-stream,
without reaching a firm footing.”
Surrendering the Life Force
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Vesālī for alms.
Then, after the meal, on his return from alms-round, he addressed Venerable Ānanda:
“Ānanda, get your sitting cloth.
Let’s go to the Cāpāla shrine for the day’s meditation.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. Taking his sitting cloth he followed behind the Buddha.
Then the Buddha went up to the Cāpāla shrine, where he sat on the seat spread out.
When he was seated he said to Venerable Ānanda:
“Ānanda, Vesālī is lovely. And the Udena, Gotamaka, Sattamba, Bahuputta, Sārandada, and Cāpāla shrines are all lovely.
Whoever has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power—made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them—may, if they wish, live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.
The Realized One has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power, made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them. If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.”
But Ānanda didn’t get it, even though the Buddha dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign.
He didn’t beg the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Blessed One please remain for the eon! May the Holy One please remain for the eon! That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.”
For his mind was as if possessed by Māra.
For a second time …
and for a third time, the Buddha said to Ānanda:
“Ānanda, Vesālī is lovely. And the Udena, Gotamaka, Sattamba, Bahuputta, Sārandada, and Cāpāla shrines are all lovely.
Whoever has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power—made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them—may, if they wish, live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.
The Realized One has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power, made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them. If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.”
But Ānanda didn’t get it, even though the Buddha dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign.
He didn’t beg the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Blessed One please remain for the eon! May the Holy One please remain for the eon! That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.”
For his mind was as if possessed by Māra.
Then the Buddha said to Venerable Ānanda,
“Go now, Ānanda, at your convenience.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. He rose from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before sitting at the root of a tree close by.
And then, not long after Ānanda had left, Māra the Wicked went up to the Buddha, stood to one side, and said to him:
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have monk disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned, have memorized the teachings, and practice in line with the teachings. Not until they practice properly, living in line with the teaching. Not until they’ve learned their teacher’s doctrine, and explain, teach, assert, establish, disclose, analyze, and make it clear. Not until they can legitimately and completely refute the doctrines of others that come up, and teach with a demonstrable basis.’
Today you do have such monk disciples.
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have nun disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned …’ …
Today you do have such nun disciples.
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have layman disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned …’
Today you do have such layman disciples.
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have laywoman disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned …’
Today you do have such laywoman disciples.
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
Not until my spiritual life is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.’
Today your spiritual life is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
When this was said, the Buddha said to Māra,
“Relax, Wicked One. The final extinguishment of the Realized One will be soon.
Three months from now the Realized One will finally be extinguished.”
So at the Cāpāla tree shrine the Buddha, mindful and aware, surrendered the life force.
When he did so there was a great earthquake, awe-inspiring and hair-raising, and thunder cracked the sky.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Weighing up the incomparable against an extension of life,
the sage surrendered the life force.
Happy inside, serene,
he burst out of this self-made chain like a suit of armor.”
Third: Followers of Other Paths
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time several ascetics, brahmins, and wanderers who followed various other paths were residing in Sāvatthī, holding different views and opinions, relying on different views.
There were some ascetics and brahmins who had this doctrine and view:
“The self and the cosmos are eternal. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly.”
Others held views such as the following, each regarding their own view as true and others as silly.
“The self and the cosmos are not eternal.”
“The self and the cosmos are both eternal and not eternal.”
“The self and the cosmos are neither eternal nor not eternal.”
“The self and the cosmos are made by oneself.”
“The self and the cosmos are made by another.”
“The self and the cosmos are made by both oneself and another.”
“The self and the cosmos have arisen by chance, not made by oneself or another.”
“Pleasure and pain are eternal, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are not eternal, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are both eternal and not eternal, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are neither eternal nor not eternal, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are made by oneself, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are made by another, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain are made by both oneself and another, and the self and the cosmos.”
“Pleasure and pain have arisen by chance, not made by oneself or another, and the self and the cosmos.”
They were arguing, quarreling, and fighting, continually wounding each other with barbed words:
‘Such is Truth, such is not!
Such is not Truth, such is Truth!”
Then several mendicants robed up in the morning and, taking their bowls and robes, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then, after the meal, when they returned from alms-round, they went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what was happening.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Folk are fixated on the I-maker,
which is tied up with the other-maker.
There are some who do not realize this,
they do not see the dart.
But when they see this dart,
they do not think, ‘I make it’,
nor ‘another makes it’.
These folk are caught up in conceit,
tied by conceit, schackled by conceit.
Vehemently defending their views,
they don’t escape transmigration.”
Hastening By
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the Buddha was meditating in the open during the dark of night, while oil lamps were burning.
And many moths were falling down and crashing down into the lamps, coming to grief and ruin.
The Buddha saw the moths coming to grief.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Hastening by, they miss the essence,
sprouting ever more new bonds.
Like moths falling in the flame,
some have become fixed in what is seen or heard.”
The Courtesan
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
Now at that time two gangs were both hopelessly in love with a certain courtesan.
Quarreling, arguing, and fighting, they attacked each other with fists, stones, rods, and swords,
resulting in death and deadly pain.
Then several mendicants robed up in the morning and, taking their bowls and robes, entered Rājagaha for alms.
Then, after the meal, when they returned from alms-round, they went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what was happening.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“What has been attained and what is to be attained are both strewn over with dust for that one training while still sick.
Those for whom the training is the essence, or precepts and observances, celibacy, and service as the essence: this is one extreme.
Those who say,
‘There’s nothing wrong with sensual pleasures’: this is the second extreme.
Thus these two extremes swell the charnel grounds, while the charnel grounds swell wrong view.
Not realizing these two extremes, some get stuck and some overreach.
Those who realize these things, who were not found there, who did not conceive by that, there is no cycle of rebirths to be found.”
With Subhūti
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Sāriputta was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight, having attained the immersion free of placing the mind.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“In whom mental vibrations are cleared away,
internally clipped off entirely,
perceiving the formless, beyond attachments,
having overcome the four yokes, they are not born again.”
First: Followers of Other Paths
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time several ascetics, brahmins, and wanderers who followed various other paths were residing in Sāvatthī, holding different views and opinions, relying on different views.
There were some ascetics and brahmins who had this doctrine and view:
“The cosmos is eternal. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly.”
Others held views such as the following, each regarding their own view as true and others as silly.
“The cosmos is not eternal.”
“The world is finite.”
“The world is infinite.”
“The soul and the body are the same thing.”
“The soul and the body are different things.”
“A Realized One exists after death.”
“A Realized One doesn’t exist after death.”
“A Realized One both exists and doesn’t exist after death.”
“A Realized One neither exists nor doesn’t exist after death.”
They were arguing, quarreling, and fighting, continually wounding each other with barbed words:
“Such is Truth, such is not Truth!
Such is not Truth, such is Truth!”
Then several mendicants robed up in the morning and, taking their bowls and robes, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then, after the meal, when they returned from alms-round, they went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what was happening. The Buddha said:
“The wanderers who follow other paths are blind and sightless.
They don't understand what is beneficial or what is not beneficial, nor what is the truth and what is not the truth.
That’s why they are arguing, quarreling, and fighting, continually wounding each other with barbed words.
Once upon a time, mendicants, right here in Sāvatthī there was a certain king.
Then the king addressed a man,
‘Please, mister, gather all those blind from birth throughout Sāvatthī and bring them together in one place.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ that man replied. He did as the king asked, then said to him,
‘Your Majesty, the blind people throughout Sāvatthī have been gathered.’
‘Well then, my man, show them an elephant.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ that man replied. He did as the king asked.
To some of the blind people he showed the elephant’s head, saying,
‘Here is the elephant.’
To some of them he showed the elephant’s ear, saying,
‘Here is the elephant.’
To some of them he showed the elephant’s tusk, saying,
‘Here is the elephant.’
To some of them he showed the elephant’s trunk, saying,
‘Here is the elephant.’
To some of them he showed the elephant’s flank, saying,
‘Here is the elephant.’
To some of them he showed the elephant’s leg, saying,
‘Here is the elephant.’
To some of them he showed the elephant’s thigh, saying,
‘Here is the elephant.’
To some of them he showed the elephant’s tail, saying,
‘Here is the elephant.’
To some of them he showed the tip of the elephant’s tail, saying,
‘Here is the elephant.’
Then he approached the king and said,
‘Your Majesty, the blind people have been shown the elephant.
Please go at your convenience.’
Then the king went up to the blind people and said,
‘Have you seen the elephant?’
‘Yes, Your Majesty, we have been shown the elephant.’
‘Then tell us, what kind of thing is an elephant?’
The blind people who had been shown the elephant’s head said,
‘Your Majesty, an elephant is like a pot.’
Those who had been shown the ear said,
‘An elephant is like a winnowing fan.’
Those who had been shown the tusk said,
‘An elephant is like a ploughshare.’
Those who had been shown the trunk said,
‘An elephant is like a plough-pole.’
Those who had been shown the flank said,
‘An elephant is like a storehouse.’
Those who had been shown the leg said,
‘An elephant is like a pillar.’
Those who had been shown the thigh said,
‘An elephant is like a mortar.’
Those who had been shown the tail said,
‘An elephant is like a pestle.’
Those who had been shown the tip of the tail said,
‘An elephant is like a broom.’
Saying, ‘Such is an elephant, not such!
Such is not an elephant, such is!’ they punched each other with their fists.
At that, the king was pleased.
In the same way, mendicants, the wanderers who follow other paths are blind and sightless.
They don't understand what is beneficial or what is not beneficial, nor what is the truth and what is not the truth.
That’s why they are arguing, quarreling, and fighting, continually wounding each other with barbed words.
‘Such is Truth, such is not!
Such is not Truth, such is!’”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Some ascetics and brahmins, it seems,
cling to these things.
Arguing, they quarrel,
the folk who see just one part.”
The Buddha’s Reviewing
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the Buddha was sitting reviewing his own giving up of many bad, unskillful qualities, and the many skillful qualities he had fully developed.
Then, knowing the many bad, unskillful qualities that he had given up and the many skillful qualities he had fully developed, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“What was before then was not;
what before was not then was.
It never was, nor will it be,
nor is it found today.”
With Mahākassapa
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
Now at that time Venerable Mahākassapa was staying in the Pipphali cave, and he was sick, suffering, gravely ill.
Then after some time he recovered from that illness.
It occurred to him,
“Why not enter Rājagaha for almsfood?”
Now at that time five hundred deities were ready and eager for the chance to offer alms to Mahākassapa.
But Mahākasspa refused those deities. In the morning, he robed up, took his bowl and robe, and entered Rājagaha for alms.
He went to the streets of the poor, the destitute, and the weavers.
The Buddha saw him wandering for alms in the streets of the poor, the destitute, and the weavers.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“The stranger, providing for no other,
tamed, grounded in the essence,
with defilements ended and flaws purged:
that’s who I call a brahmin.”
The Brahmin
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time a number of senior monks approached the Buddha—Venerables Sāriputta, Mahāmoggallāna, Mahākassapa, Mahākaccāna, Mahākoṭṭhita, Mahākappina, Mahācunda, Anuruddha, Revata, and Nanda.
The Buddha saw them coming off in the distance,
and addressed the mendicants:
“These, mendicants, are brahmins coming!
These are brahmins coming!”
When he said this, a certain mendicant of the brahmin caste asked the Buddha,
“Sir, how do you define a brahmin? And what are the things that make one a brahmin?”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Having barred out bad qualities,
those who live always mindful,
with fetters ended, awakened,
they are the world’s true brahmins.”
Third: Upon Awakening
So I have heard.
At one time, when he was first awakened, the Buddha was staying near Uruvelā at the root of the tree of awakening on the bank of the Nerañjarā River.
There the Buddha sat cross-legged for seven days without moving, experiencing the bliss of freedom.
When seven days had passed, the Buddha emerged from that state of immersion. In the last part of the night, he reflected on dependent origination in forward and reverse order:
“When this exists, that is; due to the arising of this, that arises.
When this doesn’t exist, that is not; due to the cessation of this, that ceases. That is:
Ignorance is a condition for choices.
Choices are a condition for consciousness.
Consciousness is a condition for name and form.
Name and form are conditions for the six sense fields.
The six sense fields are conditions for contact.
Contact is a condition for feeling.
Feeling is a condition for craving.
Craving is a condition for grasping.
Grasping is a condition for continued existence.
Continued existence is a condition for rebirth.
Rebirth is a condition for old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress to come to be.
That is how this entire mass of suffering originates.
When ignorance fades away and ceases with nothing left over, choices cease.
When choices cease, consciousness ceases.
When consciousness ceases, name and form cease.
When name and form cease, the six sense fields cease.
When the six sense fields cease, contact ceases.
When contact ceases, feeling ceases.
When feeling ceases, craving ceases.
When craving ceases, grasping ceases.
When grasping ceases, continued existence ceases.
When continued existence ceases, rebirth ceases.
When rebirth ceases, old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress cease.
That is how this entire mass of suffering ceases.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“When things become clear
to the keen, meditating brahmin,
he remains, scattering Māra’s army,
as the sun lights up the sky.”
Second: Upon Awakening
So I have heard.
At one time, when he was first awakened, the Buddha was staying near Uruvelā at the root of the tree of awakening on the bank of the Nerañjarā River.
There the Buddha sat cross-legged for seven days without moving, experiencing the bliss of freedom.
When seven days had passed, the Buddha emerged from that state of immersion. In the second part of the night, he reflected on dependent origination in reverse order:
“When this doesn’t exist, that is not; due to the cessation of this, that ceases. That is:
When ignorance ceases, choices cease.
When choices cease, consciousness ceases.
When contact ceases, feeling ceases.
When feeling ceases, craving ceases.
When craving ceases, grasping ceases.
When grasping ceases, continued existence ceases.
When continued existence ceases, rebirth ceases.
When rebirth ceases, old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress cease.
That is how this entire mass of suffering ceases.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“When things become clear
to the keen, meditating brahmin,
his doubts are dispelled,
since he’s known the end of conditions.”
With Bāhiya
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Bāhiya of the Bark Cloth was residing by Suppāraka on the ocean shore, where he was honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed. And he received robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
Then as he was in private retreat this thought came to his mind,
“I am one of those in the world who are perfected or on the path to perfection.”
Then a deity who was a former relative of Bāhiya, having compassion and wanting what’s best for him, approached him and said:
“Bāhiya, you’re not a perfected one, nor on the path to perfection.
You don’t have the practice by which you might become a perfected one or one on the path to perfection.”
“Then who exactly are those in the world who are perfected or on the path to perfection?”
“In the northern lands there is a city called Sāvatthī.
There that Blessed One is now staying, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
He is a perfected one and teaches the Dhamma for the sake of perfection.”
Impelled by that deity, Bāhiya left Suppāraka right away.
Sojourning no more than a single night in any place, he made his way to Anāthapiṇḍika’s Monastery in the Jeta Grove at Sāvatthī.
At that time several mendicants were walking mindfully in the open air.
Bāhiya approached them and said,
“Sirs, where is the Blessed One at present, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha?
For I want to see him.”
“He has entered an inhabited area for almsfood, Bāhiya.”
Then Bāhiya rushed out of the Jeta Grove and entered Sāvatthī, where he saw the Buddha walking for alms. He was impressive and inspiring, with peaceful faculties and mind, attained to the highest self-control and serenity, like an elephant with tamed, guarded, and controlled faculties.
Bāhiya went up to the Buddha, bowed down with his head at the Buddha’s feet, and said,
“Sir, let the Blessed One teach me the Dhamma! Let the Holy One teach me the Dhamma!
That would be for my lasting welfare and happiness.”
The Buddha said this:
“It’s not the time, Bāhiya, so long as I have entered an inhabited area for almsfood.”
For a second time, Bāhiya said,
“But you never know, sir, when life is at risk, either the Buddha’s or my own.
Let the Blessed One teach me the Dhamma! Let the Holy One teach me the Dhamma!
That would be for my lasting welfare and happiness.”
For a second time, the Buddha said,
“It’s not the time, Bāhiya, so long as I have entered an inhabited area for almsfood.”
For a third time, Bāhiya said,
“But you never know, sir, when life is at risk, either the Buddha’s or my own.
Let the Blessed One teach me the Dhamma! Let the Holy One teach me the Dhamma!
That would be for my lasting welfare and happiness.”
“In that case, Bāhiya, you should train like this:
‘In the seen will be merely the seen; in the heard will be merely the heard; in the thought will be merely the thought; in the known will be merely the known.’
That’s how you should train.
When you have trained in this way, you won’t be ‘by that’.
When you’re not ‘by that’, you won’t be ‘in that’.
When you’re not ‘in that’, you won’t be in this world or the world beyond or in between the two.
Just this is the end of suffering.”
Then, due to this brief Dhamma teaching of the Buddha, Bāhiya’s mind was right away freed from defilements by not grasping.
And when the Buddha had given Bāhiya this brief advice he left.
But soon after the Buddha had left, a cow with a baby calf charged at Bāhiya and took his life.
Then the Buddha wandered for alms in Sāvatthī. After the meal, on his return from alms-round, he departed the city together with several mendicants and saw that Bāhiya had passed away.
He said to the monks,
“Mendicants, pick up Bāhiya’s corpse.
Having lifted it onto a cot and carried it, cremate it
and build a monument.
Mendicants, one of your spiritual companions has passed away.”
“Yes, sir,” replied those mendicants. They did as the Buddha asked, then returned to the Buddha
“Sir, Bāhiya’s corpse has been cremated and a monument built for him.
Where has he been reborn in his next life?”
“Mendicants, Bāhiya was astute. He practiced in line with the teachings, and did not trouble me about the teachings.
Bāhiya of the Bark Cloth has become fully extinguished.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Where water and earth,
fire and air find no footing:
there no star does shine,
nor does the sun shed its light;
there the moon glows not,
yet no darkness is found.
And when a sage, a brahmin, finds understanding
through their own sagacity,
then from forms and formless,
from pleasure and pain they are released.”
So I have heard.
At one time, when he was first awakened, the Buddha was staying near Uruvelā at the goatherd’s banyan tree on the bank of the Nerañjarā River.
There the Buddha sat cross-legged for seven days without moving, experiencing the bliss of freedom.
When seven days had passed, the Buddha emerged from that state of immersion.
Then a certain brahmin of the whiny sort went up to the Buddha and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he stood to one side,
“Master Gotama, how do you define a brahmin? And what are the things that make one a brahmin?”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“A brahmin who has barred out bad qualities,
—not whiny, not stained, but self-controlled,
a complete knowledge master who has completed the spiritual journey—
may rightly proclaim the brahmin doctrine,
free of pride about anything in the world.”
With Saṅgāmaji
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time around Venerable Saṅgāmaji had arrived at Sāvatthī to see the Buddha.
His former wife heard
that he had arrived,
and went to the Jetavana, taking their boy.
Now at that time Venerable Saṅgāmaji was sitting at the root of a tree for the day’s meditation.
Then his former wife went up to him and said,
“I have a little child, ascetic, so please provide for me.”
When she said this, Saṅgāmaji kept silent.
For a second time she said,
“I have a little child, ascetic, so please provide for me.”
For a second time, Saṅgāmaji kept silent.
For a third time she said,
“I have a little child, ascetic, so please provide for me.”
For a third time, Saṅgāmaji kept silent.
Then she put down the boy in front of Saṅgāmaji, saying,
“This is your child, ascetic. Provide for him.”
But Saṅgāmaji neither looked at the boy nor spoke to him.
Then his former wife went a little distance away. Looking back, she saw Saṅgāmaji ignoring the boy, and thought,
“This ascetic doesn’t even want his child.”
She returned to pick up the boy, then left.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, the Buddha saw how Saṅgāmaji’s went back for the child.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“When she came he was not glad,
when she left he did not grieve.
Victorious in battle, freed from chains,
that’s who I call a brahmin.”
First: Upon Awakening
So I have heard.
At one time, when he was first awakened, the Buddha was staying near Uruvelā at the root of the tree of awakening on the bank of the Nerañjarā River.
There the Buddha sat cross-legged for seven days without moving, experiencing the bliss of freedom.
When seven days had passed, the Buddha emerged from that state of immersion. In the first part of the night, he reflected on dependent origination in forward order:
“When this exists, that is; due to the arising of this, that arises. That is:
Ignorance is a condition for choices.
Choices are a condition for consciousness.
Consciousness is a condition for name and form.
Name and form are conditions for the six sense fields.
The six sense fields are conditions for contact.
Contact is a condition for feeling.
Feeling is a condition for craving.
Craving is a condition for grasping.
Grasping is a condition for continued existence.
Continued existence is a condition for rebirth.
Rebirth is a condition for old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress to come to be.
That is how this entire mass of suffering originates.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“When things become clear
to the keen, meditating brahmin,
his doubts are dispelled,
since he understands each thing and its cause.”
At Ajakalāpaka
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in Pāvā at the Ajakalāpaka tree shrine, the haunt of the native spirit Ajakalāpaka.
Now at that time the Buddha was meditating in the open during the dark of night, while a gentle rain drizzled down.
Then Ajakalāpaka, wanting to make the Buddha feel fear, terror, and goosebumps, approached him, and while not far away yelled three times, “Grr! Arrgh!” Then he added,
“Now that’s a goblin for you, ascetic!”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“When a brahmin has got over
their own issues,
they transcend this goblin
and his grunts.”
Dreadlocked Ascetics
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Gāyā on Gāyā Head.
Now at that time—during the cold spell when the snow falls in the dead of winter—many dreadlocked ascetics plunged in and out of the Gayā river. Plunging and showering, they served the sacred flame, thinking:
‘Through this there is purity.’”
The Buddha saw them plunging in and out.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Purity doesn’t come from water,
no matter how many people bathe there.
One who has truth and principle,
they are pure, they are brahmins.”
Sabbath
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the Eastern Monastery, the stilt longhouse of Migāra’s mother.
Now, at that time it was the sabbath, and the Buddha was sitting surrounded by the Saṅgha of monks.
And then, as the night was getting late, in the first watch of the night, Venerable Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha and said,
“Sir, the night is getting late. It is the first watch of the night, and the Saṅgha has been sitting long.
Please, sir, may the Buddha recite the monastic code to the mendicants.”
But when he said this, the Buddha kept silent.
For a second time, as the night was getting late, in the middle watch of the night, Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha and said,
“Sir, the night is getting late. It is the first watch of the night, and the Saṅgha has been sitting long.
Please, sir, may the Buddha recite the monastic code to the mendicants.”
But for a second time the Buddha kept silent.
For a third time, as the night was getting late, in the last watch of the night, Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha and said,
“Sir, the night is getting late. It is the first watch of the night, and the Saṅgha has been sitting long.
Please, sir, may the Buddha recite the monastic code to the mendicants.”
“Ānanda, the assembly is not pure.”
Then Venerable Mahāmoggallāna thought,
“Who is the Buddha talking about?”
Then he focused on comprehending the minds of everyone in the Saṅgha.
He saw that unethical person, of bad qualities, filthy, with suspicious behavior, underhand, no true ascetic or spiritual practitioner—though claiming to be one—rotten inside, corrupt, and depraved, sitting in the middle of the Saṅgha.
When he saw him he got up from his seat, went up to him and said,
“Get up, reverend. The Buddha has seen you.
You can’t live in communion with the mendicants.”
But when he said this, that person kept silent.
For a second time and a third time,
he asked that monk to leave.
But for a third time that person kept silent.
Then Venerable Mahāmoggallāna took that person by the arm, ejected him out the gate, and bolted the door. Then he went up to the Buddha, and said to him,
“I have ejected that person.
The assembly is pure.
Please, sir, may the Buddha recite the monastic code to the mendicants.”
“It’s incredible, Moggallāna, it’s amazing,
how that silly man waited to be taken by the arm!”
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants,
“From this day forth, mendicants, I will not perform the sabbath or recite the monastic code.
Now you should perform the sabbath and recite the monastic code.
It’s impossible, mendicants, it can’t happen that a Realized One could recite the monastic code in an impure assembly.
Seeing these eight incredible and amazing things the demons love the ocean.
What eight?
The ocean gradually slants, slopes, and inclines, with no abrupt precipice.
This is the first thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, the ocean is consistent and doesn’t overflow its boundaries.
This is the second thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, the ocean doesn’t accommodate a corpse, but quickly carries it to the shore and strands it on the beach.
This is the third thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, when they reach the ocean, all the great rivers—that is, the Ganges, Yamunā, Aciravatī, Sarabhū, and Mahī—lose their names and clans and are simply considered ‘the ocean’.
This is the fourth thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, for all the world’s streams that reach it, and the rain that falls from the sky, the ocean never empties or fills up.
This is the fifth thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, the ocean has just one taste, the taste of salt.
This is the sixth thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, the ocean is full of many kinds of treasures, such as pearls, gems, beryl, conch, quartz, coral, silver, gold, rubies, and emeralds.
This is the seventh thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, many great beings live in the ocean, such as leviathans, leviathan-gulpers, leviathan-gulper-gulpers, demons, dragons, and fairies.
In the ocean there are life-forms a hundred leagues long, or even two hundred, three hundred, four hundred, or five hundred leagues long.
This is the eighth thing the demons love about the ocean.
Seeing these eight incredible and amazing things the demons love the ocean.
In the same way, seeing eight incredible and amazing things, mendicants, the mendicants love this teaching and training.
What eight?
The ocean gradually slants, slopes, and inclines, with no abrupt precipice.
In the same way in this teaching and training the penetration to enlightenment comes from gradual training, progress, and practice, not abruptly.
This is the first thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
The ocean is consistent and doesn’t overflow its boundaries.
In the same way, when a training rule is laid down for my disciples they wouldn’t break it even for the sake of their own life.
This is the second thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
The ocean doesn’t accommodate a corpse, but quickly carries it to the shore and strands it on the beach.
In the same way, the Saṅgha doesn’t accommodate a person who is unethical, of bad qualities, filthy, with suspicious behavior, underhand, no true ascetic or spiritual practitioner—though claiming to be one—rotten inside, corrupt, and depraved.
But they quickly gather and expel them. Even if such a person is sitting in the middle of the Saṅgha, they’re far from the Saṅgha, and the Saṅgha is far from them.
This is the third thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
Furthermore, when they reach the ocean, all the great rivers—that is, the Ganges, Yamunā, Aciravatī, Sarabhū, and Mahī—lose their names and clans and are simply considered ‘the ocean’.
In the same way, when they go forth from the lay life to homelessness, all four castes—aristocrats, brahmins, merchants, and workers—lose their former names and clans and are simply considered ‘Sakyan ascetics’.
This is the fourth thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
For all the world’s streams that reach it, and the rain that falls from the sky, the ocean never empties or fills up.
In the same way, though several mendicants become fully extinguished through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over, the natural principle of extinguishment never empties or fills up.
This is the fifth thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
The ocean has just one taste, the taste of salt.
In the same way, this teaching and training has one taste, the taste of freedom.
This is the sixth thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
The ocean is full of many kinds of treasures, such as pearls, gems, beryl, conch, quartz, coral, silver, gold, rubies, and emeralds.
In the same way, this teaching and training is full of many kinds of treasures, such as the four kinds of mindfulness meditation, the four right efforts, the four bases of psychic power, the five faculties, the five powers, the seven awakening factors, and the noble eightfold path.
This is the seventh thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
Many great beings live in the ocean, such as leviathans, leviathan-gulpers, leviathan-gulper-gulpers, demons, dragons, and fairies. In the ocean there are life-forms a hundred leagues long, or even two hundred, three hundred, four hundred, or five hundred leagues long.
In the same way, great beings live in this teaching and training, and these are those beings. The stream-enterer and the one practicing to realize the fruit of stream-entry. The once-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of once-return. The non-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of non-return. The perfected one, and the one practicing for perfection.
This is the eighth thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
Seeing these eight incredible and amazing things, the mendicants love this teaching and training.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“The rain saturates things that are covered up;
it doesn’t saturate things that are open.
Therefore you should open up a covered thing,
so the rain will not saturate it.”
The Boys
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time, between Sāvatthī and the Jeta Grove, several boys were tormenting some fish.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
He saw the boys tormenting the fish.
He went to them and said,
“Boys, do you fear pain? Do you dislike pain?”
“Yes, sir,” they replied. “We dislike pain.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“If you fear pain,
If you dislike pain,
don’t do bad deeds
either openly or in secret.
If you should do a bad deed,
now or in the future,
you won’t be freed from suffering,
though you fly away and flee.”
With Revata the Doubter
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Revata the Doubter was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight, reviewing his own purification through overcoming doubt.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Any doubts about this world or the world beyond,
about one’s own experiences or those of another:
those who meditate give them all up,
keenly practicing the spiritual life.”
Who Is More Dear?
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time King Pasenadi of Kosala was upstairs in the royal longhouse together with Queen Mallikā.
Then King Pasenadi addressed Queen Mallikā,
“Mallikā, is there anyone more dear to you than yourself?”
“No, great king, there isn’t.
But is there anyone more dear to you than yourself?”
“For me also, Mallikā, there’s no-one.”
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala came downstairs from the stilt longhouse, went to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Having explored every quarter with the mind,
Likewise for others, each holds themselves dear;
so one who loves themselves would harm no other.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Kosalans together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants.
Now at that time several students were passing by not far from the Buddha in a teasing manner.
The Buddha saw them.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Dolts pretending to be astute,
they talk, their words right out of bounds.
They blab at will, their mouths agape,
and no-one knows what leads them on.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Mahākaccāna was staying in the land of the Avantis near Kuraraghara on Steep Mountain.
And the layman Soṇa of the pointy ears was Mahākaccānas attendant.
Then as Soṇa was in private retreat this thought came to his mind,
“As I understand Venerable Mahākaccāna’s teachings, it’s not easy for someone living at home to lead the spiritual life utterly full and pure, like a polished shell.
Why don’t I cut off my hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from lay life to homelessness?”
Then Soṇa went up to Mahākaccāna, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what he was thinking. Then he said,
“May Venerable Mahākaccāna please give me the going forth!”
When this was said, Mahākaccāna said to him,
“It’s hard to lead the spiritual life as long as you live, eating in one part of the day and sleeping alone.
Short-lived
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then in the late afternoon, Venerable Ānanda came out of retreat and went to the Buddha. He bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing!
How short-lived was the Blessed One’s mother! For seven days after the Blessed One was born, his mother passed away and was reborn in the host of Joyful Gods.”
“That’s so true, Ānanda! For the mothers of beings intent of awakening are short-lived.
Seven days after the beings intent on awakening are born, their mothers pass away and are reborn in the host of Joyful Gods.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Whether born or to be born,
all depart, leaving the body behind.
The skillful, understanding that all is lost,
would keenly practice the spiritual life.”
Schism in the Saṅgha
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
Now at that time Venerable Ānanda robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Rājagaha for alms.
Devadatta saw him wandering for alms,
so he went up to him and said,
“From this day forth, Reverend Ānanda, I shall perform the sabbath and legal proceedings of the Saṅgha apart from the Buddha and the Saṅgha of mendicants.”
Then Ānanda wandered for alms in Rājagaha. After the meal, on his return from alms-round, he went to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side,
and told him what had just happened, adding:
“Today, sir, Devadatta will split the Saṅgha. He will perform the sabbath and legal proceedings of the Saṅgha.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“It’s easy for the good to do good,
and hard for the good to do bad.
It’s easy for the bad to do bad,
but for the noble ones, bad is hard to do.”
With Suppabuddha the Leper
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
At that time in Rājagaha there was a leper called Suppabuddha.
He was poor, destitute, and pitiful.
Now, at that time the Buddha was teaching Dhamma, surrounded by a large assembly.
Suppabuddha saw the crowd seated off in the distance
and thought,
“Surely some variety of foods will be distributed there.
Why don’t I approach the crowd?
Hopefully I’ll get something to eat.”
So he approached the crowd
where he saw the Buddha teaching Dhamma, surrounded by a large assembly.
When he saw this he thought,
“There’s no food being distributed here.
The ascetic Gotama is teaching Dhamma in an assembly.
Why don’t I also listen to the teaching?”
Right there he sat down to one side, thinking,
“I also will listen to the teaching.”
Then the Buddha focused on comprehending the minds of everyone in the Saṅgha, thinking, “Who here is capable of understanding the teaching?”
He saw Suppabuddha sitting in the assembly,
and thought,
“He is capable of understanding the teaching.”
He gave a step by step talk especially for Suppabuddha
on giving, ethical conduct, and heaven.
He explained the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, so sordid and corrupt, and the benefit of renunciation.
When the Buddha knew that Suppabuddha’s mind was ready, supple, without hindrances, joyful, and confident, he revealed the teaching unique to the Buddhas:
suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
Just as a clean cloth rid of stains would properly absorb dye,
in that very seat the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma in Suppabuddha:
“Everything that has a beginning has an end.”
Then Suppabuddha saw, attained, understood, and fathomed the Dhamma. He went beyond doubt, got rid of indecision, and became self-assured and independent of others regarding the Teacher’s instructions. He rose from his seat and went to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said:
“Excellent, sir! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, the Buddha has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may the Buddha remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
After Suppabuddha had been educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired with a Dhamma talk by the Buddha, he got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha before leaving.
But soon after Suppabuddha had left, a cow with a baby calf charged at him and took his life.
Then several mendicants went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said,
“The leper called Suppabuddha, after being educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired with a Dhamma talk by the Buddha, has passed away.
Where has he been reborn in his next life?”
“Mendicants, Suppabuddha was astute. He practiced in line with the teachings, and did not trouble me about the teachings.
With the ending of three fetters, Suppabuddha is a stream-enterer, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.”
When he said this, one of the mendicants said to the Buddha,
“What is the cause, sir, what is the reason why Suppabuddha became a leper,
poor, destitute, and pitiful?”
“Once upon a time, mendicants, Suppabuddha used to be a financier’s son right here in Rājagaha.
On his way to visit a park, he saw Tagarasikhi, a Buddha awakened for themselves, entering the city for alms.
When he saw this he thought,
“Who is this leper wandering about with his leper’s robe?”
Before leaving, he spat on the ground and turned his left side to Tagarasikhi.
As a result of that deed he burned in hell for many years, for many hundreds, many thousands, many hundreds of thousands of years.
And as a residual result of that same deed, he became a leper right here in Rājagaha, poor, destitute and pitiful.
But owing to faith in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One, he undertook ethics, learning, generosity, and wisdom.
After undertaking these things, when his body broke up, after death, he was reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm, in the company of the gods of the Thirty-Three.
There he outshines the other gods in beauty and glory.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“As a well-sighted man would avoid rough paths,
so long as strength is found;
an astute person in the living world,
would shun bad deeds.”
With Cūḷapanthaka
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Cūḷapanthaka was sitting not far from the Buddha cross-legged, with his body straight, and mindfulness established right there.
The Buddha saw him meditating there.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Steady in body, steady in mind,
standing, sitting or lying down:
a mendicant focusing on this mindfulness
gains an ever higher distinction.
And when they have done so,
they vanish from the King of Death.”
Second: About Extinguishment
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the Buddha was educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring the mendicants with a Dhamma talk about extinguishment.
And those mendicants were paying heed, paying attention, engaging wholeheartedly, and lending an ear.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“It’s hard to see what they call the ‘uninclined’,
for the truth is not easy to see.
For one who has penetrated craving,
who knows and sees, there is nothing.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Mallas together with a large Saṅgha when he arrived at Pāvā.
There he stayed in Cunda the smith’s mango grove.
Cunda heard that the Buddha had arrived and was staying in his mango grove.
Then he went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired him with a Dhamma talk.
Then Cunda said to the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Buddha together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept tomorrow’s meal from me.”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, Cunda got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before leaving.
And when the night had passed Cunda had a variety of delicious foods prepared in his own home, and plenty of pork on the turn. Then he had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Sir, it’s time. The meal is ready.”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the home of Cunda together with the mendicant Saṅgha, where he sat on the seat spread out
and addressed Cunda,
“Cunda, please serve me with the pork on the turn that you’ve prepared. And serve the mendicant Saṅgha with the other foods.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Cunda, and did as he was asked.
Then the Buddha addressed Cunda,
“Cunda, any pork on the turn that’s left over, you should bury it in a pond.
I don’t see anyone in this world—with its gods, Māras, and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its gods and humans—who could properly digest it except for the Realized One.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Cunda. He did as he was asked, then came back to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
Then the Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired him with a Dhamma talk, after which he got up from his seat and left.
After the Buddha had eaten Cunda’s meal, he fell severely ill with bloody dysentery, struck by dreadful pains, close to death.
But he endured unperturbed, with mindfulness and situational awareness.
Then the Buddha said to Venerable Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Kusinārā.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
I’ve heard that after eating
the meal of Cunda the smith,
the wise one fell severely ill,
with pains, close to death.
A severe sickness struck the Teacher
who had eaten the pork on the turn.
While still purging the Buddha said:
“I’ll go to the citadel of Kusinārā.”
Then the Buddha left the road and went to the root of a certain tree, where he addressed Ānanda,
“Please, Ānanda, fold my outer robe in four and spread it out for me. I am tired and will sit down.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda, and did as he was asked.
The Buddha sat on the seat spread out,
and said to Venerable Ānanda,
“Please, Ānanda, fetch me some water. I am thirsty and will drink.”
When he said this, Venerable Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“Sir, just now around five hundred carts have passed by. The shallow water has been churned up by their wheels, and it flows cloudy and murky.
The Kakutthā river is not far away, with clear, sweet, cool water, clean, with smooth banks, delightful.
There the Buddha can drink and cool his limbs.”
For a second time,
and a third time, the Buddha said to Ānanda,
“Please, Ānanda, fetch me some water. I am thirsty and will drink.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. Taking his bowl he went to the river.
Now, though the shallow water in that river had been churned up by wheels, and flowed cloudy and murky, when Ānanda approached it flowed transparent, clear, and unclouded.
Then Venerable Ānanda thought,
“It’s incredible, it’s amazing! The Realized One has such psychic power and might!
For though the shallow water in that river had been churned up by wheels, and flowed cloudy and murky, when I approached it flowed transparent, clear, and unclouded.”
Gathering a bowl of drinking water he went back to the Buddha, and said to him,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing! The Realized One has such psychic power and might!
For though the shallow water in that river had been churned up by wheels, and flowed cloudy and murky, when I approached it flowed transparent, clear, and unclouded.
Drink the water, Blessed One! Drink the water, Holy One!”
So the Buddha drank the water.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants went to the Kakutthā River. He plunged into the river and bathed and drank. And when he had emerged, he went to the mango grove, where he addressed Venerable Cundaka,
“Please, Cundaka, fold my outer robe in four and spread it out for me. I am tired and will lie down.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Cundaka, and did as he was asked.
And then the Buddha laid down in the lion’s posture—on the right side, placing one foot on top of the other—mindful and aware, and focused on the time of getting up.
But Cundaka sat down right there in front of the Buddha.
Having gone to Kakutthā Creek,
whose water was transparent, sweet, and clear,
the Teacher, being tired, plunged in,
the Realized One, without compare in the world.
And after bathing and drinking the Teacher emerged.
Before the group of mendicants, in the middle, the Buddha,
the Teacher who rolled forth the present dispensation,
the great hermit went to the mango grove.
He addressed the mendicant named Cundaka:
“Spread out my folded robe so I can lie down.”
The self-developed one urged Cunda,
who quickly spread the folded robe.
The Teacher lay down so tired,
while Cunda sat there before him.
Then the Buddha said to Venerable Ānanda,
“Now it may happen, Ānanda, that others may give rise to some regret for Cunda the smith:
‘It’s your loss, friend Cunda, it’s your misfortune, in that the Realized One became fully extinguished after eating his last meal from you.’
You should get rid of remorse in Cunda the smith like this:
‘You’re fortunate, friend Cunda, you’re so very fortunate, in that the Realized One became fully extinguished after eating his last meal from you.
I have heard and learned this in the presence of the Buddha.
There are two meal offerings that have identical fruit and result, and are more fruitful and beneficial than other meal offerings.
The meal after eating which a Realized One understands the supreme perfect awakening; and the meal after eating which he becomes fully extinguished through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over.
These two meal offerings have identical fruit and result, and are more fruitful and beneficial than other meal offerings.
You’ve accumulated a deed that leads to long life, beauty, happiness, fame, heaven, and sovereignty.’
You should dispel remorse in Cunda the smith like this.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“A giver’s merit grows;
enmity doesn’t build up when you have self-control.
A skillful person gives up bad things—
with the end of greed, hate, and delusion, they’re extinguished.”
About Extinguishment (4rd)
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the Buddha was educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring the mendicants with a Dhamma talk about extinguishment.
And those mendicants were paying heed, paying attention, engaging wholeheartedly, and lending an ear.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“For the dependent there is agitation. For the independent there’s no agitation.
When there’s no agitation there is tranquility. When there is tranquility there’s no inclination.
When there’s no inclination, there’s no coming and going.
When there’s no coming and going, there’s no passing away and reappearing.
When there’s no passing away and reappearing there’s no this world or world beyond or between the two.
Just this is the end of suffering.”
First: About Extinguishment
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the Buddha was educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring the mendicants with a Dhamma talk about extinguishment.
And those mendicants were paying heed, paying attention, engaging wholeheartedly, and lending an ear.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“There is, mendicants, that dimension where there is no earth, no water, no fire, no wind; no dimension of infinite space, no dimension of infinite consciousness, no dimension of nothingness, no dimension of neither perception nor non-perception; no this world, no other world, no moon or sun.
There, mendicants, I say there is no coming or going or remaining or passing away or reappearing.
It is not established, does not proceed, and has no support.
Just this is the end of suffering.”
With Visākhā
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the Eastern Monastery, the stilt longhouse of Migāra’s mother.
Now at that time the dear and beloved granddaughter of Visākhā Migāra’s Mother had just passed away.
Then, in the middle of the day, Visākhā with wet clothes and hair went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down.
The Buddha said to her,
“So, Visākhā, where are you coming from in the middle of the day with wet clothes and hair?”
“Sir, my beloved granddaughter has just passed away.”
That’s why I here in the middle of the day with wet clothes and hair.”
“Visākhā, would you like as many children and grandchildren as there are people in the whole of Sāvatthī?”
“I would, sir.”
“But Visākhā, how many people pass away each day in Sāvatthī?”
“Every day, sir, there are ten people passing away in Sāvatthī.
Or else there are nine,
or at least one person who passes away every day in Sāvatthī.
Sāvatthī is never without someone passing away.”
“What do you think, Visākhā? Would there ever be a time when your clothes and hair were not wet?”
Enough, sir, with so many children and grandchildren.”
“Those who have a hundred loved ones, Visākhā, have a hundred sufferings.
Those who have a ninety loved ones,
forty, thirty,
twenty, ten,
or one loved one have one suffering.
“Those who have no loved ones have no suffering. They are free of sorrow, stains, and anguish I say.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“All the sorrows and lamentations
and the countless forms of suffering in the world
occur because of those that we love;
without loved ones they do not occur.
That’s why those who have no loved ones at all in the world
are happy and free of grief.
So aspiring to the sorrowless and stainless,
have no loved ones in the world at all.”
The Layfolk of Pāṭali Village
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Magadhans together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants when he arrived at the village of Pāṭali.
The lay followers of Pāṭali Village heard that he had arrived.
So they went to see him, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, please consent to come to our guest house.”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, the lay followers of Pāṭali Village got up from their seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right. Then they went to the guest house, where they spread carpets all over, prepared seats, set up a water jar, and placed a lamp. Then they went back to the Buddha, bowed, stood to one side, and told him of their preparations, saying:
“Please, sir, come at your convenience.”
In the morning, the Buddha robed up and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the guest house together with the Saṅgha of mendicants. Having washed his feet he entered the guest house and sat against the central column facing east.
The Saṅgha of mendicants also washed their feet, entered the guest house, and sat against the west wall facing east, with the Buddha right in front of them.
The lay followers of Pāṭali Village also washed their feet, entered the guest house, and sat against the east wall facing west, with the Buddha right in front of them.
Then the Buddha addressed them:
“Householders, there are these five drawbacks for an unethical person because of their failure in ethics.
What five?
Firstly, an unethical person loses substantial wealth on account of negligence.
This is the first drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person gets a bad reputation.
This is the second drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person enters any kind of assembly timid and embarrassed, whether it’s an assembly of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, or ascetics.
This is the third drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person feels lost when they die.
This is the fourth drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person, when their body breaks up, after death, is reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
This is the fifth drawback.
These are the five drawbacks for an unethical person because of their failure in ethics.
There are these five benefits for an ethical person because of their accomplishment in ethics.
What five?
Firstly, an ethical person gains substantial wealth on account of diligence.
This is the first benefit.
Furthermore, an ethical person gets a good reputation.
This is the second benefit.
Furthermore, an ethical person enters any kind of assembly bold and self-assured, whether it’s an assembly of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, or ascetics.
This is the third benefit.
Furthermore, an ethical person dies not feeling lost.
This is the fourth benefit.
Furthermore, when an ethical person’s body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
This is the fifth benefit.
These are the five benefits for an ethical person because of their accomplishment in ethics.”
The Buddha spent most of the night educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring the lay followers of Pāṭali Village with a Dhamma talk. Then he dismissed them,
“The night is getting late, householders. Please go at your convenience.”
And then the lay followers of Pāṭali Village approved and agreed with what the Buddha said. They got up from their seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right, before leaving.
Soon after they left the Buddha entered a private cubicle.
Now at that time the Magadhan ministers Sunidha and Vassakāra were building a citadel at Pāṭali Village to keep the Vajjis out.
At that time thousands of deities were taking possession of building sites in Pāṭali Village.
Illustrious rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by illustrious deities.
Middling rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by middling deities.
Lesser rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by lesser deities.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, the Buddha saw those deities taking possession of building sites in Pāṭali Village,
and the people building houses in accord with the station of the deaities.
The Buddha rose at the crack of dawn and addressed Ānanda,
“Ānanda, who is building a citadel at Pāṭali Village?”
“Sir, the Magadhan ministers Sunidha and Vassakāra are building a citadel to keep the Vajjis out.”
“It’s as if they were building the citadel in consultation with the gods of the Thirty-Three.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, I saw those deities taking possession of building sites.
Illustrious rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by illustrious deities.
Middling rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by middling deities.
Lesser rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by lesser deities.
As far as the civilized region extends, as far as the trading zone extends, this will be the chief city: the Pāṭaliputta trade center.
But Pāṭaliputta will face three threats:
from fire, flood, and dissension.”
Then the Magadhan ministers Sunidha and Vassakāra approached the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, they stood to one side and said,
“Would Master Gotama together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept today’s meal from me?”
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, they went to their own guest house, where they had a variety of delicious foods prepared. Then they had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Itʼs time, Master Gotama, the meal is ready.”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to their guest house together with the mendicant Saṅgha, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Sunidha and Vassakāra served and satisfied the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha with their own hands with a variety of delicious foods.
When the Buddha had eaten and washed his hand and bowl, Sunidha and Vassakāra took a low seat and sat to one side.
The Buddha expressed his appreciation with these verses:
“In the place he makes his dwelling,
having fed the astute
and the virtuous here,
the restrained spiritual practitioners,
he should dedicate an offering
to the deities there.
Venerated, they venerate him;
honored, they honor him.
After that they have compassion for him,
like a mother for the child at her breast.
A man beloved of the deities
always sees nice things.”
When the Buddha had expressed his appreciation to Sunidha and Vassakāra with these verses, he got up from his seat and left.
Sunidha and Vassakāra followed behind the Buddha, thinking,
“The gate through which the ascetic Gotama departs today shall be named the Gotama Gate.
The ford at which he crosses the Ganges River shall be named the Gotama Ford.”
Then the gate through which the Buddha departed was named the Gotama Gate.
Then the Buddha came to the Ganges River.
Now at that time the Ganges was full to the brim so a crow could drink from it.
Wanting to cross from the near to the far shore, some people were seeking a boat, some a dinghy, while some were tying up a raft.
But, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, the Buddha, together with the mendicant Saṅgha, vanished from the near shore and landed on the far shore.
He saw all those people wanting to cross over.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Those who cross a deluge or stream
have built a bridge and left the marshes behind.
While some people are still tying a raft,
intelligent people have crossed over.”
A Fork in the Road
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was traveling along the road between in the Kosalan lands with Venerable Nāgasamāla as his second monk.
Nāgasamāla saw a fork in the road
and said to the Buddha,
“Sir, this is the road,
let us go this way.”
But when he said this the Buddha responded,
“Nāgasamāla, this is the road,
let us go this way.”
For a second time,
and a  third time Nāgasamāla said to the Buddha,
“Sir, this is the road,
let us go this way.”
And for a third time the Buddha responded,
“Nāgasamāla, this is the road,
let us go this way.”
Then Nāgasamāla put the Buddha’s bowl and robes down on the ground right there and left, saying,
“Sir, here are your bowl and robes.”
Then as Nāgasamāla was going down that road, he was set upon by bandits who struck him with fists and feet, broke his bowl, and tore up his outer robe.
Then Nāgasamāla—with his bowl broken and his outer robe torn—went to the Buddha and told him what had happened.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Walkaing together, dwelling as one,
the knowledge master mixes with foolish folk.
Knowing this, they give up wickedness,
like a milk-drinking heron the water.”
Third: About Extinguishment
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the Buddha was educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring the mendicants with a Dhamma talk about extinguishment.
And those mendicants were paying heed, paying attention, engaging wholeheartedly, and lending an ear.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“There is, mendicants, an unborn, unproduced, unmade, and unconditioned.
If there were no unborn, unproduced, unmade, and unconditioned, then you would find no escape here from the born, produced, made, and conditioned.
But since there is an unborn, unproduced, unmade, and unconditioned, an escape is found from the born, produced, made, and conditioned.”
Second: Dabba
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, when Dabba the Mallian rose into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, entered and withdrew from the fire element before becoming fully extinguished, his body burning and combusting left neither ashes nor soot to be found.
It’s like when ghee or oil blaze and burn, and neither ashes nor soot are found.
In the same way, when Dabba the Mallian rose into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, entered and withdrew from the fire element before becoming fully extinguished, his body burning and combusting left neither ashes nor soot to be found.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“When an iron bar is struck
by heat and flame
the heat gradually dissipates,
and where it has gone no-one knows.
In the same way for the rightly released,
who have crossed the flood of sensual bonds,
and attained unshakable happiness,
where they have gone cannot be found.”
The Heartfelt Sayings are finished.
First: With Dabba
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
Then Venerable Dabba the Mallian went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Holy One, it is the time for my full extinguishment.”
“Please, Dabba, do as you see fit.”
Then Dabba rose from his seat, bowed and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right. Then he rose into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, entered and withdrew from the fire element before becoming fully extinguished.
Then when he became fully extinguished while sitting in the sky, his body burning and combusting left neither ashes nor soot to be found.
It’s like when ghee or oil blaze and burn, and neither ashes nor soot are found.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“The body is broken up, perception has ceased,
all feelings have become cool;
choices are stilled,
and consciousness come to an end.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time, after the meal, on return from alms-round, several mendicants sat together in the assembly hall and this discussion came up among them:
“Which of these two kings has greater wealth, riches, treasury, dominion, vehicles, forces, might, and power: King Seniya Bimbisāra of Māgadha or King Pasenadi of Kosala?”
At that point the conversation among those mendicants was left unfinished.
Then in the late afternoon, the Buddha came out of retreat, went to the assembly hall, sat down on the seat spread out,
and addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, what were you sitting talking about just now? What conversation was left unfinished?”
So the mendicants told him what they had been talking about when the Buddha arrived. The Buddha said,
“Mendicants, it is not appropriate for you gentlemen who have gone forth in faith from the lay life to homelessness to talk about such things.
When you’re sitting together you should do one of two things:
discuss the teachings or keep noble silence.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Neither the pleasures of the senses,
nor even divine happiness,
is worth even a sixteenth part
of the happiness of craving’s end.”
With Bhaddiya
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Anupiya in a mango grove.
Now at that time, Venerable Bhaddiya the son of Kāḷīgodhā, even in the wilderness, at the foot of a tree, or in an empty dwelling, frequently expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Oh, what bliss! Oh, what bliss!”
Several mendicants heard him
and thought,
“Without a doubt, Venerable Bhaddiya leads the spiritual life dissatisfied. It’s when recalling the pleasures of royalty he formerly enjoyed as a lay person that, even in the wilderness, at the foot of a tree, or in an empty dwelling, he frequently expresses this heartfelt sentiment:
‘Oh, what bliss! Oh, what bliss!’
Then those mendicants went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side,
and told him what was happening.
So the Buddha addressed a certain monk,
“Please, monk, in my name tell the mendicant Bhaddiya that
the teacher summons him.”
“Yes, sir,” that monk replied. He went to Bhaddiya and said to him,
“Reverend Bhaddiya, the teacher summons you.”
“Yes, reverend,” Bhaddiya replied. He went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side. The Buddha said to him:
“Is it really true, Bhaddiya, that even in the wilderness, at the foot of a tree, or in an empty dwelling, you frequently express this heartfelt sentiment:
‘Oh, what bliss! Oh, what bliss!’”
“Yes, sir.”
“But why do you say this?”
“Formerly, as a lay person ruling the land, my guard was well organized within and without the royal compound, within and without the city, and within and without the country.
But although I was guarded and defended in this way, I remained fearful, scared, suspicious, and nervous.
But these days, even when alone in the wilderness, at the foot of a tree, or in an empty dwelling, I’m not fearful, scared, suspicious, or nervous. I live relaxed, unruffled, surviving on charity, my heart free as a wild deer.
It is for this reason that, even in the wilderness, at the foot of a tree, or in an empty dwelling, I frequently expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
‘Oh, what bliss! Oh, what bliss!’”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“They who hide no anger within,
gone beyond any kind of existence;
happy, free from fear and sorrow—
even the gods can’t see them.”
Suppavāsā
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Kuṇḍiyā in the Kuṇḍadhāna Grove.
Now at that time Suppavāsā the Koliyan had been pregnant for seven years, and in difficult labor for seven days.
While suffering painful, sharp, severe, acute feelings, three thoughts helped her endure:
“Oh! The Blessed One is indeed a fully awakened Buddha, who teaches the Dhamma for giving up suffering such as this.
Oh! The Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples is indeed practicing well, who practice for giving up suffering such as this.
Oh! Extinguishment is so very blissful, where such suffering as this is not found.”
Then Suppavāsā addressed her husband,
“Please, master, go to the Buddha, and in my name bow with your head to his feet. Ask him if he is healthy and well, nimble, strong, and living comfortably.
And then say:
‘Suppavāsā the Koliyan has been pregnant for seven years, and in difficult labor for seven days.
While suffering painful, sharp, severe, acute feelings, three thoughts help her endure:
“Oh! The Blessed One is indeed a fully awakened Buddha, who teaches the Dhamma for giving up suffering such as this.
Oh! The Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples is indeed practicing well, who practice for giving up suffering such as this.
Oh! Extinguishment is so very blissful, where such suffering as this is not found.”’”
“Excellent idea,” he replied. He went to the Buddha and told him of his wife’s struggles. The Buddha said,
“May Suppavāsā the Koliyan be happy and healthy! May she give birth to a healthy child!”
May she give birth to a healthy child!”
As soon as he spoke, Suppavāsā, happy and healthy, gave birth to a healthy child.
Saying “Yes, sir,” the Koliyan gentleman approved and agreed with what the Buddha said. He got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right. Then he returned to his own house.
He saw that his wife, happy and healthy, had given birth to a healthy child,
and thought,
“It’s incredible, it’s amazing! The Realized One has such psychic power and might! For as soon as he spoke, Suppavāsā, happy and healthy, gave birth to a healthy child.”
He became uplifted and overjoyed, full of rapture and happiness.
Then Suppavāsā addressed her husband,
“Please, master, go to the Buddha, and in my name bow with your head to his feet. Ask him if he is healthy and well, nimble, strong, and living comfortably.
And then say,
‘Suppavāsā the Koliyan, who was pregnant for seven years, and in difficult labor for seven days,
is now happy and healthy and has given birth to a healthy child.
She invites the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha to a meal for seven days.
Sir, may the Buddha please accept seven meals from Suppavāsā.’”
“Excellent idea,” he replied. He went to the Buddha, told him the good news, and conveyed his wife’s invitation.
Now at that time a certain lay follower had already invited the Sangha of monks headed by the Buddha for the meal on the following day.
That lay follower was Venerable Mahāmoggallāna’s supporter.
Then the Buddha addressed Venerable Mahāmoggallāna,
“Please, Moggallāna, go to the that lay follower and say to him,
‘Suppavāsā the Koliyan, who was pregnant for seven years, and in difficult labor for seven days,
is now happy and healthy and has given birth to a healthy child.
She invites the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha to a meal for seven days.
Let Suppavāvā make seven meals, afterwards you can make yours.’
He is your supporter.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Mahāmoggallāna. He went to that lay follower and conveyed the Buddha’s request.
“If, sir Venerable Mahāmoggallāna can guarantee me three things—wealth, life, and faith—
then let Suppavāvā make seven meals, afterwards I shall make mine.”
“I can guarantee you two things—wealth and life.
But as for faith, you alone are the guarantor.”
“If, sir Venerable Mahāmoggallāna can guarantee me two things—wealth and life—
then let Suppavāvā make seven meals, afterwards I shall make mine.”
Having persuaded that lay follower, Mahāmoggallāna went to the Buddha and said,
“I’ve persuaded the lay follower.
Let Suppavāvā make seven meals, afterwards he shall make his.”
For seven days Suppavāsā served and satisfied the Buddha with her own hands with a variety of delicious foods. And she made her little boy bow to the Buddha and the mendicant Sangha.
Then Sāriputta said to the boy,
“I hope you’re keeping well, little boy; I hope you’re alright. I hope that you are not in pain.”
“How could I be keeping well? How could I be alright?
For seven years I lived in a pot of blood.”
Then Suppavāsā, thinking,
“My child is conversing with the General of the Dhamma!” was uplifted and overjoyed, full of rapture and happiness.
Knowing this, the Buddha said to her,
“Would you like to have another child like this?”
“Sir, I would like to have seven more children like this!”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Pain in the guise of pleasure,
the disliked in the guise of the liked,
suffering in the guise of happiness,
overpower the negligent.”
An Only Son
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time a certain lay follower’s dear and beloved only child passed away.
Then in the middle of the day several lay followers with wet clothes and hair went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side. The Buddha said to them:
“Why, lay followers, have you come here in the middle of the day with wet clothes and hair?”
The lay follower replied,
“Sir, my dear and beloved only child has passed away.
That’s why we came here in the middle of the day with wet clothes and hair.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Hosts of gods and most human beings are bound
to what seems dear and pleasant.
Miserable and exhausted,
they fall under the sway of the King of Death.
The diligent, who day and night
leave behind what seems pleasant,
dig out the root of misery—
Death’s bait so hard to escape.”
The Pregnant Woman
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time a certain wanderer had a young brahmin wife who was pregnant and about to give birth.
She said to him,
“Go, brahmin, bring oil for my delivery.”
The wanderer said,
“But where, my dear, can I get oil?”
For a second time, she said,
‘Go, brahmin, bring oil for my delivery.’
For a second time, the wanderer said,
“But where, my dear, can I get oil?”
For a third time, she said,
‘Go, brahmin, bring oil for my delivery.’
Now at that time ghee and oil were being given away to any ascetic or brahmin at the storehouse of King Pasenadi of Kosala. But it was only to drink there, not to take away.
Knowing this, the wanderer thought,
“Why don’t I go to the king’s storehouse, drink as much oil as I can, then come home and throw it up so it can be used for the delivery?”
Then he did just that. But when he got home he was unable to either bring it up or pass it out.
He rolled to and fro, suffering painful, sharp, severe, acute feelings.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
He saw the wanderer in agony.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Oh! How happy are those with nothing!
Hence knowledge-masters are people with nothing.
See how troubled are those with attachments,
a person bound tight to people.”
Esteem
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the Buddha was honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed. And he received robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
And the mendicant Saṅgha was also honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed. And they received robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
But the wanderers who followed other paths were not honored, respected, esteemed, revered, and venerated. And they didn’t receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
Then those wanderers who followed other paths, unable to bear the esteem of the mendicant Sangha, abused, attacked, harassed, and troubled the mendicants in the village and the wilderness.
Then several mendicants went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“When struck by pleasure and pain in the village or wilderness,
regard it not as self or other.
Contacts strike because of attachment;
how would contacts strike one free of attachment?”
With Visākhā
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the Eastern Monastery, the stilt longhouse of Migāra’s mother.
Now at that time Visākhā was caught up in some business with King Pasenadi.
But the king’s settlement did not meet her expectations.
Then, in the middle of the day, she went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down.
The Buddha said to her:
“So, Visākhā, where are you coming from in the middle of the day?”
“Sir, I am caught up in some business with King Pasenadi.
But the king’s settlement did not meet my expectations.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“All under another’s control is suffering,
all under one’s own authority is pleasing;
what’s shared is stressful for both parties,
for bonds are hard to escape.”
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time, between Sāvatthī and the Jeta Grove, several boys were hitting a snake with a stick.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
He saw the boys hitting the snake.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Creatures love happiness,
so if you hurt them with a stick
in search of your own happiness,
after death you’ll find no happiness.
Creatures love happiness,
so if you don’t hurt them with a stick
in search of your own happiness,
after death you will find happiness.”
With Mucalinda
So I have heard.
At one time, when he was first awakened, the Buddha was staying near Uruvelā at the root of the Mucalinda tree on the bank of the Nerañjarā River.
There the Buddha sat cross-legged for seven days without moving, experiencing the bliss of freedom.
Just then a great storm blew up out of season, bringing seven days of rain, cold winds, and clouds.
Mucalinda, the dragon king, came out from his abode, encircled the Buddha’s body with seven coils and spread his large hood over his head, thinking,
“May the Buddha not be hot or cold, nor be bothered by flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, or reptiles.”
When seven days had passed, the Buddha emerged from that state of immersion.
When he knew the sky was clear, Mucalinda unwrapped his coils from the Buddha’s body. Hiding his own form, he manifested in the form of a brahmin youth. He stood in front of the Buddha, venerating him with joined palms.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Seclusion is happiness for the contented
who see the teaching they have learned.
Kindness for the world is happiness
for one who’d not harm a living creature.
Dispassion for the world is happiness
for one who has gone beyond sensual pleasures.
But dispelling the conceit ʻI am’
is truly the ultimate happiness.”
A Lay Follower
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time a certain lay follower from Icchānaṅgalaka arrived at Sāvatthī on some business.
Having concluded his business in Sāvatthī he went to see the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said this to him:
“It’s been a long time, lay follower, since you took the opportunity to come here.”
“For a long time I’ve wanted to come and see the Buddha, but I wasn’t able, being prevented by my many duties and responsibilities.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“One who has nothing is happy indeed,
a learned person who has appraised the teaching.
See how troubled are those with attachments,
a person bound tight to people.”
The Book of the Twenties
Chapter One
Second: Adhimutta
“Those who we killed in the past,
whether for sacrifice or for wealth,
without exception were afraid;
they trembled and they squealed.
But you’re not scared;
you look even calmer than before.
Why don’t you cry out
in such a terrifying situation?”
“There isn’t any mental suffering
for one without hope, village chief.
All fears are left behind
by one whose fetters have ended.
When attachment to rebirth is ended,
and the truth is seen as it is,
there is no fear of death;
it’s like laying down a burden.
I’ve lived the spiritual life well,
and developed the path well, too.
I do not fear death;
it’s like the passing of a disease.
I’ve lived the spiritual life well,
and developed the path well, too.
I’ve seen that there’s nothing gratifying in existences,
like someone who has tasted poison, then thrown it out.
One who has gone beyond, without grasping,
they’ve completed the task and are free of defilements.
They are content at the end of life,
like someone released from execution.
Having realized the supreme Dhamma,
without needing anything in the whole world,
one doesn’t grieve at death;
for it’s like escaping from a burning house.
Whatever has come to pass,
wherever life is obtained,
there is no Lord of all that:
so said the great hermit.
Whoever understands this
as it was taught by the Buddha
doesn’t grab on to any new life,
like you wouldn’t grab a hot iron ball.
It doesn’t occur to me, ‘I existed in the past’;
nor, ‘I will exist in the future’.
All conditions will disappear—
why weep over that?
Seeing in accordance with reality
the bare arising of phenomena,
and the bare process of conditions,
there is no fear, village chief.
The world is like grass and sticks:
when this is seen with wisdom,
not finding anything to be mine,
thinking ‘it isn’t mine’, one doesn’t grieve.
I’m fed up with the body;
I don’t need another life.
This body will be broken up,
and there won’t be another.
Do what you want
with my corpse.
I won’t be angry or attached
on account of that.”
When they heard these words,
so astonishing and hair-raising,
the young men laid down their swords
and spoke these words:
“What have you practiced, Venerable?
And who is your teacher?
Whose instructions do we follow
to gain the sorrowless state?”
“The knower of all, the seer of all:
the victor is my teacher.
He is a Teacher of great compassion,
healer of the whole world.
He taught this Dhamma,
leading to ending, unsurpassed.
Following his instructions,
you can gain the sorrowless state.”
When the bandits heard the good words of the hermit,
they laid down their swords and weapons.
Some refrained from their former deeds,
while others chose the going-forth.
When they had gone forth in the teaching of the Holy One,
those astute ones developed the awakening factors and the powers.
Joyful, happy, their faculties complete,
they realized the state of quenching, the unconditioned.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eleven
Suhemanta
Though the meaning has a hundred facets,
and bears a hundred characteristics,
the fool sees only one factor,
while the sage sees a hundred.
The Book of the Twenties
Chapter One
Kāḷigodhāputtabhaddiya
I rode on an elephant’s neck,
wearing luxurious clothes.
I ate rice congee
with pure meat sauce.
Today I am fortunate, persistent,
happy with the scraps in my bowl:
Bhaddiya son of Godhā
practices absorption without grasping.
Wearing rags, persistent,
happy with the scraps in my bowl:
Bhaddiya son of Godhā
practices absorption without grasping.
Living on alms-food, persistent,
Possessing only three robes, persistent,
Wandering for alms indiscriminately, persistent,
Sitting alone, persistent,
Eating only what is placed in the alms-bowl, persistent,
Never eating too late, persistent,
Living in the wilderness, persistent,
Living at the foot of a tree, persistent,
Living in the open, persistent,
Living in a charnel ground, persistent,
Accepting whatever seat is offered, persistent,
Not lying down to sleep, persistent,
Few in wishes, persistent,
Content, persistent,
Secluded, persistent,
Not socializing, persistent,
Energetic, persistent,
Giving up a valuable bronze bowl,
and a precious golden one, too,
I took a bowl made of clay:
this is my second initiation.
I used to live in a citadel with walls so high,
with battlements strong and gates,
all guarded by swordsmen—
and yet I trembled with fear.
Today I am fortunate, free of cowardice,
with fear and dread given up.
Bhaddiya son of Godhā
has plunged into the forest and practices absorption.
Established in the entire spectrum of ethics,
developing the mind and wisdom,
gradually I attained
the ending of all fetters.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Six
Godhika
The sky rains down, like a beautiful song.
My little hut is roofed and pleasant, sheltered from the wind.
My mind is serene:
so rain, sky, if you wish.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Seven
First: Vajjiputta
We dwell alone in the wilderness,
like a log rejected in a forest.
Lots of people are jealous of me,
as beings in hell are of one going to heaven.
The Book of the Fours
Chapter One
Senaka
It was so welcome for me
during the Gayā spring festival
to see the Awakened One
teaching the supreme Dhamma.
He was glorious, the teacher of a community,
a leader who had realized the highest.
In all the world with its gods,
he was the victor of unequaled vision.
A great giant, a great hero,
a great light free of defilement.
With the utter ending of all defilements,
the teacher fears nothing from any quarter.
For a long time, sadly, I was corrupted,
fettered by the bond of wrong view.
That Blessed One, Senaka,
released me from all ties.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter One
Once hard to tame, now tamed himself;
clever, content, with doubt overcome;
victorious since his fears have vanished:
Dabba is steadfast, and has become extinguished.
That is how this verse was recited by the senior venerable Dabba.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Twelve
Second: Vanavaccha
The water’s clear and the rocks are broad,
monkeys and deer are all around;
festooned with dewy moss,
these rocky crags delight me!
Chapter Five
Dhammapāla
The young monk
who is devoted to the teaching of the Buddha,
wakeful while others sleep—
his life is not in vain.
So let the wise devote themselves
to faith, ethical behavior,
confidence, and insight into the teaching,
remembering the instructions of the Buddhas.
The Book of the Fours
Chapter One
Sambhūta
Hurrying when it’s time to dawdle;
dawdling when it’s time to hurry;
being so disorganized
a fool falls into suffering.
Their good fortune wastes away
like the moon in the waning fortnight.
They become disgraced
and alienated from their friends.
Dawdling when it’s time to dawdle;
hurrying when it’s time to hurry;
being so well organized,
an astute person comes into happiness.
Their good fortune flourishes
like the moon in the waxing fortnight.
They become famous and respected,
not alienated from their friends.
Chapter One
Second: Hārita
Whoever wishes to do afterwards
what they should have done before
has lost the causes for happiness,
and afterwards they’re tormented by regrets.
You should only say what you would do;
you shouldn’t say what you wouldn’t do.
The wise will recognize
one who talks without doing.
Oh! Extinguishment is so very blissful,
as taught by the fully awakened Buddha:
sorrowless, stainless, secure,
where suffering all ceases.
Chapter Two
Mahākāḷa
There’s a big black woman who looks like a crow.
She broke off thigh-bones, first one then another;
she broke off arm-bones, first one then another;
she broke off a skull like a curd-bowl, and then
arranged them and sat nearby.
When an ignorant person builds up attachments,
that idiot returns to suffering again and again.
So let one who understands not build up attachments:
may I never again lie with a broken skull!
Chapter One
First: Uttara
No life is permanent,
and no conditions last forever.
The aggregates are reborn
and pass away, again and again.
Knowing this danger,
I don’t need another life.
I’ve escaped all sensual pleasures,
and attained the ending of defilements.
That is how these verses were recited by the senior venerable Uttara.
The Book of the Sixes
Chapter One
Jenta, the High Priest’s Son
I was drunk with the pride of birth
and wealth and authority.
I wandered about intoxicated
with my own gorgeous body.
No-one was my equal or my better—
or so I thought.
I was such an arrogant fool,
stuck up, waving my own flag.
I never paid homage to anyone:
not even my mother or father,
nor others esteemed as respectable.
I was stiff with pride, lacking regard for others.
When I saw the foremost leader,
the most excellent of charioteers,
shining like the sun,
at the fore of the mendicant Saṅgha,
I discarded conceit and vanity,
and, with a clear and confident heart,
I bowed down with my head
to the most excellent of all beings.
The conceit of superiority and the conceit of inferiority
have been given up and eradicated.
The conceit “I am” is cut off,
and every kind of conceit is destroyed.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Five
Ramaṇīyavihārin
Though a fine thoroughbred may stumble,
it soon stands firm again.
Even so is one accomplished in vision,
a disciple of the Buddha.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Ten
Eraka
Sensual pleasures are suffering, Eraka!
Sensual pleasures aren’t happiness, Eraka!
One who enjoys sensual pleasures
enjoys suffering, Eraka!
One who doesn’t enjoy sensual pleasures
doesn’t enjoy suffering, Eraka!
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Seven
Ekadhammasavanīya
My defilements have been burnt away by practicing absorption—
rebirth into all states of existence is eradicated,
transmigration through births is finished,
now there’ll be no more future lives.
The Book of the Sevens
Chapter One
Lakuṇṭaka Bhaddiya
Bhaddiya has plucked out craving, root and all,
and in a jungle thicket
on the far side of the Wild Mango Monastery,
he practices absorption; he is truly well-favoured.
Some delight in clay drums,
in arched harps, and in cymbals.
But here, at the foot of a tree,
I delight in the Buddha’s teaching.
If the Buddha were to grant me one wish,
and I were to get what I wished for,
I’d choose for the whole world
constant mindfulness of the body.
Those who’ve judged me on appearance,
and those swayed by my voice,
are full of desire and greed;
they don’t know me.
Not knowing what’s inside,
nor seeing what’s outside,
the fool shut in on every side,
gets carried away by a voice.
Not knowing what’s inside,
but seeing what’s outside,
seeing the fruit outside,
they’re also carried away by a voice.
Understanding what’s inside,
and seeing what’s outside,
seeing without obstacles,
they don’t get carried away by a voice.
Chapter Four
Sambulakaccāna
The sky rains, the sky thunders down,
I’m staying alone in a frightful hole.
But while I’m staying alone in that frightful hole,
I’ve no fear, no dread, no goosebumps.
This is my normal state
while staying alone in a frightful hole:
I’ve no fear,
no dread, no goosebumps.
The Book of the Thirties
Chapter One
Ānanda
“The astute would not make friends
with the slanderous or those who love division,
with a miser or a gloater,
for it’s bad to consort with sinners.
The astute would make friends
with the faithful and the pleasant,
the wise and the learned,
for it’s a blessing to consort with good people.”
“See this fancy puppet,
in which nothing lasts at all.
See this fancy puppet,
made pretty by its clothes.
Rouged feet
but not a seeker of the far shore.
Hair in eight braids
but not a seeker of the far shore.
A rotting body all adorned
but not a seeker of the far shore.”
“Gotama is learned, a brilliant speaker,
the attendant to the Buddha.
With burden put down, detached,
Gotama made his bed.
Defilements ended, detached,
he has got over clinging and become quenched.
He bears his final body,
having gone beyond birth and death.”
“Gotama stands firm
on the path that leads to quenching,
where the teachings of the Buddha,
the Kinsman of the Sun, are grounded.”
“82,000 from the Buddha,
and 2,000 more from the monks:
84,000 teachings I’ve learned,
and these are what I promulgate.”
“A person of little learning
ages like an ox—
their flesh grows,
but not their wisdom.
A learned person who, on account of their learning,
looks down on someone of little learning,
seems to me like
a blind man holding a lamp.
You should stay close to a learned person—
don’t lose what you’ve learned.
It is the root of the spiritual life,
which is why you should memorize the teaching.
Knowing the sequence and meaning of the teaching,
expert in the interpretation of terms,
they make sure it is well memorized,
and then examine the meaning.
Accepting the teachings, they become enthusiastic;
making an effort, they weigh up the teaching.
When it’s time, they strive
serene inside themselves.
If you want to understand the teaching,
you should befriend the sort of person
who is learned and has memorized the teachings,
a wise disciple of the Buddha.
One who is learned and has memorized the teaching,
a keeper of the great hermit’s treasury,
is a visionary for the whole world,
learned and deserving respect.
Delighting in the teaching, enjoying the teaching,
contemplating the teaching,
a mendicant who recollects the teaching
doesn’t decline in the true teaching.”
“When your body is pampered and heavy,
while your remaining time is running out,
greedy for physical pleasure,
how can you be comfortable as an ascetic?”
“I’m completely disorientated!
The teachings don’t spring to mind!
With the passing of our good friend,
everything seems dark.
When your friend has passed away,
and your Teacher is past and gone,
there’s no friend like
mindfulness of the body.
The old have passed away,
and I don’t agree with the new.
Today I meditate alone
like a bird snug in its nest.”
“Many international visitors
have come to visit.
Don’t block the audience,
let the congregation see me.”
“Lots of international visitors
have come to visit.
The teacher grants them the opportunity,
the seer doesn’t turn them away.”
“In the twenty five years that have passed
since I became a trainee,
no sensual perception has arisen in me:
see the excellence of the teaching!
In the twenty-five years
since I became a trainee,
no malicious perception has arisen in me:
see the excellence of the teaching!”
'For 25 years
I attended on the Buddha
with loving deeds,
like a shadow that never left.
For 25 years
I attended on the Buddha
with loving words,
like a shadow that never left.
For 25 years
I attended on the Buddha
with loving thoughts,
like a shadow that never left.
While the Buddha was walking mindfully,
I walked behind him.
As he taught the Dhamma,
knowledge arose in me.”
“I’m a trainee, who has more to do;
my heart’s desire is still unfulfilled.
Yet the Teacher, who was so compassionate to me,
has become completely quenched.
Then there was terror!
Then they had goosebumps!
When the Buddha, endowed with all fine qualities,
became fully extinguished.”
“Ānanda, who was learned and had memorized the teaching,
a keeper of the great hermit’s treasury,
a visionary for the entire world,
has become fully quenched.
He was learned and had memorized the teaching,
a keeper of the great hermit’s treasury,
a visionary for the entire world,
in thick of night he dispelled the dark.
He is the hermit who remembered the teachings,
and mastered their sequence, holding them firm.
The senior monk who memorized the teaching,
Ānanda was a mine of gems.”
“I’ve served the teacher
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
The heavy burden is laid down,
now there are no more future lives.”
Chapter Two
Sabbamitta
People are attached to people;
people depend on people;
people are hurt by people;
and people hurt people.
So what’s the point of people,
or those born of people?
Go, abandon these people,
who’ve hurt so many people.
The Book of the Sixteens
Chapter One
Udāyī
Awakened as a human being,
self-tamed and serene,
following the spiritual path,
he loves peace of mind.
Revered by people,
gone beyond all things,
even the gods revere him;
so I’ve heard from the perfected one.
He has transcended all fetters,
and escaped from entanglements.
Delighting to renounce sensual pleasures,
he’s freed like gold from stone.
That giant outshines all,
like the Himalaya beside other mountains.
Of all those named “giant”,
he is truly named, supreme.
I’ll extol the giant for you,
for he does nothing monstrous.
Gentleness and harmlessness
are two feet of the giant.
Mindfulness and awareness
are his two other feet.
Faith is the giant’s trunk,
and equanimity his white tusks.
Mindfulness is his neck, his head is wisdom—
investigation and thinking about principles.
His belly is the sacred hearth of the Dhamma,
and his tail is seclusion.
Practicing absorption, enjoying the breath,
he is serene within.
The giant is serene when walking,
the giant is serene when standing,
the giant is serene when lying down,
and when sitting, the giant is serene.
The giant is restrained everywhere:
this is the accomplishment of the giant.
He eats blameless things,
he doesn’t eat blameworthy things.
When he gets food and clothes,
he avoids storing them up.
Having severed all bonds,
fetters large and small,
wherever he goes,
he goes without concern.
A white lotus,
fragrant and delightful,
sprouts in water and grows there,
but the water doesn’t cling to it.
Just so the Buddha is born in the world,
and lives in the world,
but the world doesn’t stick to him,
as water does not stick to the lotus.
A great blazing fire
dies down when the fuel runs out.
And when the coals have gone out
it’s said to be “extinguished”.
This simile is taught by the discerning
to express the meaning clearly.
Great giants will understand
what the giant taught the giant.
Free of greed, free of hate,
free of delusion, undefiled;
the giant, giving up his body,
will be quenched without defilements.
Chapter Two
Nanda
Because of focusing on the wrong things,
I was addicted to ornamentation.
I was vain, fickle,
racked by desire for pleasures of the senses.
But with the help of the Buddha,
the Kinsman of the Sun, so skilled in means,
I practiced properly and extracted
attachment to continued existence from my mind.
Chapter One
Surādha
Rebirth is ended for me;
the victor’s instruction is fulfilled;
what they call a “net” is given up;
the attachment to rebirth is eradicated.
I’ve reached the goal
for the sake of which I went forth
from the lay life to homelessness:
the ending of all fetters.
The Book of the Sixes
Chapter One
Uruveḷakassapa
Seeing the demonstrations
of the renowned Gotama
was not enough for me to bow to him—
I was blinded by jealousy and conceit.
Knowing my thoughts,
the trainer of men scolded me.
I was struck with a sense of urgency,
so astonishing and hair-raising!
Rejecting the petty powers
I had before as a matted-hair ascetic,
I then went forth
in the victor’s instruction.
I used to be content with sacrifice,
the realm of sensual pleasures was my priority.
But later I eradicated desire,
and hatred and also delusion.
I know my past lives;
my clairvoyance is clarified;
I have psychic powers, and know the minds of others;
I have attained clairaudience.
I’ve attained the goal
for the sake of which I went forth
from the lay life to homelessness—
the ending of all fetters.
The Book of the Thirties
Chapter One
Phussa
Seeing many who inspire confidence,
personally developed and well-restrained,
the hermit Paṇḍarasagotta
asked the one known as Phussa:
“In future times,
what desire and motivation
and behavior will people have?
Please answer my question.”
“Listen to my words,
Paṇḍarasa the hermit,
and remember them carefully,
I will describe the future.
In the future many will be
angry and hostile,
offensive, stubborn, and devious,
jealous, holding divergent views.
Imagining they understand the depths of the teaching,
they remain on the near shore.
Superficial and disrespectful towards the teaching,
they lack respect for one another.
In the future
many dangers will arise in the world.
Idiots will defile
the Dhamma that was taught so well.
Though bereft of good qualities,
unlearned prattlers, too sure of themselves,
will become powerful
in running Saṅgha proceedings.
Though possessing good qualities,
the conscientious and unbiased, acting in the proper spirit,
will become weak
in running Saṅgha proceedings.
In the future, fools will accept
money, gold, and silver,
fields and land, goats and sheep,
and bonded servants, male and female.
Fools looking for fault in others,
but unsteady in their own ethics,
will wander about, insolent,
like cantankerous beasts.
They’ll be arrogant,
wrapped in robes of blue;
deceivers, stubborn, flatterers, and frauds,
they’ll wander as if they were noble ones.
With hair sleeked back with oil,
fickle, their eyes painted with eye-liner,
they’ll travel on the high-road,
wrapped in robes of ivory color.
The deep-dyed ocher robe,
worn without disgust by the free,
they will come to loathe,
besotted by white clothes.
They’ll want lots of possessions,
and be lazy, lacking energy.
Weary of the forest,
they’ll stay in the neighborhood of villages.
Being unrestrained, they’ll keep company with
those who get lots of stuff,
and who always enjoy wrong livelihood,
following their example.
They won’t respect those
who don’t get lots of stuff,
and they won’t associate with the wise,
even though they’re very amiable.
Disparaging their own banner,
which is dyed the color of copper,
some will wear the white banner
of those who follow other paths.
Then they’ll have no respect
for the ocher robe.
The mendicants will not reflect
on the nature of the ocher robe.
This awful lack of reflection
was unthinkable to the elephant,
who was overcome by suffering,
injured by an arrow strike.
Then the six-tusked elephant,
seeing the deep-dyed banner of the perfected ones,
straight away spoke these verses
connected with the goal.
One who, not free of stains themselves,
would wear the robe stained in ocher,
bereft of self-control and truth:
they are not worthy of the ocher robe.
One who’s purged all their stains,
steady in ethics,
possessing truth and self-control:
they are truly worthy of the ocher robe.
Devoid of virtue, unintelligent,
wild, doing what they like,
their minds astray, indolent:
they are not worthy of the ocher robe.
One accomplished in ethics,
free of greed, serene,
their heart’s intention pure:
they are truly worthy of the ocher robe.
The conceited, arrogant fool,
who has no ethics at all,
is worthy of a white robe—
what use is an ocher robe for them?
In the future, monks and nuns
with corrupt hearts, lacking regard for others,
will disparage those
with hearts of loving-kindness.
Though trained in wearing the robe
by senior monks,
the unintelligent will not listen,
wild, doing what they like.
With that kind of attitude to training,
those fools won’t respect each other,
or take any notice of their mentors,
like a wild colt with its charioteer.
Even so, in the future,
this will be the practice
of monks and nuns
when the latter days have come.
Before this frightening future arrives,
be easy to admonish,
kind in speech,
and respect one another.
Have hearts of love and compassion,
and please do keep your precepts.
Be energetic, resolute,
and always staunchly vigorous.
Seeing negligence as fearful,
and diligence as a sanctuary,
develop the eightfold path,
realizing the deathless state.”
The Book of the Tens
Chapter One
Upasena, Vaṅganta’s Son
In order to go on retreat,
a monk should stay in lodgings
that are secluded and quiet,
frequented by beasts of prey.
Having gathered scraps from rubbish heaps,
cemeteries and streets,
and making an outer robe from them,
one should wear that coarse robe.
Humbling their heart,
a mendicant should walk for alms
from family to family indiscriminately,
with sense doors guarded, well-restrained.
They should be content even with coarse food,
not hoping for lots of flavors.
The mind that’s greedy for flavors
doesn’t delight in absorption.
With few wishes, content,
a sage should live secluded,
socializing with neither
householders nor the homeless.
He should appear
to be stupid or dumb;
an astute person would not speak overly long
in the midst of the Saṅgha.
He would not insult anyone,
and would avoid causing damage.
Restrained in the monastic code,
they would eat in moderation.
Expert in the arising of thought,
they would grasp well the pattern of the mind.
They would be devoted to practicing
serenity and discernment at the right time.
Though endowed with energy and perseverance,
and always devoted to meditation,
a wise person would not be too sure of themselves,
until they have attained the end of suffering.
For a mendicant who meditates in this way,
longing for purification,
all their defilements wither away,
and they realize quenching.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Nine
Ajjuna
I was able to lift myself up
from the water to the shore.
While being swept away by the great flood,
I penetrated the truths.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Two
Cūḷavaccha
A monk full of joy
in the teaching proclaimed by the Buddha
would realize the peaceful state,
the blissful stilling of conditions.
The Book of the Fours
Chapter One
Candana
Covered over with gold,
surrounded by all her maids,
with my son upon her hip,
my wife came to me.
I saw her coming,
the mother of my son,
adorned with jewelry and all dressed up,
like a snare of death laid down.
Then the realization
came upon me—
the danger became clear,
and I was firmly disillusioned.
Then my mind was freed—
see the excellence of the teaching!
I’ve attained the three knowledges
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
Chapter Four
Nitaka
Whose mind is like a rock,
steady, never trembling—
free of desire for desirable things,
not getting annoyed when things are annoying?
From where will suffering strike one
whose mind is developed like this?
My mind is like a rock,
steady, never trembling—
free of desire for desirable things,
not getting annoyed when things are annoying.
From where will suffering strike me
whose mind is developed like this?
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Twelve
First: Adhimutta
Your body is uncomfortably heavy,
and life is running out;
greedy for physical pleasure,
how can you find happiness as an ascetic?
Chapter Five
Kassapa the Prince
Oh, the Buddhas! Oh, the Dhammas!
Oh, the accomplishments of the Teacher!
Here a disciple may realize
such a teaching for themselves.
Through countless eons
they obtained individual identities.
This is their last,
their very final body
in the transmigration through births and deaths;
now there are no more future lives.
Chapter One
Meḷajina
When I heard the Teacher
speaking Dhamma,
I wasn’t aware of any doubt
in the all-knowing, unconquered one,
the caravan leader, the great hero,
the most excellent of charioteers.
I have no doubt
in the path or practice.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Six
Sīvali
My wishes—the purpose I had
for entering this hut—came true.
Abandoning the tendency to conceit,
I’ll realize knowledge and liberation.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Two
First: Vanavaccha
Glistening, they look like blue storm clouds,
with waters cool and streams so clear,
and covered all in ladybugs:
these rocky crags delight me!
Chapter Three
Bharata
Come, Nandaka, let’s go
to visit our preceptor.
We’ll roar our lion’s roar
before the best of Buddhas.
The sage gave us the going forth
out of compassion, so we could realize
the ending of all fetters—
now we have reached that goal.
The Book of the Twenties
Chapter One
“O Blessed One, your body’s perfect,
you’re radiant, handsome, lovely to behold;
golden colored,
with teeth so white; you’re strong.
The characteristics
of a handsome man,
the marks of a great man,
are all in your body.
Your eyes are clear, your face is fair,
you’re formidable, upright, majestic.
In the midst of the Saṅgha of ascetics,
you shine like the sun.
You’re a mendicant fine to see,
with skin of golden sheen.
But with such excellent appearance,
what do you want with the ascetic life?
You’re fit to be a king,
a wheel-turning monarch, chief of charioteers,
victorious in the four directions,
lord of all India.
Aristocrats, nobles, and kings
follow your rule.
Gotama, you should reign
as king of kings, lord of men!”
“Sela, I am a king,”
said the Buddha to Sela,
“the supreme king of the teaching.
By the teaching I roll forth the wheel
which cannot be rolled back.”
“You claim to be awakened,”
said Sela the brahmin,
“the supreme king of the teaching.
‘I roll forth the teaching’:
so you say, Gotama.
Then who is your general,
the disciple who follows the Teacher’s way?
Who keeps rolling the wheel
of the teaching you rolled forth?”
“By me the wheel was rolled forth,”
said the Buddha,
“the supreme wheel of the teaching.
Sāriputta, taking after the Realized One,
keeps it rolling on.
I have known what should be known,
and developed what should be developed,
and given up what should be given up:
and so, brahmin, I am a Buddha.
Dispel your doubt in me—
make up your mind, brahmin!
The sight of a Buddha
is hard to find again.
I am a Buddha, brahmin,
the supreme surgeon,
one of those whose appearance in the world
is hard to find again.
Holy, unequaled,
crusher of Māra’s army;
having subdued all my opponents,
I rejoice, fearing nothing from any quarter.”
“Pay heed, sirs, to what
is spoken by the seer.
The surgeon, the great hero,
roars like a lion in the jungle.
Holy, unequaled,
crusher of Māra’s army;
who would not be inspired by him,
even one whose nature is dark?
Those who wish may follow me;
those who don’t may go.
Right here, I’ll go forth in the presence of him,
this man of such splendid wisdom.”
“Sir, if you like
the teaching of the Buddha,
we’ll also go forth in the presence of him,
this man of such splendid wisdom.”
“These three hundred brahmins
with joined palms held up, ask:
‘May we lead the spiritual life
in your presence, Blessed One?’”
“The spiritual life is well explained,”
said the Buddha,
“visible in this very life, immediately effective.
Here the going forth isn’t in vain
for one who trains with diligence.”
“This is the eighth day since
we went for refuge, O seer.
In these seven days, Blessed One,
we’ve become tamed in your teaching.
You are the Buddha, you are the Teacher,
you are the sage who has overcome Māra;
you have cut off the underlying tendencies,
you’ve crossed over, and you bring humanity across.
You have transcended attachments,
your defilements are shattered;
by not grasping, like a lion,
you’ve given up fear and dread.
These three hundred mendicants
stand with joined palms raised.
Stretch out your feet, great hero:
let these giants worship the Teacher.”
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eleven
Setuccha
Deceived by conceit,
defiled among conditions,
oppressed by gain and loss,
they don’t reach immersion.
Chapter One
Khujjasobhita
“One of those monks who live in Pāṭaliputta—
such brilliant speakers, and very learned—
stands at the door:
the old man, Khujjasobhita.
One of those monks who live in Pāṭaliputta—
such brilliant speakers, and very learned—
stands at the door:
an old man, trembling in the wind.”
“By war well fought, by sacrifice well made,
by victory in battle;
by leading the spiritual life:
that’s how one prospers in happiness.”
Chapter Two
Jotidāsa
People who act harshly—
attacking people,
tying them up,
hurting them in all kinds of ways—
they’re treated in the same way;
their deeds don’t vanish.
Whatever deeds a person does,
whether good or bad,
they are the heir to each
and every deed they do.
The Book of the Eights
Chapter One
Sirimitta
Free of anger and hostility,
free of deceit, and rid of slander;
that’s how such a mendicant
doesn’t grieve after passing away.
Free of anger and hostility,
free of deceit, and rid of slander;
that’s how a mendicant with sense doors always guarded
doesn’t grieve after passing away.
Free of anger and hostility,
free of deceit, and rid of slander;
that’s how a mendicant of good morals
doesn’t grieve after passing away.
Free of anger and hostility,
free of deceit, and rid of slander;
that’s how a mendicant with good friends
doesn’t grieve after passing away.
Free of anger and hostility,
free of deceit, and rid of slander;
that’s how a mendicant of good wisdom,
doesn’t grieve after passing away.
Whoever has faith in the Realized One,
unwavering and well grounded;
whose ethical conduct is good,
praised and loved by the noble ones;
who has confidence in the Saṅgha,
and correct view:
they’re said to be prosperous;
their life is not in vain.
So let the wise devote themselves
to faith, ethical behavior,
confidence, and insight into the teaching,
remembering the instructions of the Buddhas.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Three
Jambugāmikaputta
Aren’t you obsessed with clothes?
Don’t you just love jewelry?
Is it not you—and no-one else—
who spreads the scent of virtue?
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eight
Suyāmana
Sensual desire, ill will,
dullness and drowsiness,
restlessness, and doubt
are not found in a monk at all.
Chapter Five
Sandhita
Beneath the Bodhi Tree,
bright green and growing,
being mindful, my perception
became one with the Buddha.
It’s been thirty one eons
since I gained that perception;
and it’s due to that perception
that I’ve attained the ending of defilements.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Four
Kumāputta
Learning is good, living well is good,
the homeless life is always good.
Questions on the meaning, actions that are skillful:
this is the ascetic life for one who has nothing.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Two
Siṅgāla’s Father
There was an heir of the Buddha,
a monk in Bhesakaḷā forest,
who suffused the entire earth
with the perception of bones.
I think he will quickly
get rid of sensual desire.
The Book of the Sixes
Chapter One
Sappadāsa
In the twenty-five years
since I went forth,
I have not found peace of mind,
even as long as a finger-snap.
Since I couldn’t get my mind unified,
I was racked by desire for pleasures of the senses.
Wailing, with outstretched arms,
I left my dwelling.
Shall I … or shall I slit my wrists?
What’s the point of living?
For how on earth can one such as me die
after resigning the training?
Then I picked up a razor,
I sat on a cot:
the razor was ready
to slice my vein.
Then the realization
came upon me—
the danger became clear,
and I was firmly disillusioned.
Then my mind was freed—
see the excellence of the teaching!
I’ve attained the three knowledges,
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Two
Irrigators guide water,
fletchers shape arrows,
carpenters carve wood;
those true to their vows tame themselves.
Chapter Two
Second: Kimbila
In Pācīnavaṁsa grove
the companions of the Sakyans,
having given up great wealth,
are happy with the scraps in their bowls.
Energetic, resolute,
always staunchly vigorous;
having given up mundane delights,
they enjoy the delights of the Dhamma.
The Book of the Fives
Chapter One
Girimānanda
The sky rains down, like a beautiful song;
my little hut is roofed and pleasant, sheltered from the wind;
I meditate there, peaceful:
so rain, sky, if you wish.
The sky rains down, like a beautiful song;
my little hut is roofed and pleasant, sheltered from the wind;
I meditate there, my mind at peace:
so rain, sky, if you wish.
The sky rains down, like a beautiful song;
I meditate there, free of lust:
The sky rains down, like a beautiful song;
I meditate there, free of hate:
The sky rains down, like a beautiful song;
I meditate there, free of delusion:
so rain, sky, if you wish.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Ten
Mettaji
Homage to that Blessed One,
the glorious Sakyan!
Having reached the best,
he beautifully taught the best teaching.
Chapter One
Paccaya
I went forth five days ago,
a trainee, my heart’s desire unfulfilled.
I entered my dwelling
and resolved in my heart:
I won’t eat; I won’t drink;
I won’t leave my dwelling;
nor will I lie down on my side—
not until the dart of craving is drawn out.
See my energy and vigor
as I meditate like this!
I’ve attained the three knowledges
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
Chapter One
Even a master of the three knowledges,
who has conquered death, and is without defilements,
is looked down upon for being unknown
by ignorant fools.
But any person here
who gets food and drink
is honored by them,
even if they are of bad character.
Chapter Four
Migasira
When I had gone forth
in the teaching of the Buddha,
while letting go, I rose up;
escaping the sensual realm.
Then, as the supreme one looked on,
my mind was freed.
My freedom is unshakable
with the ending of all fetters.
Chapter One
Uttarapāla
I was, indeed, an astute scholar,
competent to think on the meaning.
The five kinds of sensual stimulation in the world,
so delusory, were my downfall.
Leaping into Māra’s domain,
I was struck by a powerful dart.
But I was able to free myself
from the trap laid by the King of Death.
I have given up all sensual pleasures;
all rebirths are shattered;
transmigration through births is finished;
now there are no more future lives.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Six
Kosalavihārin
I went forth out of faith
and built a little hut in the wilderness.
I’m heedful, ardent,
aware, and mindful.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Two
Dāsaka
One who gets drowsy from overeating,
fond of sleep, rolling round the bed
like a great hog stuffed with grain:
that idiot is reborn again and again.
The Book of the Fifties
Chapter One
Tālapuṭa
Oh, when will I stay in a mountain cave,
alone, with no companion,
discerning all states of existence as impermanent?
This hope of mine, when will it be?
Oh, when will I stay happily in the forest,
a sage wearing a torn robe, dressed in ocher,
unselfish, with no need for hope,
with greed, hate, and delusion destroyed?
Oh, when will I stay alone in the wood,
fearless, discerning this body as impermanent,
a nest of death and disease,
oppressed by death and old age; when will it be?
Oh, when will I live, having grasped the sharp sword of wisdom
and cut the creeper of craving that tangles around everything,
the mother of fear, the bringer of suffering?
When will it be?
Oh, when will I, seated on the lion’s throne,
swiftly grasp the sword of the sages,
forged by wisdom, of fiery might,
and swiftly break Māra and his army? When will it be?
Oh, when will I be seen striving in the assemblies
by those who are virtuous, poised, respecting the Dhamma,
seeing things as they are, with faculties subdued?
When will it be?
Oh, when will I focus on my own goal at the Mountainfold,
free of oppression by laziness, hunger, thirst,
wind, heat, insects, and reptiles?
When will it be?
Oh, when will I, serene and mindful,
understand the four truths,
that were realized by the great hermit,
and are so very hard to see? When will it be?
Oh, when will I, devoted to serenity,
see with understanding the infinite sights,
sounds, smells, tastes, touches, and thoughts
as burning? When will it be?
Oh, when will I not be downcast
because of criticism,
nor elated because of praise?
When will it be?
Oh when will I discern the aggregates
and the infinite varieties of phenomena,
both internal and external, as no more than
wood, grass, and creepers? When will it be?
Oh, when will the rain clouds in season
freshly wet me in my robe in the forest,
walking the path trodden by the sages?
When will it be?
Oh, when will I rise up, intent on attaining the deathless,
hearing, in the mountain cave,
the cry of the crested peacock in the forest?
When will it be?
Oh, when will I cross the Ganges, Yamunā,
and Sarasvatī rivers, the Pātāla country,
and the dangerous Baḷavāmukha sea,
by psychic power unimpeded? When will it be?
Oh, when will I be devoted to absorption,
rejecting entirely the signs of beauty,
splitting apart desire for sensual stimulation,
like an elephant that wanders free of ties? When will it be?
Oh, when will I realize the teaching of the great hermit
and be content, like a poor person in debt,
harassed by creditors, who finds a hidden treasure?
When will it be?
For many years you begged me,
“Enough of living in a house for you!”
Why do you not urge me on, mind,
now that I’ve gone forth as an ascetic?
Didn’t you entice me, mind:
“On the Mountainfold, the birds with colorful wings,
greeting the thunder, Mahinda’s voice,
will delight you as you meditate in the forest?”
'In my family circle, friends, loved ones, and relatives;
and in the world, sports and play, and sensual pleasures;
all these I gave up when I entered this life:
and even then you’re not content with me, mind!
This is mine alone, it doesn’t belong to others;
when it is time to don your armor, why lament?
Reflecting that all this is unstable,
I went forth, longing for the deathless state.
The methodical teacher, supreme among people,
great physician, guide for those who wish to train, said:
“The mind fidgets like a monkey,
so it’s very hard to control if you are not free of lust.”
Sensual pleasures are diverse, sweet, delightful;
an ignorant ordinary person is bound to them.
Seeking to be reborn again, they wish for suffering;
led on by their mind, they’re relegated to hell.
“Staying in the grove resounding with cries
of peacocks and herons, and honored by leopards and tigers,
abandon concern for the body, without fail!”
So you used to urge me, mind.
“Develop the absorptions and spiritual faculties,
the powers, awakening factors, and immersion;
realize the three knowledges in the teaching of the Buddha!”
So you used to urge me, mind.
“Develop the eightfold path for realizing the deathless,
emancipating, plunging into the end of all suffering,
and cleansing all defilements!”
So you used to urge me, mind.
“Reflect properly on the aggregates as suffering,
and abandon that from which suffering arises;
make an end of suffering in this very life!”
So you used to urge me, mind.
“Properly discern that impermanence is suffering,
that emptiness is non-self, and that misery is death.
Uproot the wandering mind!”
So you used to urge me, mind.
“Bald, unsightly, accursed,
seek alms amongst families, bowl in hand.
Devote yourself to the word of the teacher, the great hermit!”
So you used to urge me, mind.
“Wander the streets well-restrained,
unattached to families and sensual pleasures,
like the full moon on a bright night!”
So you used to urge me, mind.
“Be a wilderness-dweller and an alms-eater,
one who lives in charnel grounds, a rag-robe wearer,
one who never lies down, always delighting in ascetic practices.”
So you used to urge me, mind.
Mind, when you urge me to the impermanent and unstable,
you’re acting like someone who plants trees,
then, when they’re about to fruit,
wishes to cut down the very same trees.
Incorporeal mind, far-traveler, lone-wanderer:
I won’t do your bidding any more.
Sensual pleasures are suffering, painful, and very dangerous;
I’ll wander with my mind focused only on quenching.
I didn’t go forth due to bad luck or shamelessness,
or due to a whim or banishment,
nor for the sake of a livelihood;
it was because I agreed to the promise you made, mind.
“Having few wishes, abandoning disparagement,
the stilling of suffering: these are praised by good people.”
So you used to urge me, mind,
but now you keep on with your old habits!
Craving, ignorance, the loved and unloved,
pretty sights, pleasant feelings,
and the delightful kinds of sensual stimulation:
I’ve vomited them all, and I won’t swallow them back.
I’ve done your bidding everywhere, mind!
For many births, I’ve done nothing to upset you,
yet this self-made chain is your show of gratitude!
For a long time I’ve transmigrated in the suffering you’ve created.
Only you, mind, make a brahmin;
you make an aristocrat or a royal hermit.
Sometimes we become traders or workers;
and life as a god is also on account of you.
You alone make us demons;
because of you we’re born in hell.
Then sometimes we become animals,
and life as a ghost is also on account of you.
Come what may, you won’t betray me again,
dazzling me with your ever-changing display!
You play with me like I’m mad—
but how have I ever failed you, mind?
In the past my mind wandered
how it wished, where it liked, as it pleased.
Now I’ll carefully guide it,
as a trainer with a hook guides a rutting elephant.
The teacher willed that this world appear to me
as impermanent, unstable, insubstantial.
Mind, let me leap into the victor’s teaching,
carry me over the great flood, so hard to pass.
Things have changed, mind!
Nothing could make me return to your control!
I’ve gone forth in the teaching of the great hermit,
those like me don’t come to ruin.
Mountains, oceans, rivers, the earth;
the four directions, the intermediate directions, below and in the sky;
the three realms of existence are all impermanent and troubled—
where can you go to find happiness, mind?
Mind, what will you do to someone who has made the ultimate commitment?
Nothing could make me a follower under your control, mind;
there’s no way I’d touch a bellows with a mouth open at each end;
curse this mortal frame flowing with nine streams!
You’ve ascended the mountain peak, full of nature’s beauty,
frequented by boars and antelopes,
a grove sprinkled with fresh water in the rains;
and there you’ll be happy in your cave-home.
Peacocks with beautiful necks and crests,
colorful tail-feathers and wings,
crying out at the resounding thunder:
they’ll delight you as you meditate in the forest.
When the sky has rained down, and the grass is four inches high,
and the grove is full of flowers like a cloud,
in the mountain cleft, like the fork of a tree, I’ll lie;
it will be as soft as cotton-buds.
I’ll act as a master does:
let whatever I get be enough for me.
And that’s why I’ll make you as supple
as a tireless worker makes a cat-skin bag.
I’ll act as a master does:
let whatever I get be enough for me.
I’ll control you with my energy,
as a skilled trainer controls an elephant with a hook.
Now that you’re well-tamed and reliable,
I can use you, like a trainer uses a straight-running horse,
to practice the path so full of grace,
cultivated by those who take care of their minds.
I shall strongly fasten you to a meditation subject,
as an elephant is tied to a post with firm rope.
You’ll be well-guarded by me, well-developed by mindfulness,
and unattached to rebirth in all states of existence.
You’ll use understanding to cut the follower of the wrong path,
curb them by practice, and settle them on the right path.
And when you have seen the cause of suffering arise and pass away,
you’ll be an heir to the greatest teacher.
Under the sway of the four distortions, mind,
you dragged me around like a bull in a pit;
but now you won’t associate with the great sage of compassion,
the cutter of fetters and bonds?
Like a deer roaming free in the colorful forest,
I’ll ascend the lovely mountain wreathed in cloud,
and rejoice to be on that hill, free of folk—
there is no doubt you’ll perish, mind.
The men and women who live under your will and command,
whatever pleasure they experience,
they are ignorant and fall under Māra’s control;
loving life, they’re your disciples, mind.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter One
Kaṅkhārevata
See this wisdom of the Realized Ones!
Like a fire blazing in the night,
giving light, giving vision,
they dispel the doubt of those who’ve come.
That is how this verse was recited by the senior venerable Kaṅkhārevata.
The Book of the Fives
Chapter One
Vaḍḍha
Actually, it turned out to be a good thing,
how my mother spurred me on.
When I heard her words,
advised by my mother,
energetic and resolute,
I realized supreme awakening.
I’m perfected, worthy of offerings,
master of the three knowledges, seer of the deathless.
I’ve conquered the army of Namuci,
and live without defilements.
Those defilements that were found in me,
internally and externally,
are all cut off without remainder,
and will not arise again.
My self-assured sister
said this to me:
“Now neither you nor I
have any entanglements.”
Suffering is at an end;
this bag of bones is my last
in the transmigration through births and deaths;
now there are no more future lives.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Twelve
First: Pārāpariya
I’ve given up the six spheres of sense-contact,
my sense-doors are guarded and well restrained;
I’ve ejected the root of misery
and attained the ending of defilements.
Chapter Four
Soṇapoṭiriya
Night, with her garland of stars,
is not only for sleeping.
For those who know,
this night is really for waking.
Were I to fall from the back of an elephant,
trampled by the tuskers that follow,
better for me to die in battle,
than to live on in defeat.
The Book of the Forties
Chapter One
Mahākassapa
“You shouldn’t live for the adulation of a following;
it turns your mind, making it hard to get immersion.
Seeing that popularity is suffering,
you shouldn’t consent to a following.
A sage should not visit respectable families;
it turns your mind, making it hard to get immersion.
If you’re eager and greedy for flavors,
you’ll miss the goal that brings such happiness.
They know it really is a bog,
this homage and veneration in respectable families.
Honor is a subtle dart, hard to extract,
and hard for a sinner to give up.”
“I came down from my lodging
and entered the city for alms.
I courteously stood by
while a leper ate.
With his putrid hand
he offered me a morsel.
Putting the morsel in my bowl,
his finger dropped off right there.
Sitting by a wall,
I ate that lump of rice.
I did not feel any disgust
while eating or afterwards.
Anyone who makes use of
leftovers for food,
fermented urine as medicine,
the root of a tree as lodging,
and cast-off rags as robes,
is at ease in any quarter.”
“Where some have fallen to ruin
while climbing the mountain,
there Kassapa ascends;
an heir of the Buddha,
aware and mindful,
owing to his psychic powers.
Returning from alms-round,
Kassapa ascends the mountain,
and practices absorption without grasping,
with fear and dread given up.
Returning from alms-round,
Kassapa ascends the mountain,
and practices absorption without grasping,
quenched amongst those who burn.
Returning from alms-round,
Kassapa ascends the mountain,
and practices absorption without grasping,
his task completed, free of defilements.”
“Strewn with garlands of the musk-rose tree,
these regions are so delightful, so lovely,
echoing with the trumpeting of elephants:
these rocky crags delight me!
Glistening, they look like blue storm clouds,
with waters cool and streams so clear,
and covered all in ladybugs:
these rocky crags delight me!
Like the peak of a blue storm cloud,
or like a fine bungalow, lovely,
echoing with the trumpeting of elephants:
these rocky crags delight me!
The rain comes down on the lovely flats,
in the mountains frequented by hermits.
Echoing with the cries of peacocks,
these rocky crags delight me!
It’s enough for me,
who loves absorption and is resolute, to be mindful.
It’s enough for me,
a resolute monk who loves the goal.
It’s enough for me,
a resolute monk who loves comfort.
It’s enough for me,
resolute and poised, loving meditation.
Covered with flowers of flax,
like the sky covered with clouds,
full of flocks of many different birds,
these rocky crags delight me!
Empty of householders,
frequented by herds of deer,
full of flocks of many different birds,
these rocky crags delight me!
The water’s clear and the rocks are broad,
monkeys and deer are all around;
festooned with dewy moss,
these rocky crags delight me!”
“Even the music of a five-piece band
can never give such pleasure
as when, with unified mind,
you rightly discern the Dhamma.”
“Don’t get involved in lots of work,
avoid people, and don’t try to acquire things.
If you’re eager and greedy for flavors,
you’ll miss the goal that brings such happiness.
Don’t get involved in lots of work,
avoid what doesn’t lead to the goal.
The body gets worn out and fatigued,
and when you ache, you won’t find serenity.”
“You won’t see yourself
by merely reciting words,
wandering stiff-necked
and thinking, ‘I’m better than them.’
The fool is no better,
but they think they are.
The wise don’t praise
stuck-up people.
Whoever is not affected
by the modes of conceit—
‘I am better’, ‘I’m not better’,
‘I am worse’, or ‘I am the same’—
with such understanding, poised,
steady in ethics,
and devoted to serenity of mind:
that is who the wise praise.”
“Whoever has no respect
for their spiritual companions
is as far from the true teaching
as the earth is from the sky.
Those whose conscience and shame
are always rightly established,
thrive in the spiritual life;
for them, there are no future lives.
When a mendicant who is haughty and fickle
wears rags from the rubbish-heap,
that doesn’t make them shine:
they’re like a monkey in a lion skin.
But if they are steady and stable,
alert, with senses restrained,
then, wearing rags from the rubbish-heap, they shine
like a lion in a mountain cave.”
“These many gods
powerful and glorious,
all 10,000 of them,
belong to the host of Brahmā.
They stand with joined palms
honoring Sāriputta,
the general of the Dhamma, the hero,
the serene great meditator:
‘Homage to you, O thoroughbred!
Homage to you, supreme among men!
We don’t understand
the basis of your absorption.
The profound domain of the Buddhas
is truly amazing.
We don’t understand,
though we’ve gathered here to split hairs.’
When he saw the host of gods
paying homage to Sāriputta—
who is truly worthy of homage—
Kappina smiled.”
“As far as the range of the Buddha extends,
I am outstanding in austerities.
I have no equal,
apart from the great sage himself.
I’ve served the teacher
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
The heavy burden is laid down,
now there’ll be no more future lives.”
“Like a lotus flower
to which water will not stick,
Gotama the immeasurable is unstained
by robes, lodgings, or food.
He inclines to renunciation,
and has escaped the three states of existence.
The great sage’s neck is mindfulness meditation;
faith is his hands, and wisdom his head.
Having great knowledge,
he always wanders, quenched.”
The Book of the Sixes
Chapter One
I, Kulla, went to a charnel ground
and saw a woman’s body abandoned there,
discarded in a cemetery,
full of worms that devoured.
“See this bag of bones, Kulla—
diseased, filthy, rotten,
oozing and trickling,
a fool’s delight.”
Taking the teaching as a mirror
for realizing knowledge and vision,
I examined this body,
hollow, inside and out.
As this is, so is that;
as that is, so is this.
As below, so above;
as above, so below.
As by day, so by night;
as by night, so by day.
As before, so after;
as after, so before.
Even the music of a five-piece band
can never give such pleasure
as when, with unified mind,
you rightly discern the Dhamma.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Ten
Abhaya
When you see a sight, mindfulness is lost
as attention latches on a pleasant feature.
Experiencing it with a mind full of desire,
you keep clinging to it.
Your defilements grow,
leading to the root of rebirth.
Chapter One
Vaṅgīsa
“Now that I’ve gone forth
from the lay life to homelessness,
I’m overrun
by the impudent thoughts of the Dark One.
Even if a thousand mighty princes and great archers,
well trained, with strong bows,
were to completely surround me;
I would never flee.
And even if women come,
many more than that,
they won’t scare me,
for I stand firm in the teaching.
I heard this with my own ears
from the Buddha, Kinsman of the Sun,
about the path going to extinguishment;
that’s what delights my mind.
Wicked One, if you come near me
as I meditate like this,
I’ll make sure that you, Death,
won’t even see the path I take.”
“Giving up discontent and desire,
along with all thoughts of the lay life,
they wouldn’t get entangled in anything;
unentangled, disentangled: that’s a real mendicant.
Whether on this earth or in the sky,
whatever in the world is included in form
wears out, it is all impermanent;
the thoughtful live having comprehended this truth.
People are bound to their attachments,
to what is seen, heard, felt, and thought.
Unstirred, dispel desire for these things;
for one called ‘a sage’ does not cling to them.
Attached to the sixty wrong views, and full of their own opinions,
ordinary people are fixed in wrong principles.
But that mendicant wouldn’t join a sectarian group,
still less would they utter lewd speech.
Clever, long serene,
free of deceit, alert, without envy,
the sage has reached the state of peace;
and because he’s extinguished, he awaits his time.”
“Give up conceit, Gotama!
Completely abandon the different kinds of conceit!
Besotted with the different kinds of conceit,
you’ve had regrets for a long time.
Smeared by smears and slain by conceit,
people fall into hell.
When people slain by conceit are reborn in hell,
they grieve for a long time.
But a mendicant who practices rightly,
winner of the path, never grieves.
They enjoy happiness and a good reputation,
and they rightly call him a ‘Seer of Truth’.
So don’t be hard-hearted, be energetic,
with hindrances given up, be pure.
Then with conceit given up completely,
use knowledge to make an end, and be at peace.”
“I’ve got a burning desire for pleasure;
my mind is on fire!
Please, out of compassion, Gotama,
tell me how to quench the flames.”
“Your mind is on fire
because of a perversion of perception.
Turn away from the feature of things
that’s attractive, provoking lust.
With your mind unified and serene,
meditate on the ugly aspects of the body.
With mindfulness immersed in the body,
be full of disillusionment.
Meditate on the signless,
give up the tendency to conceit;
and when you comprehend conceit,
you will live at peace.”
“Speak only such words
that do not hurt yourself
nor harm others;
such speech is truly well spoken.
Speak only pleasing words,
words gladly welcomed.
Pleasing words are those
that bring nothing bad to others.
Truth itself is the undying word:
this is an ancient principle.
Good people say that the teaching and its meaning
are grounded in the truth.
The words spoken by the Buddha
for realizing the sanctuary, extinguishment,
for making an end of suffering:
this really is the best kind of speech.”
“Deep in wisdom, intelligent,
expert in the variety of paths;
Sāriputta, so greatly wise,
teaches Dhamma to the mendicants.
He teaches in brief,
or he speaks at length.
His call, like a myna bird,
overflows with inspiration.
While he teaches
the mendicants listen to his sweet voice,
sounding attractive,
clear and graceful.
They listen joyfully,
their hearts uplifted.”
“Today, on the fifteenth day sabbath,
five hundred monks have gathered together to purify their precepts.
These untroubled sages have cut off their fetters and bonds,
they will not be reborn again.
Just as a wheel-rolling monarch
surrounded by ministers
travels all around this
land that’s girt by sea.
So disciples with the three knowledges,
destroyers of death,
revere the winner of the battle,
the unsurpassed caravan leader.
All are sons of the Blessed One—
there is no rubbish here.
I bow to the Kinsman of the Sun,
destroyer of the dart of craving.”
“Over a thousand mendicants
revere the Holy One
as he teaches the immaculate Dhamma,
extinguishment, fearing nothing from any quarter.
They listen to the immaculate Dhamma
taught by the fully awakened Buddha;
the Buddha is so brilliant,
at the fore of the mendicant Saṅgha.
Blessed One, your name is ‘Giant’,
seventh of the sages.
You are like a great cloud
that rains on your disciples.
I’ve left my day’s meditation,
out of desire to see the teacher.
Great hero, your disciple Vaṅgīsa
bows at your feet.”
“Having overcome Māra’s devious path,
he wanders with hard-heartedness dissolved.
See him, the liberator from bonds, unattached,
analyzing the teaching.
He has explained in many ways
the path to cross the flood.
The Seers of Truth stand unfaltering
in the deathless he has explained.
The bringer of light who has pierced the truth,
he has seen what lies beyond all states of being.
When you saw and realized this for yourself,
you taught it first to the group of five.
When the Dhamma has been so well taught,
how could those who know it be negligent?
So being diligent, we should always respectfully train
in the Buddha’s teaching.”
“The senior monk who was awakened right after the Buddha,
Koṇḍañña, is keenly energetic.
He regularly gains blissful meditative states,
and the three kinds of seclusion.
Whatever can be attained by a disciple
who does the Teacher’s bidding,
he has attained it all,
through diligently training himself.
With great power and the three knowledges,
expert in comprehending the minds of others,
Koṇḍañña, the heir to the Buddha,
bows at the Teacher’s feet.”
“As the sage, who has gone beyond suffering,
sits upon the mountain slope,
he is revered by disciples with the three knowledges,
destroyers of death.
Moggallāna, of great psychic power,
comprehends with his mind,
scrutinizing their minds,
liberated, free of attachments.
So they revere Gotama,
the sage gone beyond suffering,
who is endowed with all path factors,
and with a multitude of attributes.”
“Like the moon on a cloudless night,
like the shining immaculate sun,
so too Aṅgīrasa, O great sage,
your glory outshines the entire world.”
“We used to wander, drunk on poetry,
from village to village, town to town.
Then we saw the Buddha,
who has gone beyond all things.
He, the sage gone beyond suffering,
taught me the Dhamma.
When we heard the Dhamma, we became confident—
faith arose in us.
Hearing him speak of
the aggregates, the sense-fields,
and the elements, I understood;
and then I went forth to homelessness.
It is for the benefit of many
that the Realized Ones arise—
the men and women
who follow their instructions.
It is truly for their benefit
that the sage realized awakening—
for the monks and for the nuns
who see that they’ve reached certainty.
The seer, the Buddha,
the Kinsman of the Sun,
has well taught the four noble truths
out of compassion for living creatures.
Suffering, suffering’s origin,
suffering’s transcendence,
and the noble eightfold path
that leads to the stilling of suffering.
As these things were taught,
so I have seen them.
I’ve realized my own true goal,
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
It was so welcome for me
to be in the presence of the Buddha.
Of things which are shared,
I encountered the best.
I’ve realized the perfection of direct knowledge;
my clairaudience is purified;
I am master of three knowledges, attained in psychic power,
I’m expert at reading the minds of others.”
“I ask the teacher unrivaled in wisdom,
who has cut off all doubts in this very life—
has a monk died at Aggāḷava, who was
well-known, famous, and quenched?
Nigrodhakappa was his name;
it was given to that brahmin by you, Blessed One.
He wandered in your honor, yearning for freedom,
energetic, a resolute Seer of Truth.
O Sakyan, all-seer,
all of us wish to know about that disciple.
Our ears are eager to hear,
for you are truly the most excellent teacher.
Cut off our doubt, declare this to us;
your wisdom is vast, tell us of his quenching!
All-seer, speak among us,
like the thousand-eyed Sakka in the midst of the gods!
Whatever ties there are, or paths to delusion,
or things on the side of unknowing, or that are bases of doubt
vanish on reaching a Realized One,
for his eye is the best of all people’s.
For if no man were ever to disperse corruptions,
like the wind dispersing a mass of clouds,
darkness would cover the whole world;
not even brilliant men would shine.
The wise are makers of light;
my hero, that is what I think of you.
We’ve come to you for your discernment and knowledge:
here in this assembly, declare to us about Kappāyana.
Swiftly send forth your graceful voice,
like a goose stretching its neck, gently honking,
smooth in sound, with a lovely tone:
alert, we are all listening to you.
You have entirely abandoned birth and death;
restrained and pure, speak the Dhamma!
Ordinary people can’t fulfill all their wishes,
but the Realized Ones can achieve what they wish.
Your answer is definitive, and we will accept it,
for you have perfect understanding.
We raise our joined palms one last time,
your wisdom is unrivaled, so do not knowingly confuse us.
Knowing the teaching of the noble ones from top to bottom,
your energy is unrivaled, so do not knowingly confuse us.
Like a man in the baking summer sun would long for water,
I long for the rain of your voice to fall on my ears.
Surely Kappāyana did not lead the spiritual life in vain?
Did he realize quenching,
or did he still have a remnant of defilement?
Let us hear what kind of liberation he had!”
“He cut off craving for mind and body in this very life,”
said the Buddha,
“The river of darkness that had long lain within him.
He has entirely crossed over birth and death.”
So declared the Blessed One, the leader of the five.
“Now that I have heard your words,
seventh of sages, I am confident.
My question, it seems, was not in vain,
the brahmin did not deceive me.
As he spoke, so he acted;
he was a disciple of the Buddha.
He cut the net of death the deceiver,
so extended and strong.
Blessed One, Kappāyana saw
the starting point of grasping.
He has indeed gone far beyond
Death’s domain so hard to pass.
God of gods, best of men, I bow to you,
and to your son,
who followed your example, a great hero;
a giant, rightful son of a giant.”
That is how these verses were recited by the senior venerable Vaṅgīsa.
The Verses of the Senior Monks are finished.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Six
Ramaṇīyakuṭika
My little hut is pleasing, delightful,
a gift given in faith.
I’ve no need of girls:
go, ladies, to those in need!
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Seven
Vimalakoṇḍañña
I arose from the one named after a tree;
I was born of the one whose banner shines.
The banner killer has destroyed the great banner,
by means of the banner itself.
Chapter Five
Anūpama
The conceited mind, addicted to pleasure,
impales itself on its own stake.
It always goes where
there’s a stake, a chopping block.
I declare you the demon mind!
I declare you the insidious mind!
You’ve found the teacher so hard to find—
don’t lead me away from the goal.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eleven
Khitaka
Hey! My body is light,
full of so much rapture and happiness.
My body feels like it’s floating,
like cotton in the wind.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eight
Vacchapāla
For one who sees the meaning so very subtle and fine;
who is skilled in thought and humble in manner;
who has cultivated mature ethics,
it’s not hard to gain extinguishment.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eight
Piyañjaha
Settle down when others spring up;
spring up when others settle down.
Remain when others have departed;
don’t delight when others delight.
Chapter One
Bākula
Whoever wishes to do afterwards
what they should have done before
has lost the causes for happiness,
and afterwards they’re tormented by regrets.
You should only say what you would do;
you shouldn’t say what you wouldn’t do.
The wise will recognize
one who talks without doing.
Oh! Extinguishment is so very blissful,
as taught by the fully awakened Buddha:
sorrowless, stainless, secure,
where suffering all ceases.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Twelve
Mahānāma
By Mount Nesādaka,
with its famous covering
of abundant shrubs and trees,
you’re found deficient.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Nine
Kassapa
Go, child, to any place
where there’s plenty of food,
where it’s safe and free of peril—
may you not be overcome by sorrow!
The Book of the Sevens
Chapter One
Second: Sopāka
I saw the supreme person
walking mindfully in the shade of the terrace,
so I approached,
and bowed to the supreme among men.
Arranging my robe over one shoulder
and clasping my hands together,
I walked alongside that stainless one,
supreme among all beings.
The wise one, expert in questions,
questioned me.
Brave and fearless,
I answered the teacher.
When all his questions were answered,
the Realized One congratulated me.
Looking around the mendicant Saṅgha,
he said the following:
“It is a blessing for the people of Aṅga and Magadha
that this person enjoys their
robe and almsfood,
requisites and lodgings,
their respect and service—
it’s a blessing for them,” he declared.
“Sopāka, from this day on
you are invited to come and see me.
And Sopāka, let this
be your ordination.”
At seven years old
I received ordination.
I bear my final body—
oh, the excellence of the teaching!
Chapter One
Second: Valliya
A monkey went up to the little hut
with five doors.
He circles around, knocking
on each door, again and again.
Stand still monkey, don’t run!
Things are different now;
you’ve been caught by wisdom—
you won’t go far.
Chapter Three
First: Nandaka
Though a fine thoroughbred may stumble,
it soon stands firm again.
It gains even more urgency,
and draws its load undeterred.
Even so is one accomplished in vision,
a disciple of the Buddha.
Remember me as a thoroughbred,
the Buddha’s rightful son.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Five
Mum, they weep for the dead,
or for one who’s alive but has disappeared.
I’m alive and you can see me,
so mum, why do you weep for me?
Chapter One
Second: Gotama
Transmigrating, I went to hell,
and to the ghost realm time and again.
Many times I dwelt long
in the animal realm, so full of pain.
I was also reborn as a human,
and from time to time I went to heaven.
I’ve stayed in realms of form and formlessness,
among the neither-percipient-nor-non-percipient, and the non-percipient.
I know well these states of existence are worthless—
conditioned, unstable, always in motion.
When I understood this self-made chain,
mindful, I found peace.
The Book of the Fours
Chapter One
Sappaka
When the crane with its beautiful white wings,
startled by fear of the dark thundercloud,
flees, seeking shelter—
then the River Ajakaraṇī delights me.
When the crane, so pure and white,
startled by fear of the dark thundercloud,
seeks a cave to shelter in, but can’t see one—
then the River Ajakaraṇī delights me.
Who wouldn’t be delighted
by the rose-apple trees
that adorn both banks of the river,
there, behind my cave?
Rid of snakes, that death-mad swarm,
the lazy frogs croak:
“Today isn’t the time to stray from mountain streams;
Ajakaraṇī is safe, pleasant, and delightful.”
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eight
Susārada
Good is the sight of those who’ve practiced well:
doubt is cut off and intelligence grows—
even a fool grows wise!
That’s why it’s good to meet good people.
Chapter Five
Vajjita
Transmigrating for such a long time,
I’ve proceeded through various states of rebirth,
not seeing the noble truths,
a blind, unenlightened person.
But when I became heedful,
transmigration was unbound.
All states of rebirth are cut off;
now there are no more future lives.
Chapter Four
Sivaka
Houses are impermanent—
on and on, life after life.
I’ve been searching for the house-builder—
painful is birth again and again.
I’ve seen you, house-builder!
You won’t build a house again.
Your rafters are all broken,
your ridgepole is shattered.
My mind is released from limits:
in this very life it will dissipate.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Three
Lomasakaṅgiya
With my chest I’ll thrust aside
the grasses, vines, and creepers,
and foster seclusion.
Chapter Five
Mogharāja
“Your skin is nasty but your heart is good;
Mogharāja, you’re always immersed in samādhi.
But in the nights of winter, so dark and cold,
how will you get by, monk?”
“I’ve heard that all the Magadhans
have an abundance of grain.
I’ll make my bed under a thatched roof,
just like those who live in comfort.”
The Book of the Fives
Chapter One
First: Sumana
My mentor helped me to learn,
hoping I would practice those teachings.
Aspiring to the deathless,
I’ve done what had to be done.
I’ve realized the Dhamma,
witnessing it for myself, not based on hearsay.
With purified knowledge, free of doubt,
I declare it in your presence.
I know my past lives,
my clairvoyance is purified,
I’ve realized my own true goal,
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
Being diligent in the training,
I learned your teachings well.
All my defilements are ended;
now there’ll be no more future lives.
You advised me in noble observances;
compassionate, you helped teach me.
Your instruction was not in vain—
I, your pupil, am fully trained.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Seven
Meghiya
He counseled me, the great hero,
the one who has gone beyond all things.
When I heard his teaching
I stayed close by him, mindful.
I’ve attained the three knowledges
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Twelve
Isidatta
The five aggregates are fully understood,
they remain, but their root is cut.
I have reached the end of suffering
and attained the ending of defilements.
The Book of the Tens
Chapter One
Cūḷapanthaka
My progress was slow,
I was despised in the past.
Even my brother turned me away,
saying, “Go home now.”
Turned away at the gate
of the Saṅgha’s monastery,
I stood there sadly,
longing for the dispensation.
Then the Buddha came
and touched my head.
Taking me by the arm,
he brought me into the Saṅgha’s monastery.
The Teacher, out of compassion,
gave me a foot-wiping cloth, saying:
“Focus your awareness
exclusively on this clean cloth.”
After hearing his words,
I happily did his bidding.
I practiced meditative immersion
for the attainment of the highest goal.
I know my past lives,
my clairvoyance is clarified;
I’ve attained the three knowledges,
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
I, Panthaka, created a thousand
images of myself,
and sat in the delightful mango grove
until the time for the meal offering was announced.
Then the teacher sent to me
a messenger to announce the time.
When the time was announced,
I flew to him through the air.
I paid homage at the teacher’s feet,
and sat to one side.
When he knew I was seated,
the teacher received the offering.
Recipient of gifts from the whole world,
receiver of sacrifices,
field of merit for humanity,
he received the religious donation.
The Book of the Twenties
Chapter One
Telakāni
For a long time, sadly,
though I keenly contemplated the teaching,
I gained no peace of mind.
So I asked this of ascetics and brahmins:
“Who has crossed over the world?
Whose attainment culminates in the deathless?
Whose teaching do I accept
to understand the highest goal?
I was hooked inside,
like a fish gulping bait;
bound like the demon Vepaciti
in Mahinda’s trap.
Dragging it along, I’m not free
from grief and lamentation.
Who will free me from bonds in the world,
so that I may know awakening?
What ascetic or brahmin
points out what is frail?
Whose teaching do I accept
to sweep away old age and death?
Tied up with uncertainty and doubt,
secured by the power of pride,
rigid as a mind beset by anger;
the arrow of covetousness,
propelled by the bow of craving,
is stuck in my twice-fifteen ribs—
see how it stands in my breast,
breaking my strong heart.
Speculative views are not abandoned,
they are sharpened by memories and intentions;
and pierced by this I tremble,
like a leaf blowing in the wind.
Having arisen within,
what belongs to me burns quickly,
in that place where the body always heads
with its six sense-fields of contact.
I don’t see a healer
who can pull out my dart of doubt
without a lance
or some other blade.
Without knife or wound,
who will pull out this dart
that’s stuck inside me,
without harming any part of my body?
He really would be the Lord of the Dhamma,
the best one to cure the damage of poison;
when I have fallen into deep waters,
he would give me his hand and bring me to the shore.
I’ve plunged into a lake,
and I can’t wash off the mud and dirt.
It’s full of fraud, jealousy, pride,
and dullness and drowsiness.
Like a thunder-cloud of restlessness,
like a rain-cloud of fetters;
lustful thoughts are winds
that sweep off a person with bad views.
The streams flow everywhere;
a weed springs up and remains.
Who will block the streams?
Who will cut the weed?”
“Venerable sir, build a dam
to block the streams.
Don’t let your mind-made streams
cut you down suddenly like a tree.”
That is how the teacher whose weapon is wisdom,
surrounded by the Saṅgha of hermits,
was my shelter when I was full of fear,
seeking the far shore from the near.
As I was being swept away,
he gave me a strong, simple ladder,
made of the heartwood of Dhamma,
and he said to me: “Do not fear.”
I climbed the tower of mindfulness meditation,
and checked back down
at people delighting in identity,
as I’d obsessed over in the past.
When I saw the path,
as I was embarking on the ship,
without fixating on the self,
I saw the supreme landing-place.
The dart that arises in oneself,
and that which stems from attachment to rebirth:
he taught the supreme path
for the canceling of these.
For a long time it had lain within me;
for a long time it was fixed in me:
the Buddha cast off the knot,
curing the damage of poison.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter One
First: Puṇṇamāsa
A knowledge master, peaceful and self-controlled,
is rid of concern for this world and the world beyond.
Unsullied in the midst of all things,
they’d know the arising and passing of the world.
That is how this verse was recited by the senior venerable Puṇṇamāsa.
The Book of the Sevens
Chapter One
Bhadda
I was an only child,
loved by my mother and father.
They had me by practicing
many prayers and observances.
Out of compassion for me
wishing me well and wanting the best for me,
my mother and father
took me to see the Buddha.
“We had this son with difficulty;
he is delicate and dainty.
We offer him to you, Lord,
to attend upon the victor.”
The teacher, having accepted me,
declared to Ānanda:
“Quickly give him the going-forth—
this one will be a thoroughbred!”
After he, the teacher, had sent me forth,
the victor entered his dwelling.
Before the sun set
my mind was freed.
The teacher didn’t forget me;
when he came out from seclusion,
he said: “Come Bhadda!”
That was my ordination.
At seven years old
I received ordination.
I’ve attained the three knowledges;
oh, the excellence of the teaching!
The Book of the Fours
Chapter One
Sabhiya
Others don’t understand
that we need restraint in this.
But those who do understand this,
being clever, settle their quarrels.
And when those who don’t understand
behave as though they were immortal,
those who understand the Dhamma
are like the healthy among the sick.
Any lax act,
any corrupt observance,
or suspicious spiritual life,
is not very fruitful.
Whoever has no respect
for their spiritual companions
is as far from true Dhamma
as the sky from the earth.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eleven
Belaṭṭhānika
He’s given up the household life, but he has no purpose.
Living for his belly, lazy, he uses his snout as a plow,
like a great hog stuffed with grain.
That idiot is reborn again and again.
Chapter Three
Third: Valliya
The duty of one whose energy is strong;
the duty of one who longs to wake up:
that I’ll do, I won’t fail—
see my energy and vigor!
Teach me the path,
the direct route that culminates in the deathless.
I’ll know it with wisdom,
as the Ganges knows the ocean.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Nine
Nāgita
Elsewhere there are many other doctrines;
those paths don’t lead to quenching like this one does.
For the Buddha himself instructs the Saṅgha;
the Teacher shows the palms of his hands.
Chapter Two
Heraññakāni
The days and nights rush by,
and then life is cut short.
The life of mortals wastes away,
like the water in tiny streams.
But while doing bad deeds
the fool doesn’t realize—
it’ll be bitter later on;
for the result will be bad for them.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Six
Añjanavaniya
I plunged into the Añjana forest
and made a little hut to live in.
I’ve attained the three knowledges
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Five
Ujjaya
Homage to you, O Buddha, O hero,
freed in every way!
Meditating in the fruits of your practice,
I live without defilements.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Ten
Second: Tissa
Giving up a valuable bronze bowl,
and a precious golden one, too,
I took a bowl made of clay:
this is my second initiation.
Chapter Four
Second: Usabha
Arranging a robe over my shoulder,
the color of young mango sprouts,
I entered the village for alms
sitting on an elephant’s neck!
But when I dismounted from the elephant,
I was struck with a sense of urgency.
I burned with shame, but then I found peace,
and attained the ending of defilements.
Chapter Three
Vītasoka
The barber approached
to shave my head.
I picked up a mirror
and examined my body.
My body appeared hollow;
I once was blind, but the darkness disappeared.
My fancy hairdo has been cut off:
now there’ll be no more future lives.
Chapter One
Mātaṅgaputta
“It’s too cold, too hot,
too late,” they say.
When the young neglect their work like this,
opportunities pass them by.
But one who considers heat and cold
as nothing more than blades of grass—
he does his duties as a man,
and his happiness never fails.
With my chest I’ll thrust aside
the grasses, vines, and creepers,
and foster seclusion.
The Book of the Thirteens
Chapter One
Soṇakoḷivisa
He who was special in the kingdom,
the footman to the king of Aṅga,
today is special in the Dhamma—
Soṇa has gone beyond suffering.
Five to cut, five to drop,
and five more to develop.
A monk who has got over five kinds of clinging
is called “One who has crossed the flood”.
If a monk is insolent and negligent,
concerned only with externals,
their ethics, immersion, and wisdom
do not become fulfilled.
They disregard what should be done,
and do what should not be done.
For the insolent and the negligent,
their defilements only grow.
Those that have properly undertaken
constant mindfulness of the body,
don’t cultivate what should not be done,
but always do what should be done.
Mindful and aware,
their defilements come to an end.
The straight path has been explained—
go on it and don’t turn back.
Urge yourself on
and make it to quenching.
When my energy was over-exerted,
the supreme Teacher in the world
created the simile of the lute for me.
The Seer taught the Dhamma,
and when I heard what he said,
I happily did his bidding.
Practicing serenity of mind
for the attainment of the highest goal.
I’ve attained the three knowledges
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
When you’re dedicated to renunciation
and seclusion of the heart;
when you’re dedicated to kindness
and the end of grasping;
when you’re dedicated to the ending of craving
and clarity of heart;
and you’ve seen the arising of the senses,
your mind is rightly freed.
For that one, rightly freed,
a mendicant with peaceful mind,
there’s nothing to be improved,
and nothing more to do.
As the wind cannot stir
a solid mass of rock,
so too sights, tastes, sounds,
smells, and touches—the lot—
and thoughts, whether liked or disliked,
don’t disturb the poised one.
Their mind is steady and unfettered
as they observe disappearance.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter One
Pilindavaccha
It was welcome, not unwelcome,
the advice I got was good.
Of things which are shared,
I encountered the best.
That is how this verse was recited by the senior venerable Pilindavaccha.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eight
Hatthārohaputta
In the past my mind wandered
how it wished, where it liked, as it pleased.
Now I’ll carefully guide it,
as a trainer with a hook guides a rutting elephant.
Chapter Three
Second: Puṇṇamāsa
I gave up the five hindrances
for the sake of finding sanctuary.
I took Dhamma as a mirror
for knowing and seeing myself.
I examined this body,
all of it, inside and out.
Internally and externally
my body appeared hollow.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Twelve
Jenta
Going forth is hard; living at home is hard;
Dhamma is profound; money is hard to come by.
Getting by is difficult for we who accept whatever comes,
so we should always think about impermanence.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Three
First: Hārita
Straighten yourself,
like a fletcher straightens an arrow.
When your mind is upright, Hārita,
break ignorance to bits!
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Four
First: Sopāka
Just as a mother would be good
to her beloved and only son;
so, to creatures all and everywhere,
let one be good.
The Book of the Fives
Chapter One
Vijitasena
I’ll cage you, mind,
like an elephant in a stockade.
Born of the flesh, that net of the senses,
I won’t urge you to do bad.
Caged, you won’t go anywhere,
like an elephant who can’t find an open gate.
Demon-mind, you won’t wander again and again,
bullying, in love with wickedness.
Just as a strong trainer with a hook
takes a wild, newly captured elephant
and wins it over against its will,
so I’ll win you over.
Just as a fine charioteer, skilled in the taming
of fine horses, tames a thoroughbred,
so I’ll tame you,
firmly established in the five powers.
I’ll bind you with mindfulness;
devout, I shall tame you;
kept in check by harnessed energy,
mind, you won’t go far from here.
The Book of the Twelves
Chapter One
Sīlava
One should train just in ethical conduct,
for in this world, when ethical conduct is
cultivated and well-trained,
it provides all success.
Wishing for three kinds of happiness—
praise, prosperity,
and to delight in heaven after passing away—
the wise would take care of their ethics.
The well-behaved have many friends,
because of their self-restraint.
But one lacking ethics, of bad conduct,
drives away their friends.
A person whose ethics are bad has
ill-repute and infamy.
A person whose conduct is ethical always has
a good reputation, fame, and praise.
Ethical conduct is the starting point and foundation;
the mother at the head
of all good things:
that’s why you should purify your ethics.
Ethics provide a boundary and a restraint,
an enjoyment for the mind;
the ford where all the Buddhas cross over:
that’s why you should purify your ethics.
Ethics are the matchless power;
ethics are the ultimate weapon;
ethics are the best ornament;
ethics are a marvelous coat of armor.
Ethics are a mighty bridge;
ethics are the unsurpassed scent;
ethics are the best perfume,
that float from place to place.
Ethics are the best provision;
ethics are the unsurpassed supply for a journey;
ethics are the best vehicle
that take you from place to place.
In this life they’re criticized;
after departing they grieve in a lower realm;
a fool is unhappy everywhere,
because they are unsteady in ethics.
In this life they’re renowned;
after departing they’re happy in heaven;
a wise one is happy everywhere,
because they are steady in ethics.
Ethical conduct is best in this life,
but one with wisdom is supreme.
Someone with both virtue and wisdom
is victorious among men and gods.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Three
First: Uttiya
When I was ill in the past,
mindfulness arose in me.
Now I am ill once more—
it’s time for me to be heedful.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Four
Gavampati
His psychic power made the river Sarabhu stand still;
Gavampati is unbound and unperturbed.
The gods bow to that great sage, who has gone beyond all clinging,
and gone beyond rebirth.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Three
Cittaka
Crested peacocks with beautiful blue necks
cry out in Karaṁvī.
Stirred by a cool breeze,
they wake the sleeper to practice absorption.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Ten
Third: Uttiya
When you hear a sound, mindfulness is lost
as attention latches on a pleasant feature.
Experiencing it with a mind full of desire,
you keep clinging to it.
Your defilements grow,
leading to transmigration.
The Book of the Twelves
Chapter One
Sunīta
I was born in a low-class family.
We were poor, with little to eat.
My job was lowly—
I threw out the old flowers.
Shunned by people,
I was disregarded and held in contempt.
I humbled my heart
and paid respects to many people.
Then I saw the Buddha
at the fore of the mendicant Saṅgha;
the great hero
was entering the capital city of Magadhā.
I dropped my flail
and approached to pay homage.
Out of compassion for me,
the supreme man stood still.
When I had paid homage at the Teacher’s feet,
I stood to one side
and asked the supreme being
for the going-forth.
Then the Teacher, being sympathetic,
and having compassion for the whole world,
said to me, “Come, monk!”
That was my ordination.
Staying alone in the wilderness,
meditating tirelessly,
I have completed what the Teacher taught,
just as the victor advised me.
In the first watch of the night,
I recollected my past lives.
In the middle watch of the night,
I purified my clairvoyance.
In the last watch of the night,
I shattered the mass of darkness.
At the end of the night,
as the sunrise drew near,
Indra and Brahmā came
and revered me with joined hands.
“Homage to you, O thoroughbred!
Homage to you, supreme among men!
Since your defilements are ended,
you, sir, are worthy of a religious donation.”
When he saw me honored
by the assembly of gods,
the teacher smiled
and said the following:
“By austerity and spiritual practice,
by restraint and by self-control:
that’s how to become a brahmin,
this is the supreme brahmin.”
Chapter One
Upāli
One newly gone forth,
who has left their home out of faith,
should mix with spiritual friends,
who are tireless and pure of livelihood.
One newly gone forth,
who has left their home out of faith,
a mendicant staying in the Saṅgha,
being wise, would train in monastic discipline.
One newly gone forth,
who has left their home out of faith,
skilled in what is appropriate and what is not,
would wander undistracted.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Seven
Ukkhepakatavaccha
Vaccha has tossed away
what he built over many years.
Sitting comfortably, uplifted with joy,
he teaches this to householders.
Chapter One
Dhaniya
If you wish to live in happiness,
longing for the ascetic life,
don’t look down on the Saṅgha’s robes,
or its food and drinks.
If you wish to live in happiness,
longing for the ascetic life,
stay in the Saṅgha’s lodgings
like a snake making use of a mouse’s hole.
If you wish to live in happiness,
longing for the ascetic life,
develop this one quality:
be content with whatever is offered.
The Book of the Fours
Chapter One
Second: Nandaka
Damn you mortal frame, you stink!
You’re on Māra’s side, you ooze!
O body, you have nine streams
that are flowing all the time.
Don’t think much of mortal frames;
don’t disparage the Realized Ones.
They’re not even aroused by heaven,
let alone by humans.
But those who are stupid fools,
with bad advisors, shrouded in delusion,
that kind of person is aroused by bodies,
when Māra has laid down the snare.
Those in whom greed, hate, and ignorance
have faded away;
such people are not aroused by bodies,
they’ve cut the strings, they’re no longer bound.
Chapter One
Vassika
I was the only one in my family
who had faith and wisdom.
It’s good for my relatives that I’m
firm in principle, and ethical.
I corrected my family out of compassion,
telling them off out of love
for my family and relatives.
They performed a service for the monks
and then they passed away,
finding happiness in the heaven of the Thirty-three.
There, my brothers and mother
enjoy all the pleasures they desire.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Three
Nigrodha
I’m not afraid of fear,
for our teacher is expert in the deathless.
Mendicants advance by the path
where no fear remains.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Three
Nandiya
Dark One, after attacking such a monk—
one who has arrived at the fruit,
and whose mind is always full of light—
you’ll fall into suffering.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Six
Second: Uttiya
The sky rains down, like a beautiful song.
My little hut is roofed and pleasant, sheltered from the wind.
I dwell there without a partner:
so rain, sky, if you wish.
The Book of the Sevens
Chapter One
Sarabhaṅga
I broke the reeds off with my hands,
made a hut, and stayed there.
That’s how I became known
as “Reed-breaker”.
But now it’s not appropriate
for me to break reeds with my hands.
The training rules have been laid down for us
by Gotama the renowned.
Previously, I, Sarabhaṅga,
didn’t see the disease in its entirety.
But now I have seen the disease,
as I’ve practiced what was taught by he who is beyond the gods.
Gotama traveled by that straight road;
the same path traveled by Vipassī,
by Sikhī, Vessabhū,
Kakusandha, Koṇāgamana, and Kassapa.
These seven Buddhas have plunged into the ending,
free of craving, without grasping,
having become Dhamma, poised.
They have taught this Dhamma
out of compassion for living creatures—
suffering, origin, path,
and cessation, the ending of suffering.
In these four noble truths,
the endless suffering of transmigration
finally comes to an end.
When the body breaks up,
and life comes to an end,
there are no future lives;
I’m everywhere well-freed.
Chapter Four
Isidinna
I’ve seen lay disciples who have memorized discourses,
saying, “Sensual pleasures are impermanent”.
But they’re obsessed with jeweled earrings,
concerned for their partners and children.
To be honest, they don’t know Dhamma,
even though they say “Sensual pleasures are impermanent”.
They don’t have the power to cut their lust,
which is why they cling to children, wives, and wealth.
Chapter Three
Bhaddaji
There was a king named Panāda
who had a sacrificial post all golden.
Its height was sixteen times its width,
and the top was a thousand-fold.
It had a thousand panels and a hundred ball-caps,
all adorned with banners, and made of gold.
There danced the fairies,
numbering seven times six thousand.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Seven
Second: Puṇṇa
Ethical conduct is best in this life,
but one with wisdom is supreme.
Someone with both virtue and wisdom
is victorious among men and gods.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Ten
Second: Devasabha
Accomplished in the four right efforts,
mindfulness meditation is your territory;
festooned with the flowers of liberation,
you’ll realize quenching without defilements.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Three
Abhaya
Having heard the fine words
of the Buddha, the Kinsman of the Sun,
I penetrated the subtle truth,
like a hair-tip with an arrow.
The Book of the Twenties
Chapter One
Third: Pārāpariya
This thought came to the ascetic
in the forest full of flowers,
as he was seated alone
meditating in seclusion:
“The behavior of the mendicants
these days seems different
from when the protector of the world,
the best of men, was still here.
Their robes were only for covering the private parts,
and protection from the cold and wind.
They ate in moderation,
content with whatever they were offered.
Whether food was refined or rough,
a little or a lot,
they ate only for sustenance,
without greed or gluttony.
They weren’t so very eager
for the requisites of life,
such as tonics and other necessities,
as they were for the ending of defilements.
In the wilderness, at a tree’s root,
in caves and caverns,
fostering seclusion,
they lived with that as their final goal.
They were used to simple things, unburdensome,
gentle, not stubborn at heart,
unsullied, not scurrilous,
their thoughts were intent on the goal.
That’s why they inspired confidence,
in their movements, eating, and practice;
their deportment was as smooth
as a stream of oil.
With the utter ending of all defilements,
those senior monks have now been quenched.
They were great meditators and great benefactors—
there are few like them today.
With the ending
of good principles and understanding,
the victor’s teaching,
full of all excellent qualities, has fallen apart.
This is the season
for bad principles and defilements.
Those who are ready for seclusion
are all that’s left of the true Dhamma.
As they grow, the defilements
possess most people;
they play with fools, it seems to me,
like monsters with the mad.
Overcome by defilements,
they run here and there
among the bases for defilement,
as if they had declared war on themselves.
Having abandoned the true teaching,
they argue with each other.
Following wrong views
they think, ‘This is better.’
They cut off their wealth,
children, and wife to go forth.
But then they do what they shouldn’t,
for the sake of a measly spoon of alms-food.
They eat until their bellies are full,
and then they lie to sleep on their backs.
When they wake up, they keep on chatting,
the kind of talk that the teacher criticized.
Valuing all the arts and crafts,
they train themselves in them.
Not being settled inside, they think,
‘This is the goal of the ascetic life.’
They provide clay, oil, and talcum powder,
water, lodgings, and food
for householders,
expecting more in return.
And in addition, tooth-picks, wood-apples,
flowers, food to eat,
well-cooked alms-food,
mangoes and myrobalans.
In medicine they are like doctors,
in business like householders,
in makeup like prostitutes,
in sovereignty like lords.
Cheats, frauds,
false witnesses, sly:
using multiple plans,
they enjoy material things.
Pursuing shams, contrivances, and plans,
by such means
they accumulate a lot of wealth
for the sake of their own livelihood.
They assemble the community
for business rather than Dhamma.
They teach the Dhamma to others
for gain, not for the goal.
Those outside the Saṅgha
quarrel over the Saṅgha’s property.
They’re shameless, and do not care
that they live on someone else’s property.
Some with shaven head and robe
are not devoted to practice,
but wish only to be honored,
besotted with property and reverence.
When things have come to this,
it’s not easy these days
to realize what has not yet been realized,
or to preserve what has been realized.
When shoeless on a thorny path,
one would walk
very mindfully;
that’s how a sage should walk in the village.
Remembering the meditators of old,
and recollecting their conduct,
even in the latter days,
it’s still possible to realize the deathless.”
That is what the ascetic, whose faculties
were fully developed, said in the sāl tree grove.
The brahmin, the hermit, became quenched,
putting an end to all future lives.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eleven
Dhammasavapitu
At 120 years old
I went forth to homelessness.
I’ve attained the three knowledges
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
The Book of the Nines
Chapter One
“Old age and death are suffering;
yet an ignorant ordinary person is bound to them.”
When an astute person fully understands this, and they are mindful, practicing absorption:
there is no greater pleasure than this.
When clinging, the carrier of suffering,
and craving, the carrier of this painful mass of proliferation,
are destroyed, and one is mindful, practicing absorption:
there is no greater pleasure than this.
When the eightfold way, so full of grace,
the supreme path, cleanser of all corruptions,
is seen with wisdom; and one is mindful, practicing absorption:
there is no greater pleasure than this.
When one develops that peaceful state,
sorrowless, stainless, unconditioned,
cleanser of all corruptions, cutter of fetters and bonds:
there is no greater pleasure than this.
When the thunder-cloud rumbles in the sky,
while the rain pours on the path of birds everywhere,
and a monk has gone to a mountain cave, practicing absorption:
there is no greater pleasure than this.
When sitting on a riverbank covered in flowers,
garlanded with brightly colored forest plants,
one is truly happy, practicing absorption:
there is no greater pleasure than this.
When it is midnight in a lonely forest,
and the sky rains, and the lions roar,
and a monk has gone to a mountain cave, practicing absorption:
there is no greater pleasure than this.
When one’s own thoughts have stopped,
between two mountains, sheltered inside a cleft,
without stress or heartlessness, practicing absorption:
there is no greater pleasure than this.
When one is happy, destroyer of stains, heartlessness, and sorrow,
free of obstructions, entanglements, and thorns,
and with all defilements annihilated, practicing absorption:
there is no greater pleasure than this.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Ten
Cakkhupāla
I’m blind, my eyes are ruined,
I’m traveling a desolate road.
Even if I have to crawl I’ll keep going—
though not with wicked companions.
Chapter Two
Somamitta
If you’re lost in the middle of a great sea,
and you clamber up on a little log, you’ll sink.
So too, a person who lives well
sinks by relying on a lazy person.
Hence you should avoid such
a lazy person who lacks energy.
Dwell with the noble ones
who are secluded and determined
and always energetic;
the astute who practice absorption.
Chapter One
Just as rain seeps into
a poorly roofed house,
lust seeps into
an undeveloped mind.
Just as rain doesn’t seep into
a well roofed house,
lust doesn’t seep into
a well-developed mind.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Five
Khadiravaniya
Cāla, Upacāla, and Sīsupacāla
meditate mindfully!
I’ve come to you like a hair-splitter.
The Book of the Twenties
Chapter One
Aṅgulimāla
“While walking, ascetic, you say ‘I’ve stopped.’
And I have stopped, but you tell me I’ve not.
I’m asking you this, ascetic:
how is it you’ve stopped and I have not?”
“Aṅgulimāla, I have forever stopped—
I’ve laid aside violence towards all creatures.
But you can’t stop yourself from harming living creatures;
that’s why I’ve stopped, but you have not.”
“Oh, at long last a hermit,
a great sage who I honor, has entered this great forest.
Now that I’ve heard your verse on Dhamma,
I shall discard a thousand evils.”
With these words, the bandit hurled his sword and weapons
down a cliff into a chasm.
He venerated the Holy One’s feet,
and asked the Buddha for the going forth right away.
Then the Buddha, the compassionate great hermit,
the teacher of the world with its gods,
said to him, “Come, monk!”
And with that he became a monk.
“He who once was heedless,
but turned to heedfulness,
lights up the world,
like the moon freed from a cloud.
Someone whose bad deed
is supplanted by the good,
lights up the world,
like the moon freed from a cloud.
A young mendicant
devoted to the Buddha’s teaching,
lights up the world,
like the moon freed from a cloud.
May even my enemies hear a Dhamma talk!
May even my enemies devote themselves to the Buddha’s teaching!
May even my enemies associate with those good people
who establish others in the Dhamma!
May even my enemies hear Dhamma at the right time,
from those who speak on acceptance,
praising acquiescence;
and may they follow that path!
For then they’d surely wish no harm
upon myself or others.
Having arrived at ultimate peace,
they’d look after creatures firm and frail.
For irrigators guide the water,
and fletchers straighten arrows;
carpenters carve timber—
but the astute tame themselves.
Some tame by using the rod,
some with goads, and some with whips.
But the poised one tamed me
without rod or sword.
My name is ‘Harmless’,
though I used to be harmful.
The name I bear today is true,
for I do no harm to anyone.
I used to be a bandit,
the notorious Aṅgulimāla.
Swept away in a great flood,
I went to the Buddha for refuge.
I used to have blood on my hands,
the notorious Aṅgulimāla.
See the refuge I’ve found—
the attachment to rebirth is eradicated.
I’ve done many of the sort of deeds
that lead to a bad destination.
The result of my deeds has already hit me,
so I enjoy my food free of debt.
Fools and half-wits
devote themselves to negligence.
But the wise protect diligence
as their best treasure.
Don’t devote yourself to negligence,
or delight in sexual intimacy.
For if you’re diligent and practice absorption,
you’ll attain ultimate happiness.
It was welcome, not unwelcome,
the advice I got was good.
Of teachings that are shared,
I encountered the best.
It was welcome, not unwelcome,
the advice I got was good.
I’ve attained the three knowledges,
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.”
“In the wilderness, at a tree’s root,
on mountains, or in caves—
it used to be that wherever I stood,
my mind was anxious.
But now I lie down happily and stand up happily,
I live my life happily,
out of Māra’s reach;
the teacher had compassion for me.
I used to belong to the brahmin caste,
highborn on both sides,
now I’m a son of the Holy One,
the Teacher, King of Dhamma.
I am rid of craving, free of grasping,
my sense-doors are guarded and well-restrained.
I’ve destroyed the root of misery,
and attained the ending of defilements.
I’ve served the teacher
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
The heavy burden is laid down,
the attachment to rebirth is eradicated.”
Chapter One
First: Gotama
Sages sleep at ease
when they’re not bound to women.
For the truth is hard to find among them
and one must always be guarded.
Sensual pleasure, you’ve been slain!
We’re not in your debt any more.
Now we go to quenching,
where there is no sorrow.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Four
Vaḍḍhamāna
Like they’re struck by a sword,
like their head was on fire,
a mendicant should go forth mindfully,
to give up desire for rebirth.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Seven
Pakkha
They fall, collapsed and fallen;
greedy, they return.
The work is done, the joyful is enjoyed,
happiness is found through happiness.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Six
Second: Kuṭivihārin
This was your old hut,
but you still want a new hut.
Let go of hope for a hut, monk!
A new hut will only bring more suffering.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Two
The Novice Sivaka
My mentor said to me:
“Let’s leave here, Sīvaka.”
My body lives in the village,
but my mind has gone to the wilderness.
I go there even when lying down—
you can't chain down those who know.
Chapter Four
Nisabha
“One who’s given up the five sensual titillations,
so pleasing and delightful,
and who’s left the home life out of faith—
let them make an end to suffering!
I don’t long for death;
I don’t long for life;
I await my time,
aware and mindful.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Five
First: Vimala
The rain falls and the wind blows on mother earth,
while lightning flashes across the sky!
But my thoughts are stilled,
my mind is serene.
Chapter Four
Kappaṭakura
This fellow, “Rag-rice”, he sure is a rag!
Into the vase of the deathless, polished and overflowing,
sufficient teaching has been poured;
the path to build up absorptions has been laid out.
Don’t nod off, Rag—
I’ll smack your ear!
Nodding off in the middle of the Saṅgha?
You know no bounds.
The Book of the Fourteens
Chapter One
Khadiravaniyarevata
Since I’ve gone forth
from the lay life to homelessness,
I’m not aware of any intention
that is ignoble and hateful.
“May these beings be killed!
May they be slaughtered! May they suffer!”—
I’m not aware of having any such intentions
in all this long while.
I have been aware of loving-kindness,
measureless and well-developed;
gradually consolidated
as it was taught by the Buddha.
I’m friend and comrade to all,
compassionate for all beings!
I develop a mind of love,
always delighting in harmlessness.
Unfaltering, unshakable,
I gladden the mind.
I develop the divine meditation,
which sinners do not cultivate.
Having entered a meditation state without thought,
a disciple of the Buddha
is at that moment blessed
with noble silence.
As a rocky mountain
is unwavering and well grounded,
so when delusion ends,
a monk, like a mountain, doesn’t tremble.
To the man who has not a blemish
who is always seeking purity,
even a hair-tip of evil
seems as big as a cloud.
As a frontier city
is guarded inside and out,
so you should ward yourselves—
don’t let the moment pass you by.
I don’t long for death;
I don’t long for life;
I await my time,
like a worker waiting for their wages.
I don’t long for death;
aware and mindful.
I’ve served the teacher
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
The heavy burden is laid down,
the attachment to rebirth is eradicated.
I’ve attained the goal
for the sake of which I went forth
from the lay life to homelessness—
the ending of all fetters.
Persist with diligence:
this is my instruction.
Come, I’ll realize quenching—
I’m liberated in every way.
The Book of the Sixteens
Chapter One
Aññāsikoṇḍañña
“My confidence grew
as I heard the teaching, so full of flavor.
Dispassion is what was taught,
without any grasping at all.”
“There are so many pretty things
in this wide open land.
They disturb one’s thoughts, it seems to me,
attractive, provoking lust.
Just as a rain cloud would settle
the dust blown up by the wind,
so thoughts settle down
when seen with wisdom.
All conditions are impermanent—
when this is seen with wisdom
one grows disillusioned with suffering:
this is the path to purity.
All conditions are suffering—
when this is seen with wisdom
one grows disillusioned with suffering:
this is the path to purity.
All principles are not-self—
when this is seen with wisdom
one grows disillusioned with suffering:
this is the path to purity.
The senior monk who was awakened right after the Buddha,
Koṇḍañña, is keenly energetic.
He has given up birth and death,
and has completed the spiritual journey.
There are floods, snares, and strong posts,
and a mountain hard to crack;
snapping the posts and snares,
breaking the mountain so hard to break,
crossing over to the far shore,
one practicing absorption is freed from Māra’s bonds.
When a mendicant is haughty and fickle,
relying on bad friends,
they sink down in the great flood,
overcome by a wave.
But one who is steady and stable,
alert, with senses restrained,
intelligent, with good friends,
makes an end of suffering.
With knobbly knees,
thin and veiny,
eating and drinking in moderation—
this person’s spirit is undaunted.
Pestered by flies and mosquitoes
in the wilds, the formidable forest,
one should mindfully endure,
like an elephant at the head of the battle.
I don’t long for death;
like a worker waiting for their wages.
I don’t long for death;
aware and mindful.
I’ve served the teacher
the attachment to rebirth is eradicated.
I’ve attained the goal
for the sake of which I went forth
from the lay life to homelessness—
what use do I have for pupils?”
Chapter Four
Upavāṇa
The perfected one, the Holy One in the world,
the sage is afflicted by winds.
If there’s hot water,
give it to the sage, brahmin.
I wish to bring it to the one
who is esteemed by the estimable,
honored by the honorable,
and venerated by the venerable.
Chapter One
Second: Vimala
Shunning bad friends,
associate with the best of people.
Stick to the advice he gave you,
aspiring to unshakable happiness.
If you’re lost in the middle of a great sea,
and you clamber up on a little log, you’ll sink.
So too, a person who lives well
sinks by relying on a lazy person.
Hence you should avoid such
a lazy person who lacks energy.
Dwell with the noble ones
who are secluded and determined
and always energetic;
the astute who practice absorption.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Two
Belaṭṭhasīsa
Just as a fine thoroughbred
proceeds with ease,
tail and mane flying in the wind;
so my days and nights
proceed with ease,
full of spiritual joy.
Chapter One
Gaṅgātīriya
My hut on the bank of the Ganges
is made from three palm leaves.
My alms-bowl is a funeral pot,
my robe is cast-off rags.
In my first two rainy seasons
I spoke only one word.
In my third rainy season
the mass of darkness was shattered.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Four
First: Tissa
Like they’re struck by a sword,
like their head was on fire,
a mendicant should go forth mindfully
to give up sensual desire.
Chapter One
Sāṭimattiya
In the past you had faith,
today you have none.
What’s yours is yours alone—
I’ve done nothing wrong.
Faith is impermanent, fickle:
or so I have seen.
Passions wax and wane:
why would a sage waste away on that account?
The meal of a sage is cooked
bit by bit in this family or that.
I’ll walk for alms,
for my legs are strong.
The Book of the Fives
Chapter One
Nadīkassapa
It was truly for my benefit
that the Buddha went to the river Nerañjara.
When I heard his teaching,
I shunned wrong view.
I used to perform a diverse spectrum of sacrifices;
I served the sacred flame,
imagining, “This is purity.”
I was a blind, ordinary person.
Caught in the thicket of wrong view,
deluded by misapprehension.
Thinking impurity was purity,
I was blind and ignorant.
I’ve abandoned wrong view;
all rebirths are shattered.
I serve the truly worthy flame:
I bow to the Realized One.
I’ve given up all delusion;
craving for continued existence is shattered;
transmigration through births is finished;
now there are no more future lives.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Eight
Ātuma
A young bamboo is hard to extract
when the point is grown and become all woody.
That’s how I feel with the wife who was arranged for me.
Give me permission—now I’ve gone forth.
The Book of the Fours
Chapter One
Jambuka
For fifty-five years
I wore dust and dirt.
Eating one meal a month,
I tore out my hair and beard.
I stood on one foot;
I rejected seats;
I ate dried-out dung;
I didn’t accept food set aside for me.
I did many deeds of this kind,
which lead to a bad destination.
Swept away by a great flood,
I went to the Buddha for refuge.
See the going for refuge!
See the excellence of the teaching!
I’ve attained the three knowledges
and fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.
The Book of the Fourteens
Chapter One
Godatta
Just as a fine thoroughbred,
yoked to a carriage, endures the load.
Though oppressed by the heavy burden,
it doesn’t shake off the yoke.
So too, those who are as full of wisdom
as the ocean is with water,
don’t look down on others;
this is the teaching of the noble ones for living creatures.
People who fall under the sway of time,
the sway of rebirth in this or that state,
undergo suffering,
and those young men grieve in this life.
Elated by things that bring happiness,
downcast by things that bring suffering:
this pair destroys the fool
who doesn’t see things as they are.
But those who in suffering, and in happiness,
and in the middle have overcome the weaver—
they stand like a boundary pillar,
neither elated nor downcast.
Not to gain nor loss,
not to fame nor reputation,
not to criticism nor praise,
not to suffering nor happiness—
the wise cling to nothing,
like a droplet on a lotus-leaf.
They are happy everywhere,
and victorious everywhere.
There’s legitimate loss,
and there’s illegitimate gain.
Legitimate loss is better
than illegitimate gain.
There’s the fame of the unintelligent,
and there’s the disrepute of the discerning.
The disrepute of the discerning is better
than the fame of the unintelligent.
There’s praise by fools,
and there’s criticism by the discerning.
Criticism by the discerning is better
than praise by fools.
There’s the happiness of sensual pleasures,
and there’s the suffering of seclusion.
The suffering of seclusion is better
than the happiness of sensual pleasures.
There’s life without principles,
and there’s death with principles.
Death with principles is better
than life without principles.
Those who’ve given up desire and anger,
their minds at peace regarding rebirth in this or that state,
wander in the world unattached,
for them nothing is beloved or unloved.
Having developed the awakening factors,
the faculties and the powers,
having arrived at ultimate peace,
they are quenched, without defilements.
Chapter Five
Cūḷaka
The peacocks cry out with their fair crests and tails,
their lovely blue necks and fair faces, their beautiful song and their call.
This broad earth is lush with grass and dew,
and the sky is full of beautiful clouds.
One practicing absorption is happy in mind, and their appearance is uplifting;
going forth in the teaching of the Buddha is easy for a good person.
You should realize that supreme, unchanging state,
so very pure, subtle, and hard to see.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Five
Sirivaḍḍha
Lightning flashes down
on the cleft of Vebhāra and Paṇḍava.
But in the mountain cleft he is absorbed in jhāna—
the son of the Buddha, inimitable and poised.
Chapter One
Vāraṇa
Anyone among men
who harms other creatures:
that person will fall
both from this world and the next.
But someone with a mind of love,
compassionate for all creatures:
a person like that
makes much merit.
One should train in following good advice,
in attending closely to ascetics,
in sitting alone in hidden places,
and in calming the mind.
Chapter One
Piṇḍolabhāradvāja
You can’t live by fasting,
but food doesn’t lead to peace of heart.
Seeing how this bag of bones is sustained by food,
I wander, seeking.
They know it’s just a swamp,
this homage and veneration in respectable families.
Honor is a subtle dart, hard to extract,
and hard for a sinner to give up.
That is how these verses were recited by the senior venerable Piṇḍolabhāradvāja.
The Book of the Sixes
Chapter One
Kātiyāna
Get up, Kātiyāna, and sit!
Don’t sleep too much, be wakeful.
Don’t be lazy and let the kinsman of the heedless,
the King of Death, catch you in his trap.
Like a wave in the mighty ocean,
birth and old age sweep you under.
Make a safe island of yourself,
for you have no other shelter.
The teacher has mastered this path,
which transcends chains, and the fear of birth and old age.
Be diligent all the time
and dedicate yourself to practice.
Free yourself from your former bonds!
Wearing your outer robe, with shaven head, eating almsfood,
don’t delight in play or sleep,
dedicate yourself to absorption, Kātiyāna.
Meditate and conquer, Kātiyāna,
you’re an expert in the path to sanctuary.
Attaining unexcelled purity,
you’ll be quenched, as a flame by water.
A lamp of feeble flame
is bent down by the wind, like a creeper;
just so, kinsman of Indra,
shake off Māra, without grasping.
Free of lust for feelings,
await your time here, cooled.
The Book of the Ones
Chapter Two
Mahāvaccha
Empowered by wisdom, with precepts and observances intact,
serene, delighting in absorption, mindful,
eating just the needed food,
one should bide one’s time here, free of desire.
Chapter One
Yasoja
“With knobbly knees,
thin and veiny,
eating and drinking but little—
this person’s spirit is undaunted.”
“Pestered by flies and mosquitoes
in the wilds, the formidable forest,
one should mindfully endure,
like an elephant at the head of the battle.
A monk alone is like the supreme Brahmā;
a pair of monks are like gods;
three are like a village;
and more than that is a rabble.”
The Book of the Sixes
Chapter One
Sirimaṇḍa
The rain saturates things that are covered up;
it doesn’t saturate things that are open.
Therefore you should open up a covered thing,
so the rain will not saturate it.
The world is beaten down by death
and surrounded by old age.
The dart of craving has laid it low,
and it’s always fuming with desire.
The world is beaten down by death,
caged by old age,
beaten constantly without respite,
like a thief being flogged.
Three things are coming, like a wall of flame:
death, disease, and old age.
No power can stand before them,
and no speed’s enough to flee.
Don’t waste your day,
a little or a lot.
Every night that passes
shortens your life by that much.
Walking or standing,
sitting or lying down:
your final night draws near;
you have no time to be careless.
The Book of the Twenties
Chapter One
Second: Māluṅkyaputta
When you see a sight, mindfulness is lost
as attention latches on a pleasant feature.
Experiencing it with a mind full of desire,
you keep clinging to it.
